VOL. II. 1
THE LEGENDARY.
THE FIELD OF THE GROUNDED ARMS,
SARATOGA.
BY FITZ-GREENE HALLECK.
Strangers
! your eyes are on that valley fixed
Intently, as we gaze on vacancy,
When the mind's wings o'erspread
The spirit-world of dreams.
True, 't is a scene of lovelinessthe bright,
Green dwelling of the Summer's first born hours,
Smiling, through tears of dew,
A welcome to the morn.
And morn returns their welcome. Sun and cloud
Smile on the green earth from their home in heaven,
Even as the mother smiles
Above her cradled boy
And wreathe their light and shade o'er plain and mountain,
O'er sleepless seas of grass whose waves are flowers,
The rivers golden shores,
The forests of dark pines.
The song of the wild bird is on the wind,
The hum of the wild bee, the music wild
Of waves upon the bank,
Of leaves upon the bough.
But all is song and beauty in the land,
In these her Eden daysthen journey on!
A thousand scenes like this
Will greet you ere the eve.
Ye linger yet. Ye see not, hear not now
The sunny smile, the music of to-day
Your thoughts are wandering up,
Far up the stream of time;
And long slept recollections of old tales
Are rushing on your memories, as ye breathe
That valley's storied name,
Field of the grounded arms!
Gazers! it is your homeAmerican
Is your lip's haughty smile of triumph here;
American your step
Ye tread your native land.
And your high thoughts are on her Glory's day,
The solemn sabbath of the week of Battle,
When Fortune bowed to earth
The banner of Burgoyne.
The forest leaves lay scattered, cold and dead,
Upon the withered grass that autumn morn,
When, with as withered hearts,
And hopes as dead and cold,
His gallant army formed their last array
Upon that field, in silence and deep gloom,
And, at their conqueror's feet,
Laid their war weapons down.
Sullen and stern, disarmed, but not dishonored,
Brave men, but brave in vain, they yielded there
The soldier's trial-task
Is not alone to die.
Honor to chivalry! the conqueror's breath
Stains not the ermine of his foeman's fame,
Nor mocks his captive's doom
The bitterest cup of war.
But be that bitterest cup the doom of all
Whose swords are lightning-flashes in the cloud
Of the invader's wrath,
Threatening a gallant land!
His army's trumpet-tones wake not alone
Her slumbering echoesfrom a thousand hills
Her answering voices shout,
And her bells ring`To arms!'
Then Danger hovers o'er the invader's march,
On raven-wings; hushing the song of Fame,
And Glory's hues of beauty
Fade from the cheek of Death.
A foe is heard in every rustling leaf,
A fortress seen in every rock and tree;
The veteran eye of art
Is dim and powerless then,
And War becomes the peasant's joy; her drum
His merriest music, and her field of death
His couch of happy dreams,
After Life's Harvest-Home.
He battles, heart and arm, his own blue sky
Above him, and his own green land around,
Land of his father's grave,
His blessing and his prayers!
Land where he learnt to lisp a mother's name,
The first beloved on earth, the last forgot,
Land of his frolic youth,
Land of his bridal eve!
Land of his children! Vain your columned strength,
Invaders! vain your battle's steed and fire!
Choose ye the morrow's doom,
A prison or a grave!
And such were Saratoga's victorssuch
The peasants brave, whose deeds and death have given
A glory to her skies,
A music to her name.
In honorable life her fields they trod,
In honorable death they sleep below,
Their sons' proud feelings here
Their noblest monuments.
Feelings, as proud as were the Greek's of old,
When, in his country's hour of fame, he stood,
Happy, and young, and free,
Gazing on Marathon!
1*
THE STEPMOTHER.
`
I do n't
want to see her! I do n't wish to know
her!' were the passionate exclamations of Lucius Lloyd,
when informed that his father had just arrived,
accompanied
by a second wife, and that he must prepare to
receive her.
`It is very hard, master Lucius,' said Willet, a
woman who had attended him during his infancy, and
had since been retained in the family, `cruel hard, I
know; but put a good face on it at first, to please your
papa, you can do as you like by and by.'
`I will not be a hypocrite,' replied the indignant boy;
`I can never love another mamma, and I will not
pretend
to do so.'
In the midst of this contest between the generous,
though perverted sensibility of the child, and the wily
suggestions of Willet, who had herself chiefly infected
his mind with the vulgar prejudice against stepmothers,
Mr Lloyd entered. Respect for his father, combined
with those habits of decorum in which he had been
educated, restrained so far the expression of his feelings,
that, when taken by the hand to be conducted to the
parlour, Lucius did not resist, and even passed civilly,
though coldly, through an introduction to his new mother.
Mr Lloyd, an Englishman by birth, had passed, at
intervals, considerable time in America. On the death
of his wife and mother, he had removed to this country;
and having long had a commercial establishment in
one of our flourishing seaports, chose in that place his
permanent residence.
Mrs Lloyd had passed the sanguine period of youth,
which hopes everything, yet is disgusted at the least
disappointment. She had long known and esteemed
her husband; and when the sentiment of friendship
ripened into love, her heart opened to receive his child.
It was not with that romantic excess of sensibility, with
which a waning belle affects to consider the children of
the wealthy widower as so many inducements to the
connexion, but with a sincere and affectionate interest;
a fixed and religious purpose to fulfil the duties she
was about to impose on herself. Every kind feeling
was confirmed, when for the first time she beheld him.
He had just completed his tenth year. His light curls,
fair complexion, and delicate features, might have
subjected
his face to the reproach of effeminacy, but for
the strong expression of his dark blue eye, and a gravity
which seldom permitted his little mouth to disclose the
dimples that lay
perdu
in his nicely rounded cheek.
His figure was slender and graceful, and his dress
arranged with that nice attention to propriety which
marks his native country. During the absence of his
father, his mother and grandmother had been his sole
companions; a circumstance, which, while it had tended
to mature and refine his character, had rendered him
exclusive in his sympathies, and reserved in his manners,
so that to the imagination of Mrs Lloyd, who smilingly
extended her hand and would have drawn him towards
her to receive an embrace, he presented the idea of a
miniature English gentleman.
Though Lucius forbore what he deemed a dishonest
expression of cordiality, and replied to her advances by
a polite, but distant bow, he could not but acknowledge
to himself that his father's new wife was more pleasing
than he had expected to find her.
Mrs Lloyd, who, had she possessed the vanity of
conquest, might have returned a list of killed and
wounded, far exceeding that of most of the beauties of
her day, attained the mellow age of thirty without
seeing cause to surrender her liberty. Independent in
her fortune because moderate in her desires, happy in
her connexions, a favorite in the first society in her
country, and still the object of admiration, it was not
until Mr Lloyd, from an old and established friend,
became a devoted and humble suitor, that she could be
won. Her beauty, which, in its prime, was of that
description which would have satisfied the nicest critic,
combined that playfulness and sweetness, that expression
of intelligence and goodness which is more permanent
than the bloom of youth; and which is felt by all, from
the child to the sage, alike by those, who cannot define
the charm, as by those, who, better skilled in the analysis
of the emotion of beauty, can reduce it to its elements.
Lucius was conscious that as he looked on her his
revoltings became less. But for the frequently
administered
insinuations of Willet, therefore, who was
discerning
enough to perceive that her influence and
importance must decline as Mrs Lloyd's increased,
the little rebel would soon have laid down his arms.
To a constancy beyond his years Lucius added a
principle of honor that disdained the idea of preferring
any new friend to his long tried, faithful Willet, and he
secretly drank in the poison of her jealousy. It must,
however, be acknowledged, that she said little more
than she herself believed, and really loved the child
whose noble nature she was thus perverting.
Mrs Lloyd was too practised an observer not to
perceive
that Lucius did not love her. It grieved her the
more from the reflection, that, in a character which she
found to be one of much thought and deep feeling, she
could not expect to avail herself of those capricious
impulses, which, in most children, like the springs of a
machine in the hands of the mechanician, enable the
skilful operator to play them at will. For a time she
forebore to mention her apprehensions to her husband;
but at length hoping that he could instruct her to
insinuate
herself into the only heart she had ever found
impregnable, she revealed to him her difficulties.
`Be not distressed,' said he, `I know Lucius
thoroughly, and can trust him; I can perceive, even
now, that nothing but a mistaken feeling of duty
sustains
his opposition; and I will own to you, without
even fearing to pain you by the declaration, that his
conduct affects me; and that I love him the better for
his tenacious regard to his mother's memory. Continue
to treat him as you have done. Do not suffer yourself
to be repelled by his coldness; do not even appear to
observe it; you may find it a work of time and labor
to produce the impression you desire, but once made it
will be indelible.'
Mrs Lloyd loved her husband too well, not to accede
to his wishes; and besides, to tell the truth, female
pride took part with generosity, and, piqued at the
resistance
she had encountered, she exclaimed, `If there is
power in woman he shall yet be mine!'
After an interval allotted to the festivities of the
wedding
,
Lucius returned to school. Applying himself with
more than usual diligence, sorrow necessarily yielded
in some measure to occupation; and when the vacation
occurred, and he was again at home, every one
remarked
his increased cheerfulness. Painful ideas however,
returned; and Mrs Lloyd soon had proof that the
conquest
was not yet effected. One morning Lucius did
not appear at the breakfast table. `Let me go to him,'
said she, preventing the servant, `perhaps he is not
well!' She entered his room softly, and found him still
asleep. Unwilling rudely to awake him, she hung over
him, observing the slight changes that occasionally
crossed his features. At length he smiled, and a tear,
seemingly of joy rather than sorrow, made its way
through his long eyelash. Involuntarily she stooped to
kiss him, but awaking at her touch, he repulsed her, at
the same time exclaiming, `Is it you? I was dreaming of
my mother. Oh! I should be willing to sleep seven years
could I always dream of her!' and turning his face to the
pillow he sobbed aloud. Mrs Lloyd, as much touched by
his emotion as mortified by her own failure, retreated.
At the close of the vacation Mr and Mrs Lloyd
accompanied
Lucius on his return to school. There, a
new circumstance added to the interest with which,
spite of his coldness, he had already inspired her. On
entering the schoolroom, their attention was attracted
to the names of the pupils, arranged in a conspicuous
situation, according to their respective classes and
individual
merits. There were among them several boys
the seniors of Lucius; yet his name stood
unaccompanied
by any other and above the rest.
`What does this mean?' asked his father.
`It means that your son,' replied the instructer, `is
not only at the head of his class, but so much so of
the whole school, that there is not one to enter into
competition with him.'
`A distinction so invidious would give me more pain
than pleasure,' observed Mr Lloyd, `were it not for the
modesty which forbore to mention it even to me.'
Lucius pressed his father's hand, and his glowing
cheek attested that his approbation was the highest
reward
that he could receive. Mr Lloyd, though a
merchant
,
yet, rising above the consideration of mere wealth,
had cultivated and enlarged his mind by travelling and
elegant pursuits. At the same time that he was
accomplished
in whatever distinguishes the gentleman, he
never failed to secure, by the intrinsic excellence of his
character, the affections of those who were first
attracted
by the charm of his manners. Although success
had crowned his enterprises, the details of trade
disgusted
him; and he gladly improved the studious and
retired temper of his son, to give to his life another
direction
.
In conformity with this design Lucius was
soon after removed to town, the better to prepare him
for the liberal course of education to which he was
destined. Willet, although her place was nearly a
sinecure
,
had acted in such consistency with her
prejudices
against Mrs Lloyd, as to resign her post of lady of
the bed chamber, for the more arduous, but, as she
conceived
,
more honorable situation, of wife to the
proprietor
of a little grocery. Mr Lloyd had suspected her
mischievous influence on his son, yet was unwilling to
discard, in a foreign country, a domestic who had long
and faithfully served his family. He was therefore
heartily rejoiced, when, by her voluntary abdication,
Lucius could safely be at home. The beneficial effects
of the change were soon perceived; for though Lucius,
with his characteristic fidelity, would often visit `Willet,'
as he continued to call her, her influence gradually, but
evidently, declined, while Mrs Lloyd, with untiring
patience
,
availed herself of all his little relentings to get
into favor. An occurrence soon enabled her to make
rapid progress. One afternoon, as she was seated by a
window in the rear of her house, she saw Lucius
coming
with a hasty step and troubled air from the
extremity
of the premises. There was now no Willet at hand
with an assiduity designed to prevent assistance from
all but herself, and certain from his manner that he
required
it, Mrs Lloyd hastened to offer her services.
`Oh!' said he, `you cannot help me; my poor,
dear Favorite is, I fear, dying.'
This was a dog that had belonged to his grandmother,
and, from the circumstance of being born the same
week with Lucius, had been regarded with peculiar
kindness. He and Favorite had literally passed their
infancy together; had rolled over the same carpet, had
played with the same rattle, and had even sometimes
eaten from the same porringer. As the instincts of the
dog developed themselves more rapidly than the
capacities
of the child, within the first year Favorite had
been advanced from the play-mate to the protector;
and had so learned to control the mischievous
propensities
of the pup, that, instead of secreting his little
master's toys, he would not permit them to be touched
by any unauthorised hand, and would regularly mount
guard by his cradle while he slepta fidelity, which,
as the rational animal in his turn got the start in the
race, and had passed that almost indefinable barrier
which separates instinct from reason, he endeavoured
to repay by laboring to make Favorite a participator
in those privileges, which to the poor brute, by the law
of his nature, were denied. Hour after hour would
Lucius try to teach Favorite to speak, to laugh, or to
learn his letters. Once even his grandmother detected
him, much to the horror of the good lady, with Favorite
in a corner, erect on his hind legs, his forepaws hanging
reverently down, and his subdued look and pendant
ears harmonizing well with the intention, dictating to
him, with the gravity of a father confessor, a prayer
which he had himself just learned. On the death of
his mistress, Favorite had been regarded as a faithful
domestic, bequeathed to the care of her family; and,
though rather a troublesome attendant on a voyage,
neither Mr Lloyd nor his son would have consented to
leave him behind. It had been remarked for a day or
two that he looked dull. It was not, however, until
Lucius, on the morning abovementioned, found him
shivering in a retired corner of the coach-house, that
he was perceived to be sick.
`My poor dog!' repeatedly exclaimed he, `what
shall I do for him? Oh! what shall I do for him?'
`Let us go and see him,' said Mrs Lloyd; `perhaps
he is not so ill as you fear.'
When arrived at the place however, she found the
poor animal apparently in great suffering. Desirous to
improve every opportunity of rendering herself
important
to Lucius, and of convincing him of her sympathy
in whatever interested him, she forbore to call a servant,
assisted in arranging the straw more comfortably, and
then returned to the house to obtain advice. Having
prepared such a dose as she was assured was proper,
she was about to administer it herself, but Favorite,
with the revoltings of a petted child, closed his teeth
against it, and even uttered some angry complainings.
`Let me try,' said Lucius, gently patting him, stroking
his head, reclining his face towards him, and soothing
him with sounds of endearment. The dog by degrees
relaxed his jaws; and though with some difficulty,
Lucius
at length effected his object. Delighted with his
success, he felt confident of a cure. The next morning
he was up much before his usual time and beside the
bed of Favorite, refusing to leave him even to take
breakfast. As her husband was not at home, Mrs
Lloyd quickly despatched her solitary meal, and
hastened
to join him. She soon perceived that all their efforts
had been ineffectual. The dim, half open eye of the
poor animal, his swollen and protruded tongue,
indicated
approaching death. Lucius, who sat bending over
and silently contemplating him, while big tears dropped
VOL. II. 2
on the head and ears of his poor dumb friend, was
evidently aware that there was no longer any hope.
`He knew me,' at length sobbed he, `when I first
came; I know he did, for he tried to lick my hand;
he will never do so again; oh! my poor dog! my dear
Favorite!'
Mrs Lloyd, distressed at the growing violence of his
sorrow, endeavoured to get him away. `You can do
him no good now, my dear boy; come, then, from a
scene that is so painful to you.'
`I will never leave him,' replied he, `while he
breathes.' Yielding to a determination she feared to
oppose, she contented herself by remaining; and
putting
her arm tenderly around him, she awaited the
death of the poor animal, of which she was first aware,
by Lucius' throwing himself passionately on the straw
beside him, and exclaiming, `He is dead, he is dead!
Everything, everything dies that I love!'
Much affected by the artless and deep sorrow of the
child, Mrs Lloyd could not restrain her own emotions.
Lucius, soothed by her sympathy, at length consented
to leave the spot, and found some consolation in
arranging
with her the decent interment of his poor dog.
The ground attached to the house was of greater
extent than is usual in large towns, and Mrs Lloyd's
taste and ingenuity had arranged it so as to produce
the best effect. In one corner of the portion
appropriated
to grass, and under an evergreen shrub, which
very opportunely served as an emblem of his master's
undying affection, she proposed that the remains of
Favorite should be deposited. This last duty performed,
she had her own reasons for inducing Lucius to pass a
few days with some friends in the country. He was no
sooner gone, than, sending for a mechanic, she engaged
him to erect a neat, tasteful little monument of her own
design, over the place of interment, and, under their
joint efforts, the tiny fabric was soon reared, and bore
on its front these lines;
`'T is said that monarchs oft have had
Minions who made a nation sad.
For such, no costly pile should rise
To deck the vile in virtue's guise.
More just that we a tomb should rear
An honest Favorite 's buried here!'
On his return, the first place that Lucius visited was
the grave of his dog, where he saw with delight the
honors rendered to his memory.
He had never, as yet, addressed Mrs Lloyd by the
appellation of
mother
. Naturally taciturn, and always
respectful, the omission had been unnoticed, except by
his father and herself. Upon this occasion, however,
as if taught, by that instinct which allies delicate minds,
the most appropriate requital of her kindness, he
hastened to the parlour, and, taking her hand, with a
smiling countenance, but in a tremulous voice, exclaimed,
`Oh! mamma, how very good you have been to me!'
She comprehended all he felt, all he would have said;
and, feeling herself more than rewarded by the few
words he had uttered, she affectionately pressed his
hand and turned the conversation to his visit.
From this time confidence was established between
them. He passed nearly all his leisure hours in her
society; and, relaxing from his usual gravity, would
occasionally surprise her with sallies of playfulness, of
which she had supposed him incapable. One morning,
entering her room with a face full of some gay intent,
and approaching her, `Mamma,' cried he, `hold out
your hand.'
Are you going to tell my fortune, or to chastise me,
Lucius? But there it is, do with it what you please.'
Taking her left hand, selecting the proper finger, and
placing on it a beautiful diamond ring, with which his
father had furnished him for the purpose, he gravely
pronounced
`With this ring I thee wedand now,' added he
with animation, `you are as much mine as papa's!'
Gratified and affected, Mrs Lloyd could only say,
`Yes, dear Lucius, till death us do part!'
Two years glided on, marked only by increase of
attachment, when a little stranger made its appearance,
who, Mrs Lloyd sometimes feared, might suggest
uneasy
thoughts to Lucius; but herein she wronged him.
He was superior to that mean jealousy which ever
seeks the first place. His former repugnance to herself,
was from no distrust of his father's affection; it was
not that he apprehended he should be neglected, but
that he feared his mother would be forgotten. He
received his little sister, therefore, not as a rival, but as
a new tie between himself and Mrs Lloyd; and when,
at her particular request, he was desired to give her a
name, he replied, though not without a quivering lip,
`Frances!' It was the name of his mother; and by this
expression, so simple, yet so significant, he conveyed
everything of tenderness for her memory, confidence in
Mrs Lloyd, and fraternal affection for the infant. The
little girl, as soon as her spark of intellect appeared,
distinguished
Lucius as her prime favorite. In
administering
to her amusement, he would assume a new character.
Not even Harlequin could more successfully transform
himself to gratify an applauding pit, than Lucius would
pass through the diverting imitations of a cock, a cat, a
dog, or a horse, to catch a smile from the little Frances.
As she became more companionable, every solitary
pleasure was abandoned to draw her in her carriage
or to contrive for her new toys. When sick, no one
could soothe her like Lucius, and if irritated, the sound
of his voice could calm her. In short, he was the good
genius of the nursery, at whose approach all trouble
and vexation fled away.
Whether it is more interesting to record scenes of
happiness than of sorrow, we will not stop to discuss
certain it is, that truth now requires us, in the language
of artists, to `put out some of the lights of our picture.'
Time, to our happy family, flew with untiring wing.
Rational pursuits and domestic endearments occupied
every hour; and Lucius and nearly attained his
sixteenth
year, when one of those fearful revolutions in
trade, which sometimes deceive the calculations of the
most cautious and experienced, extended its effects to
his father. Far from apprehending the ruin which was
to follow, and which, but for an unforeseen event, might
have been averted, Mr Lloyd did not apprize his wife
and son of his difficulties; and devoting himself to his
affairs with an intensity which he could not endure,
anxiety and fatigue brought on a fever, by which, in a
few days, his life was terminated. There are sufferings
of our nature of which the description seems but a
mockery; of none more so, than the emotions of her,
who, after years of friendship, confidence, and love,
finds herself, while still in the very freshness and glow
of her affections, a widowthat sad and helpless being,
to whom, with all of disappointment and anguish that
grief can ever know, is added the aggravation of
loneliness
!
But Mrs Lloyd was a religious woman; and
from the depths of her affliction looked up to Him, who,
among the myriads of his creatures, could distinguish
and comfort her.
In the first overwhelming shock of Mr Lloyd's death,
every consideration but of his loss, was unthought of;
and it was not till some time after, when an investigation
2*
of his affairs took place, that it appeared there were
large claims on the estate. Unused to business, and
dismayed at her situation, Mrs Lloyd knew not what to
do, or to whom to apply. She was emphatically alone;
not only deprived of him, who in any situation would
have been her chief delight on earth, but she was among
strangers. Her parents had been dead many years.
She had no brother, and her sisters were settled in a
distant part of the Union, where she had herself resided
previous to her marriage. During her short married
life, she had been too happy in her own little family to
seek much beyond it; and, satisfied with courteously
returning the civilities with which she had been greeted
on her arrival, she had scarcely more than a
ceremonious
intercourse with the world without. In the midst
of her perplexities, a gentleman whom she slightly knew,
as a connexion by marriage of her husband, offered his
services. Considering it a kind interposition of
Providence
in her behalf, she committed everything to his
guidance. Regarding him as entitled to advise, and
supposing that his intentions must be honest, no one
presumed to interfere; and thus, in a city where Mr
Lloyd was well known and highly esteemed, his wife
and children became the prey of a plausible villain.
A forced sale was effected, though the creditors did not
require itwhen, on the contrary, almost without an
exception, they were desirous of testifying their
confidence
in his integrity, by extending every favor to his
widow. Under false representations, the unprincipled
Whitby attained his object and erected his fortune on
the wreck of Mr Lloyd's. Not until nearly all was
gone, were his proceedings arrested; and, so specious
were the pretexts under which he had conducted them,
that no legal redress could be obtained. Mrs Lloyd,
who was utterly ignorant of the fraud practised on others
as well as herself, and who was made to believe that
the relinquishment of everything was necessary to the
discharge of the debts, could have submitted without a
murmur to her own privations for such a purpose; but
that the humane intentions of the creditors should tend
to their own injury, moved her deeply. Her little
fortune was not involved in the destruction of her
husband's
;
and, though a pittance compared with the
condition
from which she had been thus suddenly hurled,
she determined to use it as much for the benefit of
Lucius as of Frances. `While I have a dollar,' thought
she, `that noble boy shall share it.'
Upon a calculation of her resources, though strongly
impelled to return to her native city, she deemed it best
to remain where she was, with the difference, however,
of exchanging her liberal establishment for a small
dwelling, the sole remnant of her husband's large
possessions
.
In confirmation of her own convictions came
the inclinations of Lucius, who revolted at the idea of
appearing as a dependant among strangers. The death
of his father had seemed, for a time, to stun him.
Retreating into the sanctuary of his grief, he sought no
sympathy; and, though more tender and respectful than
ever to his mother, he shrunk from all communion in
his sorrow even with her. It was when some person
remarked in his presence, that he had seen Mr Lloyd's
watch in the possession of Whitby, that he first found
utterance. Contempt at the meanness of the villany
practised upon them, the least among the feelings which
absorbed him, was the only one he could express.
The period appointed for their removal arrived; and
Lucius, anxious to sustain his mother, nerved himself
for the trial. The elegant decorations of the house had
long disappeared; but every room was consecrated by
associations dearer than all that wealth could give.
After a farewell look at every part of the spacious
mansion
,
the little library in which she had always received
her husband in the evening on his return from the
countinghouse, where he usually took what he called
his `Englishman's supper,' and the room in which she
had first heard the sound of her infant's voice were the
spots from which she found it most difficult to tear
herself
.
Again and again returning with her little girl in
her arms for a last glance, at length, with a hurried
step, as not daring to trust her resolution, she entered
the carriage which was to convey her to her new home.
`Where is Master Lucius?' asked she, as she
ascended.
`In the garden, Mistress,' replied the footman,
who, though no longer in her service, had begged to
be permitted to attend her to her dwelling, and to assist
in its arrangement; `in the garden, Mistress.'
Mrs Lloyd readily comprehended, that, amidst all
which he was obliged to surrender, the grave of poor
Favorite was not forgotten.
Finding herself at her humble residence, she was too
wise and too virtuous to sink into inaction or
despondency
.
Well aware that there is no situation in which
the good and the busy cannot find some consolation and
even happiness, and having a powerful incitement in
her children, she resolutely entered on the duties of her
new condition. Though reared with an affection which
required of her little more than to enjoy the blessings by
which she was surrounded, and most tenderly cherished
by her husband, she had, nevertheless, in her rectitude
and good sense, principles which could never be inert.
Dividing between herself and Dorothy, her only
remaining
domestic, the cares of her little household, she
shrunk not from her own portion of the labor. From
her private funds she had purchased such of the simpler
articles of her late elegant furniture as were suited to
her present style of living, confining herself to what was
necessary, except that she could not forego the luxury
of furnishing the little chamber of Lucius with a few
of the choicest of those books which his father had so
lavishly bestowed on him.
Having not much indeed to adjust, she was soon
sufficiently settled to turn her thoughts to the
destination
of Lucius. Her affection for him, if different in
kind from that which she felt for her own offspring, was
little short of it in degree. To the interest with which,
as her husband's child, she had at first regarded him,
was added the attachment, and even respect, which a
further developement of his character had induced; and
now that by his father's death he was cast for the
present on her assistance, and was in future to be the
natural protector of her child, he became still dearer.
Determined to fulfil, though at great personal sacrifices,
her husband's wishes, she was hesitating how to
communicate
to him her designs, so as to avoid wounding
his feelings by the suggestion that there could be any
difference of interest between them, when he anticipated
her intentions, and announced his relinquishment of a
liberal education. The period of his entering college
was at hand. She knew how assiduously his father had
promoted his preparation for it, the satisfaction with
which he had himself contemplated it, and she well
understood how to estimate the sacrifice he was now
makingbut in vain she urged him to revoke his
decision
;
she found him immoveable.
`I have now,' said he, `no right to this indulgence.
My obvious duty is to do that which will soonest enable
me to support myself. If I can, therefore, obtain a
situation with some respectable merchant, I will
endeavour
so to imitate my father's integrity and industry
as to deserve success, and I will not fear that I shall
fail of it.'
Mrs Lloyd, having exhausted every argument which
she could present to induce him to abandon his project,
and having no right to control, was compelled to desist
from further opposition.
After some unsuccessful efforts to obtain a proper
place, they heard of a vacancy in a house of the first
respectability; and Mrs Lloyd resolved to prefer her
request in person. Mr Campbell, the junior partner,
received her with respect, but was evidently indisposed
to comply with her wishes. Attempting some awkward
excuses, he at last said; `Why, Madam, I believe it is
best to be frank with you; young Mr Lloyd, I imagine,
is not exactly fitted for our business. He is an only
son; was brought up, I am told, with pretty high
expectations; a little spoiled too, I understandthat, to
be sure, is very naturalthough I am not a father I
can make allowancesout of the countinghouse I mean,
for, once behind the counter, all must conform
somewhat
sickly, too, I have heard.'
Mrs Lloyd, though hurt at the manner in which a boy
was repulsed, who, a few months before, would have
been an object of envy, was wise enough to perceive
that the objections, if real, were sufficient; and that
she had no right to exact of Mr Campbell the trouble
of an experiment. She attempted, however, to convince
him that he was under some misapprehension, but
finding
that she was heard with an incredulous air, she
withdrew. When informed of her failure Lucius colored,
said little, but would by no means relinquish his
determination
;
and an accident, trifling in itself, shortly
effected that which he desired.
Calling, one day, at the shop of the tailor who had
been employed by his father and himself, the man, with
professional assiduity displayed his new goods and new
fashions. Lucius, having completed the business which
brought him there, civilly declined the articles presented,
and was about to leave the shop, when the man,
producing
a piece of broadcloth, exclaimed, `Well, here
is something which you will soon wantif you do not
now,' added he, with a glance at his coat.
`It is very likely that I may,' replied Lucius; `but,
concealing under a smile the effort it cost him to allude
to his fallen fortunes, `you forget, Mr Brown, that I
must now consult something beside my inclination.'
The man was a respectable tradesman, and, from long
knowledge of Mr Lloyd and his son, had acquired
towards
them a familiar manner, which, on this occasion,
was blended with a feeling of real kindness.
`Oh!' answered he, `if you mean that it is not
convenient to you to pay for it now, that need make
no difference between you and me. Your name, Mr
Lloyd, shall be as welcome to a place on my books now
as ever.'
`I am obliged to you,' replied Lucius, `but I am
not rich enough to be in debt. The poor should be
cash customers.'
He was again turning to the door when he heard
himself addressed with, `Keep to your paradox, young
man.' Looking round he perceived a gentleman, who,
occupied in the examination of some cloths at the
extremity of the room, he had not observed at his
entrance.
`Keep to your paradox,' he repeated, `and it will
keep you.'
Instinctively shrinking from such observations on the
part of a stranger, Lucius bowed coldly and left the shop.
The next morning he received a note, requesting him
to call on Messrs Steward and Campbell. On entering
the house he was conducted to a private room, adjoining
that in which the clerks were occupied, and found, to
his surprise, the same gentleman whom he had met the
preceding day.
`Ah!' said he, as Lucius appeared, `I am glad to see
you. After our unceremonious introduction yesterday,
we will to business at once. My partner, Mr Campbell,
declined receiving you when applied to by your mother,
and I should not reverse his decision but for our
accidental
meeting. His opinion was formed on good
grounds; so I think is mine; and as I am the elder of
the two I shall claim the privilege of having my way;
so come here as soon as you please, and it shall be
your own fault if you dislike your place.'
Lucius thankfully availed himself of this permission,
and, in a few days, all preliminaries being settled, he
entered on his vocation.
Although always grave and reflecting beyond his age,
months of sorrow seemed to have conferred on him the
wisdom of years. Surrounded by the elegance, the
respectful attention and assiduous tenderness which had
hitherto marked his life, it would have exceeded the
resolution of a man, still more that of a youth, to resist
the love of ease and the gratification of taste even to
caprice, which indulgence nourishes. Lucius, although
he had never transgressed the bounds of virtue, had led
a life of luxury compared to the one which he was now
to pursue. He had reposed within silken curtains until
gently, and more than once, reminded that he would not
be in time for breakfast. The strictest attention to his
person had been required by his father, and rendered
easy to himself by a cheerful anticipation of his wants
and the most liberal allowance of means. His pleasures,
always pure, were never controlled. His love of
reading
,
which had been fostered in his childhood by his
mother, was rewarded and encouraged by the most
elegant contributions to his library. His taciturnity and
gravity had been subjects of regret to his father, who,
to correct what he deemed defects, required him to
partake
of all his own social pleasures. This, without
rendering him presuming or flippant, had so far qualified
his natural reserve as to result in a tranquillity of
manner
,
at once manly and graceful. Confiding in his son's
rectitude and good sense, and in those smiles of fortune
which have deceived so many, Mr Lloyd never appeared
to apprehend that he might be subjected to a rougher
school. He forgot in the tenderness of a father, that,
without such discipline, his nice sensibilities and amiable
propensities might degenerate into what is but a more
refined description of selfishness.
Adversity, that `stern and rugged nurse,' was now
however to instruct him in her `rigid lore;' and he
evinced a docility, that, to those acquainted with his
early habits, was matter of surprise and admiration.
Never forgetting, but remembering only to refute them,
the insinuations of Mr Campbell, he was the most
assiduous of the clerks, the first and the last in the
countinghouse. It would have been difficult to
recognise
in the youth, who, with a cheek purpled by the
frosts of a winter's dawn, was seen removing the
ponderous
bars of the doors and windows, and then, with
the alert step of a shop-boy, sweeping the store and
kindling the fires, the same, who, a few months before,
might have been observed descending to a late breakfast;
then, surrounded by all `soft appliances,' reviewing his
lessons, taking a loitering walk, or `stretched on the
rack of a too easy chair.'
In one respect, however, the identity was preserved.
His apparel, though less costly, and not of the same
freshness as to material or fashion as formerly, exhibited
VOL. II. 3
the same regard to neatness and propriety, being in
this respect even scrupulously careful, lest, with the
loss of that which is adventitious, he should also lose
what he considered as no unimportant part of the lesser
morals.
Let not the strenuous advocates of the modern
doctrine
that education can do all things, conceive that we
are opposing their dogmas or have a design to subvert
their systems. It is only so far as they are dogmas and
systems contended to be of universal application, that
we oppose to them a fact within our own observation.
We bow as reverently as they to the genius of the age,
which, operating on the ductile minds of the young, has
done so much to dispel prejudice, to instil virtue, and
to increase knowledge, bringing even the high
attainments
of the philosopher within the grasp of the child.
But we must still assert our belief, that there are
original qualities, which, like matter, may be made to
take new forms, but can never be annihilated. Happy
indeed is it that such is the fact! else might we look
in vain to the present and future generations for that
delightful freshness of character which is perceived in
our progenitors.
Mr Steward, pleased not to have been deceived in
the hasty opinion he had formed, distinguished Lucius
by his kindness; and Mr Campbell, after a proper time
of trial to establish the reputation of his own caution,
relinquished entirely his apprehensions. The knowledge
of the French language, then not so common an
accomplishment
as now, gave Lucius an advantage; and
studiously improving every means by which he could
render himself acceptable as well as useful, he daily
increased in the good will of the whole establishment.
Grateful for relief from some portion of her anxieties,
Mrs Lloyd turned with a feeling of repose to her little
girl, her present solace, her future hope; nor was she
less a source of enjoyment to Lucius. Like him, she
was a striking resemblance of their father, a
circumstance
which seemed more closely to unite them; and,
while he tenderly regarded her as all that now remained
to him of their common parent, his smile was her best
reward.
Her attachment to him was mingled, even at this
early period, with that fear which respect inspires.
In all her petty transgressions, her first petition was,
`Oh! do not tell brother!' During the week their
intercourse was limited to the time expended on a hasty
meal. When Sunday morning came, which was to
procure them his company for a whole day, the joyful
expectation, or fearful foreboding, expressed in her
countenance, was the certain indication of the testimony
given by her internal monitor. If no self-reproaches
withheld her, she would run to meet him, spring into
his lap, and twisting his curls around her slender fingers,
would beg him to tell her `stories of papa,' the frequent
theme of their discourse. But if, on the contrary, at
his entrance, she remained immoveable in her little
chair, uneasily pinching the hem of her apron, or
impatiently
correcting her doll, on whom she generally
inflicted the punishment due to her own offences, he
knew all was not right within. On such occasions he
would win her to him, contrive to render herself the
informer, and, having thus obtained her confidence, and
assured of her contrition, the post of honor and
happiness
was again occupied, and the Sunday stories of
brother Lucius nourished the germs of virtue which
were already expanding in her little heart.
Once, however, she successfully parried the
admonition
she was conscious of deserving. The portion of
scripture which had been a part of their morning service,
was the third chapter of Genesis. Frances, though she
did not appear to listen with any great attention, had,
during the day, puzzled her mother not a little with her
polemics, and had also, by some delinquency, proved
herself a lineal descendant of the first unfortunate pair.
As she heard her brother's rap she glided behind a
cabinet which had been converted into a baby-house,
and remained snugly concealed, until Lucius's eye,
wandering round the room in quest of her, detected
her covert.
`Ah! you rogue!' said he, `are you playing bo-peep
with me?'
Spreading her little hands before her face and looking
between her fingers, she replied, with a smile which
betrayed her artifice, `I have been naughty, brother,
and I strove to hide myself like Adam and Eve.'
`Lucius,' said his mother one day, `where is your
watch? no accident has befallen it, I hope.'
He hesitated a moment, and then replied, `None,
mamma, that I am afraid to ownI have sold it.'
`How could you do so?' she exclaimed, in a
reproachful
tone, `it was the gift of your father.'
`So is everything I have; but I trust he gave me
some things more valuable than any ornament, however
costly.'
`But this, to you, was more for use than ornament;
you must feel the want of it continually. What can
have induced you to part with it? You know, Lucius,
that my purse is always open to you, and if not as full
as my heart, it is just as much yours.'
`You are very kind, my dear mother. I have never
doubted your generosity; but I had an occasion for
money with which I did not think proper to burden you.
I should not mention it, even now, but to explain what
might otherwise give you uneasiness. Poor Willet has
been in great distress. Her husband is dead, and all
she had was on the point of being seized to discharge
his debts. She had been the servant of my family, was
poor, and a stranger. I do not know that I did what
was prudent, but I could not see her suffer while I had
the means of relieving her.'
`I will not diminish the satisfaction which you must
feel in an act of as much generosity as duty, by any
cold strictures on prudence; but why not let me divide
with you the pleasure and the sacrifice?'
`Because on you she had no claim whatever; while
the mistaken manner in which she evinced her fondness
for me, does not release me from my obligations; besides
which, I am more than compensated by the result. The
debts are in part paid, she is still in possession of the
shop, and-will conduct it far better than her husband,
whose mismanagement caused their embarrassments.'
The decided manner of Lucius when satisfied that he
was right, precluded all argument or entreaty. His
mother therefore suffered the subject to drop, but it sank
into her heart, and she determined, in some way, to
more than supply to him that of which he had thus
deprived himself.
By little devices of economy and self-denial, which,
subjected to the glow of woman's affection, seem, by a
sort of alchymy, to create gold, she at length amassed a
sum, sufficient as she hoped, to accomplish her design.
When she added the last mite, `There,' cried she,
`that drop has just filled my cup of joy! and now I have
a sort of secret assurance that this gift of love will be
a talisman to my boy!'
A fortunate circumstance enabled her to associate it
with a new instance of his virtuous self-denial.
Mrs Lloyd had observed that Lucius was sometimes
spiritless, not so much from the condition in which he
3*
found himself, as from the exhaustion consequent on the
nature of his employment. Fearing the effect on such
a character, of an entire renunciation of amusement,
she urged his acceptance from her of the necessary
means to obtain occasional recreation; but he always
refused to avail himself of her liberality. Theatrical
entertainments, at that period, were comparatively rare
in our country, and, in most of the cities, a few weeks
comprehended the season of their exhibition. At such
times, every one sought a gratification, the value of
which, while it was heightened by its rarity, was for that
reason free from the apprehension of those evils
attendant
on such amusements where they have obtained a
permanent establishment.
Mrs Lloyd again and again pressed Lucius to accept
a ticket, but without success. One day, however, he
said with a cheerful face, `Now, mamma, if you have
the same generous intentions as heretofore, Mr Steward
has granted me a leisure evening, and I will go to the
theatre.'
Mrs Lloyd immediately offered her purse, but,
withdrawing
it a moment, said, `On one condition, however
why have you hitherto so pertinaciously refused to gratify
me in this respect?'
`Rather than relinquish my pleasure, then, I must
comply with yours,' replied he, smiling. `The truth is,
I feared to trust myself. I have, therefore, purposely
waited for the last night of performance; and now,
however pleased, I cannot be tempted, you know, to
farther indulgence.'
After an evening of the greater enjoyment because it
was relaxation from labor, Lucius returned to discuss it
with his mother. A late hour found them still sitting
over what she called her `widow's fire.'
`Lucius, Lucius, go to bed,' she at length exclaimed,
`I shall have as much trouble as formerly to rouse you
betimes to-morrow.'
`Not so, mother; I can wake with the lark now.'
But, spite of his boasted improvement, he would have
required a jog, had there not fallen on his drowsy sense
a sound, which, mingling with his visions, caused him
to start from his pillow, almost expecting to behold the
execution of the Venetian conspiratorshis dream taking
its color from the evening's occupationwhose last hour
he seemed just to have heard proclaimed.
`I could have sworn,' cried he, `that I heard the
bell of St Mark's. It sounded at my very ear,' he
continued, mechanically raising his pillow, and by so
doing disclosing a beautiful gold repeater, from which
had issued the alarm.
`My father's watch! by what wonder is it here!'
Taking it up to press it to his lips, while his eyes filled
at the associations connected with it, his attention was
caught by a paper attached to the chain, upon opening
which, he found the solution of the mystery in the
following lines;
Go, beautiful product of taste and of skill!
The wish of a mother, go, now fulfil;
The faithful recorder of days and years,
Unbribed by wishes, unmoved by tears!
All time is comprised in your magic round,
For the past is recalled at your simple sound.
Oh! ne'er may your index be basely misused,
And indicate time, but to mark it abused!
Still, still, be the circle you ceaselessly trace,
The measure of actions which worth shall grace;
And while the winged hours you tell as they part,
The thought of a father keep fresh in the heart.
May it tenderly mingle in moments that bless,
Young joys not to shade, but to check their excess.
Still more when in exile, in sorrow, or pain,
May it come as a charm on your time-telling strain;
But oh! should temptation its spell cast round,
As the voice of a Mentor be then your sound;
And heard by that sense which no passion can cheat,
The hopes and the fears of a mother repeat!
A gush of tender, holy feeling attested how deeply
the kindness and generosity of his mother affected him.
Devoutly acknowledging that Supreme Goodness by
which he was still made to experience a parent's love, he
implored that he might be her comfort and her reward.
On his return to breakfast he met Mrs Lloyd. After
expressing to her his gratitude, `You have,' said he,
`contrived for me a most eloquent monitor; and as it
has saved me a reprimand this morning, I augur well of
its counsel for the future.'
`Dear Lucius!' replied she, `you have been so good,
so self-denied, that I am almost ashamed to lift up a
warning voice to you; butyou are human, you are
eighteen, and I ama mother!'
Lucius had never desired many friends; not that he
was unsocial, but exclusive. His affections had
expanded
with warmth and vivacity within a small circle, which
the change in his condition had induced him still more to
contract. Among his former companions was Frederick
Whitby, the son of his father's heartless relative.
Frederick was older than Lucius, but the maturity of
the latter had placed them on an equality. His good
nature, a sort of careless pleasantry, and an easy manner
which imposed neither effort nor restraint on his
entertainer
,
made his visits agreeable; and, although they
were as unlike as possible, the diversity seemed rather
to amuse than to repel Lucius. After the overthrow of
his fortune, in which Mr Whitby had played so base a
part, they had never met, until, one day, Frederick
entered the countinghouse, and, directing his steps to a
remote desk where Lucius was employed, he said, with
some embarrassment, but endeavouring to conceal it
under an affected ease, `Mr Lloydno, I will rather
say Lucius, if you will allow meI cannot any longer
endure the interruption of our intercourse. I know that
your mother and my father have had some difficulties,
but what have we to do with that? We ought not to
forget on that account that we are old friends and
cousins. Come, let's shake hands, and agree to think
no more of what's disagreeable.'
Lucius did not reject the proffered hand. The
remembrance
of former days was both sweet and painful;
and he uttered, in a gentle tone, words, which, he felt,
would sound harshly in return to Frederick's greeting.
`I entertain no resentment towards you personally,
Mr Whitby; but I cannot talk lightly of the
circumstances
which have separated us, and I will not trust
myself to speak seriously of them. It is however
impossible
that we should be other than strangers.'
`Now that's what I call confoundedly unreasonable,'
replied Whitby, `and if I did not like you even more
than I supposed, hang me! if I'd ever say another
word to you; but some how or another, Lucius, your
stately ways and lofty looks, always made me love you
the better, and I cannot give you up yet. Be
good-natured
then, and come to see me. You need not meet
my father unless you choose. You can slip
unobserved
into my room, and, when once I have you there, I
know we shall be as good friends as ever in half an
hour.'
At the bare suggestion of seeking an `unobserved'
entrance into a house, the threshold of which no
consideration
would have induced him to cross, the feeling
which flowed at the sight of an old companion was
chilled
at once. Coldly withdrawing himself, with the air
of one who desired no further conversation, and saying,
`You must excuse me, Sir, I am engaged,' Lucius
pursued
again his occupation. Whitby bit his lips, played
with his cane, and casting a glance around to see if his
repulse had been observed, he left the house.
It had not been perceived except by Mr Steward.
He had been Mrs Lloyd's agent in negotiating with the
avaricious Whitby the redemption of the watch, and
had on that occasion seen Frederick, whom, however,
he remarked that his father dismissed from the room
before he opened his business. His air of fashion
caught Mr Steward's eye as he entered the store, and
he watched with some interest the reception which
Lucius
should give him. When the interview terminated,
`Ay,' thought he, `he is true metal; he rings well to
the counter;' and, approaching him, he said,
`You have done right. I am not one of those who
would fan old feuds, but you've done right. You ought,
to be sure,' added he cautiously, `to forgive them; but
could you accept their friendship, you would deserve no
other. Besides, no blessing can rest in that house.
The old man may keep his illgotten wealth, but it will
blister his hands; and his children will fall heirs to the
curse which cleaves to it. The wise man saith, The
treasures of wickedness profit nothing; and, as
Whitby
has been trading on that capital only, he must have
a poor head indeed, who cannot see that bankruptcy and
perdition must, sooner or later, close that concern.'
Lucius was not one of those whom `Time stands still
withal;' but, though it did not always proceed so
smoothly that by no jolt or jar its motion could be
perceived
,
still, the diligent hand and the willing mind gave
both ease and spirit to its movement.
The period of his clerkship had recently expired,
when the gentlemen testified their confidence in his
integrity
and ability, by a proposal that he should go as
supercargo in a vessel which they were fitting out for
St Domingo. The cessation of the troubles in that
island, and the cordial invitation which the Americans,
particularly, had received from its inhabitants, induced
many to adventure in its reviving trade. Lucius,
although
he saw many advantages resulting to himself from
the acceptance of such an offer, yet, aware of his
importance
to his mother, referred the decision to her with
more than usual deference. Her heart fainted within
her at the thought of the dangers which appeared to
attend the enterprise in a country just emerging from
the horrors of a sanguinary revolution, and in a climate
which too faithfully avenged on European constitutions,
the wrongs of the poor Aborigines and Africans.
Overcome
,
however, at length, by the representations of Mr
Steward, she yielded, and Lucius prepared for his
departure
,
with the alacrity and fearlessness of youth.
After a prosperous voyage the beautiful island
appeared
,
which Columbus, in the delight and pride of
discovery, believed had revealed to him the blissful seat
of Paradise. As Lucius entered the harbor of Cape
Franais, he wondered not at the illusion of the
navigator
.
To the east extended the magnificent plain,
formerly
appropriated to the cultivation of cane; the
plantations
divided only by hedges of citron and lime trees,
and equal in fertility to any spot on the earth. It was
again putting on its garments of beauty, presenting a
prospect of wealth, not, as then, to be all poured into
the lap of a master, but to be shared by him in the
proportion
established by law, with the free and voluntary
laborer. Behind the city rose the eminence of Le
Morne du Cap, affording a fine relief to the city
gathered
at its base, and, to the eye of the voyager, sated
with the illimitable ocean, presenting an object on which
it loved to rest. The most luxuriant vegetation burst
forth on every side, seeming to invite to the abode of
abundance, peace, and happiness. Lucius could
scarcely
realize that human passions had so recently
transformed
this Eden into the scene of `woe unutterable.'
As he entered the city, however, he but too plainly
perceived
their traces in the mementos of the
conflagration
of '93, set by the hand of the ruthless Macaya,
when the French commissioners themselves were
forced
to flee from the fires their own invitations had served
to kindle. This once superb city was now but a splendid
ruin; `as if,' says a writer, `the blacks were reluctant
to rebuild the mansions of their fallen masters lest they
should create for themselves new oppressors.'
But amidst the wrecks of the late storm and the
interruption
of the arts of peace, under the auspices of
the new order of things, prosperity was returning. The
government of Toussaint L'Ouverture was daily
attaining
a more effective operation. Anxious to repair,
as soon as possible, the devastation and loss occasioned
by the revolutionary state in which the island had been
since 1790, he invited the return of the planters, to
whom he even restored their estates, but no property in
human flesh. The city was beginning to lift itself from
the dust. Alas! again to be enveloped in flames,
again to be the scene of guilt and suffering, again to
attest the righteous judgment of heaven, which
condemned
the French, in the extremity of famine, to eat the
blood hounds they had trained to devour the negroes
again to be deluged with blood till the streams ran red,
and the blessed air was corrupted by human putrefaction!
Lucius repaired to the Htel de la Rpublique, where
he found a respectable and commodious establishment;
and, although he felt strangely at beholding himself
placed at once on a level with the
sang meles
by whom
he was surrounded, his revoltings were soon overcome
by the cordial politeness with which he was greeted.
The next day he entered on his business, and was
more and more surprised by the intelligence already
apparent in the emancipated islands. Coming from a
country, which, by a strange anomaly, was at once the
boast of freemen, and the prison-house of slaves, which,
though it had loudly asserted the rights of man, yet had
not relaxed its gripe on the unfortunate African, Lucius
had beheld him only in a state of subjection and
debasement
,
and had not rightly estimated those capacities,
which a better state of things was elsewhere
developing
.
Numbers of
gens de couleur
had received an
education
in France, and this, operating, in conjunction
with the ennobling feeling of independence, on the
naturally
kind temper of the negroes, spread a humanizing
influence through all classes. In addition to this, came
their instinctive love of dress and gentility, a passion,
which, however justly it may be inveighed against in its
excess, is, nevertheless, a powerful agent in the refining
process of civilization. There were, it must be
admitted
,
some incongruities. The exquisite finish of society
is not so soon effected as a revolution. The pillar
which is to commemorate a nation's glory is soon
separated
from the quarry; but it is a work of time to give
its proportions and its polish.
Lucius, occupied with the responsibilities of his new
situation, and pleased with the novelties around him,
forgot that death could lurk amidst flowers, and fruits,
and beauty. It was after a day of great heat and
considerable
fatigue, that he was constrained to admit to
himself that he was far from well. Believing that a
night's rest would restore him, he parted without
apprehension
VOL. II. 4
from the gentleman with whom he had been
engaged
in business, and directed his course homewards.
His head ached violently, and an admonitory chill
induced
him to quicken his pace. His steps soon became
unsteady, faintness came over him, and, catching hold
of a railing for support, he sunk in a few moments,
overpowered, to the ground. His last consciousness
was that of heat and weariness, pain, sickness, and
darkness, without friend or mother. Mingled with
these came dreams of strange faces, unknown voices,
consuming fever; a perpetual and fearful
phantasmagoria
seemed to glide before him. When he revived he
found himself in an apartment where taste and humanity
appeared to have been emulous to contribute to his
comfort. Every refinement of decoration was
combined
with the nicest attention to the feelings of an invalid,
a refreshing shade was spread over the room, a delicious
fragrance perfumed the air, and a voice in the sweetest
accents exclaimed `
Dieu merci
.' It was a scene of
enchantment
.
He put his hand to his head and tried to
think. He could remember nothing but that he had
been miserable, and he now knew only that he was
happy. Making an effort to rise that he might obtain a
more extended view of the room, he first became
sensible
of his weakness, and fell powerless on the bed; at
the same moment, a female, who, till then, seemed to
have concealed herself purposely, darted forward to aid
him. He gazed at her in amazement, and it was some
minutes before he could sufficiently command himself
to beg of her an explanation.
She replied to him in good English, though with a
French accent, entreating him in the gentlest manner
not to fatigue himself by any inquiries. Finding him
importunat, she playfully placed her fingers on her lip,
and retreated again to where his eye could not follow
her. Left, perforce, to silence, Lucius had no resource
but obedience; and resigned himself to the sweet
sensations
which seemed to be breathed like a new existence
into his frame.
In a short time a slight movement was heard, and a
conversation in a suppressed voice, of which he caught
enough to know that it was French and that he was
himself the subject of it. A gentleman of a pleasing
appearance now advanced to his bed. Lucius looked
at him with that feeling of uncertainty with which we
contemplate objects when suddenly awaked from
profound
repose.
`Do I dream?' exclaimed he`I surely know that
face.'
`It is no illusion, my young friend,' replied the
stranger, `and, as I think the perplexity in which you
are, may be more injurious to you than a brief
conversation
,
I will tell you, in a few words, why you are here.
You may have forgotten, but Charles de Breuil never
will, the kindness and generosity received from your
father, when the horrible events in this country
compelled
him to seek an asylum in the United States.'
Lucius, delighted to find himself under the roof of a
man, whom he well remembered as one of the most
unfortunate and interesting of the unhappy refugees to
whom his father's house and purse had been open,
pressed his hand in token of cordial recognition.
`You may imagine,' continued M. de Breuil, `with
what emotions I found myself in a situation to make any
return; but let me go back to that moment. I was
returning to my house in the evening, when, just as I
gained my own door, I nearly fell over a prostrate
figure. I called for lights, and beheld a stranger, and,
as I believed, an American. Could there be a stronger
claim on my benevolence! Fearing that he was wounded
we raised him, but no injury appeared. That he was
seized with the fever of the country was the next
apprehension
;
but this to a native is not formidable, and only
stimulated me to ascertain who he was, that he might be
conveyed to his friends. We searched for his papers;
and I soon found that Heaven had directed him to the
very man who was most bound to receive and shelter him.
What therefore in another, would have been an act of
mercy, in me became a duty. The fever, though it
did not prove to be a malignant one, was attended with
considerable delirium. It has now formed a favorable
crisis; but quiet and good nursing are still necessary.'
`Do not speak,' continued he, seeing Lucius
attempting
some expression of his feelings, `do not speak;
now that I have relieved your curiosity, you will find
me an arbitrary nurse.'
`You are then my nurse?' said Lucius, casting at
the same time an inquiring glance round the room.
`My daughter has hitherto shared that office with
me; but now, that you have recovered your senses,'
replied M. de Breuil, laughing, `she will probably be
afraid of you, and consign you entirely to me. But
hushnot another word from either of us.'
His recovery was rapid; and in a short time Lucius
was well enough, as he thought, to be removed to his
lodgings. When he signified this intention, it was
received
with such demonstrations of regret and
dissatisfaction
,
that he was compelled to relinquish it, M. de
Breuil at the same time expressing his happiness, that,
as, in consequence of some unlooked for obstructions in
the disposal of his cargo, he could not soon return, he
would therefore remain his guest longer than he had at
first dared to expect. The only escape from his custody
which he would permit, was to allow him to join the
family circle.
`Here,' said he, as he conducted him, `here is our
patient, Elise, so restive I can no longer manage him;
will you sign his discharge?'
As he spoke a young lady advanced, and gracefully
received the salutation of Lucius.
`Perhaps,' said she, `his head is not yet quite right.
I shall be very cautious how I commit myself by a
hasty opinion.'
`You will at least, Madam,' replied Lucius, `give
my case a fair examination before you remand me to
my hospital.'
He had now an opportunity of observing more
accurately
the lady to whom he was introduced, than when,
like a vision, she had recently flitted around his bed.
From the commencement of his returning consciousness
he had not seen her, and he was not sorry to find
confirmed
the faint recollections of that moment, which
represented her as young and handsome.
Her figure was rather above the middle height, finely
proportioned, and rounded to that precise degree of
embonpoint
, in which neither want nor excess can be
remarked. Her simple white dress was confined by a
rich girdle that defined her beautiful waist, and bracelets
of the same description terminated the sleeves. A shawl
of mingled saffron and crimson enveloped her head in
a turban of a tiara form, ornamented in front with a
gem which might elsewhere have been admired, but of
which the brilliancy, in the present instance, was lost in
the rays of the finest black eyes that ever sparkled.
A mouth, arrayed in smiles, disclosed the whitest teeth
imaginable. An air of softness and kindness overspread
her countenance, and a graceful languor was perceived
in her movementsbutthe truth must be told, though
Lucius was as unwilling to admit it, as we presume our
young readers will be to learn itElise, poor Elise! was
4*
of the
sang-mele
orderher complexion, though rich
and clear, was a thought too dark!
Lucius, though by no means such a philosopher as
to be indifferent on this subject, was too grateful and
too self-possessed to betray the momentary repugnance
this discovery excited; and after a conversation, in
which she was all kindness and frankness, and he truly
touched by the benevolent politeness with which he was
treated, they were perfectly good friends. Under other
circumstances it would indeed have required many a
weary day to have placed them on the same footing;
but the melting tones of woman's voice, giving utterance
to words of sympathy, fall so irresistibly sweet on the
susceptible nerves of a convalescent!
Another member of the family was next presented.
M. Deverin, a
protg
of M. de Breuil, apparently five
or six years older than Lucius, handsome, gay, and
courteous. A short acquaintance, however, served to
show, that his politeness was the result of the
obsequiousness
,
which, in small minds, is the usual concomitant of
dependence. Lucius, therefore, who had secured the
good will of those who might promote his success, not
by servility, but by rendering himself useful, returned
the advances of Deverin, only so far as appeared
indispensable
.
This, by a sort of necessity, led him still
more to the society of Elise, and while he referred their
intercourse to causes so likely to produce it, he forgot
to take into the account that she was young, attractive,
and intelligent.
More fortunate than the woman of her country, her
fine natural powers had not been neglected. The early
death of her mother rendered her the object of more
than common tenderness, and subsequent events,
distressing
in themselves, had nevertheless contributed
greatly to her advantage. The beauty and vivacity of
the little Elise had attracted the attention of a
benevolent
and accomplished English lady, a resident at the
Cape; and when, in consequence of the revolution, she
was compelled to remove to Jamaica, she begged to
take her young favorite with her. M. de Breuil,
uncertain
what might be his own destiny, consented. At
length, after many wanderings, returned to the
enjoyment
of his estate, he had reclaimed his child, had
placed her at the head of his establishment, and,
considering
the prejudices of color removed, indulged for her
expectations natural to an affectionate parent. These
expectations were confirmed by his experience of the
cultivation her rich capacities had received from her
benefactress, who, having no children, had felt for Elise
a sentiment nearly maternal, and had found, in the
dispositions
and talents of her pupil, a full reward of her
generous efforts.
Elise appeared a compound of opposites. From the
influence of climate often languid and indolent, she was
yet capable of an energy of action, a dignity of sentiment
and expression by which she seemed to rise superior to
the disadvantages of her birth. Though from original
constitution gentle and confiding, yet a momentary
impatience
would occasionally disturb the wonted propriety
of her deportment. Keenly susceptible of sorrow, she
could nevertheless be excited to an excess of gaiety;
and would indulge in a simple love of the ludicrous, for
which her frolic spirit would find aliment in anything.
Even the peculiarities of a race, of her affinity to which
she seemed unconscious, or proudly regardless, not
unfrequently
exercised her mimetic powers. Sometimes
thrumming on the table with her flexible and taper
fingers, in imitation of the
yoombay
, the rustic drum of
the Jamaica slaves, she accompanied it with rude
stanzas
in their uncouth but expressive phraseology. At
others, in order to represent to Lucius the festivities of
a negro Christmas, she presided over the masquerade
of
Moco-Jumbo
, in which Ta Imaco, an old African who
preferred dependence on M. de Breuil to the honors and
uncertain support of freedom, would submit himself to
her mirthful direction. Mounted, at the peril of his
neck, on stilts which she had mischievously ordered of
a gigantic height, he would shake his bells as merrily,
if not as gracefully, as a Morris dancer; and a liberal
reward from Elise well compensated the danger and
the exertion.
Lucius had been some weeks at Cape Franaise
when the expected arrival of General Toussaint, on his
return from a tour through the island, created
considerable
sensation. His route had been attended by the
most flattering expressions of public respect, and the
inhabitants of that city were desirous of testifying, in
their turn, their regard for the negro chief.
A procession of all classes received him at his
entrance
,
conducted him to the temple erected in honor of
emancipation, where he entered amidst the acclamations
of the multitude. Lucius had mingled, at a distance, in
the crowd, but desirous of a nearer view of a man so
celebrated, repaired, for that purpose, to the Htel de
la Rpublique, where a splendid collation was prepared.
Here he saw him, refusing all distinctions, reject the
seat of honor, and take one which placed him on an
equality with others at the table; and more than once
observed him lean forward with an air of the kindest
attention, to persons evidently much his inferiors. His
countenance, so fearful to his enemies was mild and
courteous. His eye indicated reflection as well as
spirit; and his form, which his close dress of blue and
scarlet exhibited to advantage, was vigorous and well
proportioned.
Of this man we must not judge from the
representations
of the English, who regarded him as the savage
opposer of their views; nor from those of the French,
who found in him a fidelity to the cause of his
countrymen
,
which, instead of obtaining the cooperation of
those professed friends of liberty, only made him the
mark of their hatred. We must take him, like every
human being, with allowances for infirmity and
imperious
circumstances; and judging him by actions
sufficiently
well attested, endeavour to form of him an
impartial estimate.
Reluctant to rebel, he permitted the revolt of '91
to pass without taking part in it. When no longer
allowed to remain neuter, his first care was to provide
for the flight and safety of his master, and to furnish
him resources upon which to subsist in a foreign country.
When solicited to betray the confidence of the English
general, who had committed his person to his honor, he
indignantly refused. When he had detected a plot
against himself, instead of inflicting on the conspirators
the death they expected, he caused them to be
conducted
into a church, and, at that part of the service
which enjoins the forgiveness of enemies, he declared
to them their pardon. When the negroes revolted for
the purpose of fresh massacres of the whites, he spared
not his own nephew; and, finally, even the strong
yearnings of parental affection were insufficient to
induce
him to betray the cause of freedom to the artful
suggestions of the French agents.
This is not the conduct of a bloodthirsty wretch as
he is reputed by some, or the cold hearted hypocrite
as he is called by others. However motives of policy
may have occasionally mingled with his forbearance
or softened his manners, we cannot refuse praise to
actions, any one of which would be deemed an
extenuation
of the crimes of men, who, with moral and
intellectual
advantages far exceeding his, had no part of his
provocation.
While some of these thoughts were passing through
the mind of Lucius, the repast ended, and military music
called the multitude to the parade ground, occupying a
portion of the beautiful plain of the Cape. Lucius
followed with the rest, and soon found that the etiquette
and distinction, which Toussaint appeared elsewhere to
contemn, were here an object worthy all his attention.
The most perfect subordination and the strictest regard
to rank prevailed, and the quickness, dexterity, and good
order of their movements astonished him. The review
over, Toussaint departed for his country-seat, and
Lucius
was bending his course homewards when Deverin
overtook him, and, taking his arm, said; `Well, Mr
Lloyd, what think you of our negro general?'
`If you mean his appearance,' replied Lucius, `it is
certainly soldier-like and imposing; but if, as I suppose,
you refer to his character, I am a little puzzled with the
contradictory opinions expressed of it. While some
hail him as a deliverer, others seem disposed to denounce
him as a tyrant. While some assert that he has never
broken his word, others, with equal warmth, aver that
he has never kept it.'
`For my part,' rejoined Deverin, `I think it safest
to observe the peace with the powers that be, and had
no intention to touch on what might prove such
dangerous
ground as the subject of his merits. Between
ourselves, however, I will venture to say, that he who
governs the multitude, like him who leads the blind, in
the words of the Spanish proverb,
Un punto ha de saber
mas que el diablo
. My inquiry though, was directed,
in all simplicity, to the impression which his appearance
made upon youin short,' continued he, with a
significant
curl of his lip, `is he not too much of a
ngre
for
your taste?'
`Really,' replied Lucius, `such important interests
are at stake, on the issue of the prssent state of things
among you, that I have not permitted myself to consider
it as a question of taste.'
`You have then, I see, made some progress in the
system of fraternizing; and you would not, perhaps,
object to a pretty woman for such a trifle as a few drops
of black blood?'
`I should undoubtedly regret it,' replied Lucius with
a smile, `notwithstanding the philosophy ascribed to me.'
`Oh! that is but a mild form of objection, such as I
imagine our host's
fair
daughter might easily overcome.
Now, seriously, do you not suppose that you might be
induced to wave so slight an inconvenience in favor of
a marriage with such a lady?'
He spoke with such an uneasy importunity of
manner
,
that Lucius, surprised, turned towards him, and
for the pleasure of teazing a rising feeling of rivalry,
which, for the first time, he suspected, replied drily,
`Indeed, Monsieur Deverin, I cannot so far commit
myself as to make a confidant on that subject.'
Deverin bit his lip, made an apologetic bow, and the
conversation turned on other subjects until they reached
M. de Breuil's door. As they entered the parlour, Elise
was playing on her guitar, but her hand rested on the
strings, and she looked smilingly over her shoulder at
Lucius as he approached; when, seeing that Deverin
followed, a cloud of disappointment settled on her
truth-telling
face, and running her fingers impatiently over
the instrument, she again appeared absorbed in it.
Not a word was spoken; but Deverin, at no loss to
interpret the action, became moody and abstracted,
while Lucius listened with a pleased and interested air,
simply because he loved music.
A few evenings subsequently, as he was engaged in
a game of piquet with M. de Breuil, of which Elise was
watching the progress and keeping the account, he was
requested to speak in private with a person, who refused
to communicate his business to any but himself. Going
to the door, he found there a boy, who, presenting a
note, awaited in silence his answer. The paper
contained
these few lines, written in a hand scarcely legible;
`If your character is not entirely changed, you will
not refuse to follow the bearer, to the relief of a
distressed
countryman. The strictest secrecy is expected
from your delicacy and discretion.'
Lucius could not resist such an appeal. He returned
therefore to the parlour to apologize to M. de Breuil for
thus abruptly relinquishing his game. The
consciousness
of the secrecy enjoined, gave an air of constraint
to his manner which caused a circumstance unimportant
in itself to be remarked; and Deverin, on Lucius
requesting
him to supply his place, exclaimed in such a
tone as to excite farther attention, `I hope nothing has
occurred, Mr Lloyd, to give you uneasiness?' Making
some reply evidently evasive, Lucius left the room.
He followed the boy through many devious ways
until they arrived at a spacious house, amid ruin and
desolation, which might once have been the abode of
wealthier inhabitants than its present appearance
indicated
it now to be. He was conducted by a private
entrance, and with an appearance of much
circumspection
,
to a chamber in which he distinguished by an
imperfect
light, an old woman, and in an obscure corner
which the feeble lamp but partially illuminated, a bed,
pointing to which the boy said, `There is the
gentleman
.'
Lucius approached gently, and not without a vague
apprehension stealing over himbut every feeling was
lost in surprise and concern when he recognised in the
words, `I have not then been mistaken in you,' the voice
of Frederick Whitby! He had seen or heard but little
of this young man since their abrupt parting on the
occasion
already mentioned.
`Do not be afraid of me,' said he, as Lucius started
back in astonishment, `I have no infectious disease; if
I had, I hope I should not have been so selfish as to
expose you to it. Sit down by me, and let me, as well
as I am able, tell you my story.'
The attendants at a sign withdrew, and Frederick,
whom weakness and hesitation rendered a prolix
narrator
,
gave an account which in substance was as
follows
His extravagance had found small toleration with an
avaricious and niggardly father. Reproach had been
succeeded by abuse, and, parting in mutual disgust, he
had determined to seek his fortune abroad. Accident
led him to St Domingo. There, as he had been trained
for merchandise, he had obtained the employment of a
clerk. A facility in adapting himself to new situations
had, for a time, enabled him to satisfy his employer;
but his propensities to pleasure again overcame him,
his master was displeased, and he was dismissed.
Impelled
with an accelerated velocity to his ruin, he had
associated himself with a set of vicious young men to
whom his convivial qualities had first attracted him.
Having contracted debts without any ability to repay
them, he found, when too late, that they scrupled not to
sustain themselves by every species of fraud. He
protested
again and again that he had not, himself,
practised
any direct dishonesty; but it was too evident that,
hopeless of other support, he had, if not by his actual
cooperations, at least, by his tacit compliance, abetted
their villanies. At length in a quarrel, brought on in
VOL. II. 5
a fit of intoxication, he had by a violent contest
ruptured
a blood-vessel, and was now fast approaching the
termination
of his life and his follies.
Nor was this all. There was a fearful account to be
adjusted. The miserable man with whom his rencontre
took place, had died of an injury received in the
struggle
.
Though Whitby averred, with every appearance
of truth, that he had no consciousness of the act and
did not believe that his hand inflicted the blow, he well
knew, that in a country where justice was administered
according to the summary proceedings of military law,
a nice discrimination of degrees in guilt was not to be
expected. Concealment, therefore, was his only refuge
until able to escape from the island; but exhausted in
strength, and utterly destitute, he saw no way of
effecting
this. At length, overcoming his lingering sense of
shame, he cast himself on the compassion of his former
friend.
The heart of Lucius sickened at this accumulation
of woesdisgrace, sickness, and approaching death!
As he gazed on the once handsome, happy face of his
youthful companion, now reduced to almost the last
degree
of emaciation, his cheek no longer colored but
with fever or shame, his feeble limbs nerved only by the
agony of his spirit, he doubted for a moment his identity.
`Do not look at me so, Lucius!' exclaimed the
unfortunate
young man, in a tone of mingled impatience
and sadness; `Do not look at me so! I thought you
would comfort me.'
`Comfort you!' thought Lucius, but exerting
himself
to speak; `and so I will to the extent of my ability,'
he replied; `tomorrow I will return with a physician,
and'
`A physician! would you expose me to certain
detection
?'
Lucius, to whom it was evident that his disorder was
past the power of medicine, and who had only suggested
it as generally acceptable to the sick, replied in a
soothing
tone, `Then, by the promise of reward we will
secure
the best services of your attendants. There may,
too, be mitigations of your sufferings, as effectual as any
that a physician could prescribe, and whatever you wish
shall be obtained.'
`Am I then to die in the hands of these ignorant
wretches?' interrupted the poor creature, alternately
the prey of his dread of detection, and his horror of
death; and it was evident to his compassionate friend,
that amidst the stings of an accusing conscience, and
the irritability of disease, there was little left of the
once imperturbable good nature of Frederick.
But the humanity of Lucius was not of a kind to be
easily disgusted. Considering the unfortunate being as
dependent solely on his mercy, recollecting how lately
he had himself experienced the blessedness of human
sympathy, and actuated too by a noble desire to return
good to a quarter whence he had received so much evil,
he did not dwell on vice as an excuse for `withholding
himself from the good he found it in his hand to do.'
Patiently sitting by the bed, on which the miserable
Frederick tossed from side to side his attenuated limbs,
as if he would thus combat the accusing spirit within,
Lucius endeavoured by gentle assiduities, to which his
friend had been long a stranger, to sooth his feverish
impatience.
`You are very good,' at last said Frederick, `very
good indeedtoo good!' added he, emphatically`to
such a wretch! Oh! Lucius who would have thought
that I should come to this!' and wringing his hands in
the very extremity and hopelessness of his misery, he
burst into tears. They were the first he had shed; and
though Lucius could not restrain his own at the sight,
he rejoiced in the natural and salutary relief they
afforded
to the intensity of his agony.
Having in some degree effected his benevolent
purpose
,
promising to see him as often and as secretly as
possible, and recommending him to the humanity of his
attendants, Lucius at length left him. When he
returned
home the traces of a scene so painful were yet
visible
on his countenance, and though his friends politely
forebore any inquiries, their looks indicated some
curiosity
.
At first the situation in which he was placed by the
affairs of Whitby gave Lucius no concern; but he soon
found that his private communications from him, the
mystery attending his visits to him, generally paid in
the evening, extending to a late hour, and sometimes at
the urgent importunity of the poor wretch, who hung
imploringly on the face of his only friend, occupying
nearly the whole night, subjected him to an inquisitorial
observation which was embarrassing. He fancied, too,
sometimes, that M. de Breuil looked grave; and more
than once thought that Deverin officiously attracted
attention
to his movements. Scrupulous, however, in the
observance of his word passed to Whitby, proud in the
consciousness of acting rightly, though thereby
subjected
to suspicion, and constitutionally reserved in
whatever
related to himself, he forebore all explanations.
By degrees even the bright face of Elise seemed to
wane, or rather an expression of anxious curiosity would
cloud the wonted cordiality of her manner. She was
just leaving home on a short visit to a friend in the
country, when, as Lucius handed her into the carriage,
he thought she looked wistfully at him, as if something
more than a careless adieu were on her lips. Leaning
on the door, he waited to receive it while her
countenance
exhibited an uneasy hesitation, as if doubtful of
the propriety of what she wished to say. At last,
taking refuge in an affected vivacity, she held up her
hand in a warning attitude, and, in an admonitory tone,
while her smile but ill accorded with the earnest
meaning
of her eye
`Beware!' said she, `there is
Obi
set for you.'
`And is it then consistent with your benevolence,'
replied he, `to withdraw your friendly skill at so critical
a moment?'
Intent on her purpose, and gaining courage as she
proceeded, she added with more seriousness
`There is a sorcery more potent than that which
withers and consumes the body. Vice sheds her deadly
blight on the spirit; and weaves her spell in darkness
and secrecy, while truth and virtue love the light.'
`Your assertions are as incontrovertible as axioms,'
answered Lucius, laughing; `but am I to admire them
as aphorisms, or to make a personal application of
them?'
She was about to reply, but Deverin, who had
observed
the short colloquy from the window, lost no time in
interrupting it; and Elise, at his approach, with a vexed
and disappointed look, ordered the coachman to proceed.
The thoughts of Lucius for a few moments dwelt on
her words, which he partly understood as a
commentary
on his own conduct; and he forgave the suspicion
they implied, in consideration of the kindness which
inspired
them. Her warning, however, was not of such
easy interpretation; but referring it to some causeless
solicitude, he soon dismissed it from his mind. He
began
,
nevertheless, to be impatient for his departure, of
which he saw no immediate prospect. The gentleman
on whom especially his business depended, entreated a
little more time, and as an earnest of a favorable
completion
5 *
of the negotiation, made one payment to a
considerable
amount.
This transaction took place near the close of the day.
Lucius having brought home the money, and deposited
it in a secretary, had just seated himself to write a
letter
of business, when the boy who had acted as
Whitby's
messenger, came with the information that he was
dying, and that if his friend would see him living, he
must come immediately. Shocked at intelligence,
which, however much expected, is always appalling,
Lucius hesitated not to go; and, securing his papers,
followed the boy.
He found Whitby evidently in the last conflict, but
still in the possession of his senses; and, though
speaking feebly, yet capable of distinct articulation.
Hitherto, the poor creature had clung to life with that
tenacity which sometimes resists sickness, shame, and
poverty; notwithstanding that Lucius, with a fidelity
which appeared almost cruel, even to himself, had
solemnly
warned him of his danger. As the tide of life
receded, the love of it seemed in some degree to
subside
;
yet still he would talk of expected relief, and, as
he had often done, promise future amendment, when it
was but too evident that the future which he
contemplated
was fast dwindling to a point.
`This room is close, Lucius,' said he; `I can scarcely
breathe; and yet my flesh is numb and cold. Oh! how
I shall enjoy the blessed air of health and liberty!'
In vain his friend endeavoured to lead his thoughts in
the gentlest manner to his real condition and its
appropriate
duties. With his usual facility, he would seem
to admit the truth of whatever was said, yet would still
revert to life as if his hold could not be entirely
relaxed
.
Once, indeed, he said, `If I should not recover,
bear my forgiveness to my father. We have both been
in fault. Should I live, I trust we shall treat each other
better.' And again, after an interval of silence, looking
long and fixedly at his friend, he said with emphasis,
`Lucius Lloyd, the blessing of him ready to perish rests
upon you!'
Determined to remain with him until the last moment,
Lucius retained his seat by the bedside, wiped the
damps of death which gathered on his brow, moistened
from time to time his dry and husky mouth, and kindly
pressed the emaciated hand, which still faintly returned
the pressure. Thus the evening and the night passed
on, interrupted by no sounds but those which proceeded
from the bed of death, and the voice of a neighbouring
clock, which numbered, from hour to hour, the brief
space of time yet allowed to the dying man. But
though his strength was nearly spent, and the laborious
breathing, the fatal hiccough, and the glazed eye,
indicated
that the mortal strife was almost over, still it
seemed to Lucius that his consciousness had not
forsaken
him. Once, even, he thought he said, as he bent
to catch the feeble accents, `Pray for me!' but the
next moment was heard the last gurgling sound with
which the struggling breath escapes foreverand the
spirit was gone!
If Lucius could not contemplate the miserable wreck
of beauty, health and vivacity, but with the truest
compassion, still more deeply did he deplore the
perversion
of naturally kind and amiable dispositions, and
the waste of more than ordinary capacities. Life had
seemed, in his keeping, like the toy in the hands of a
reckless child, ever to be turned from its true purpose,
and to exercise his ingenuity only in its destruction.
Extending his care to all that now remained of him,
Lucius arranged the interment; and, promising the old
woman to see the last duty performed, he left the house.
The night was far spent when he reached his home.
Exhausted by the scene he had witnessed, he slept till
a late hour the next morning, and when he entered the
breakfast room, M. de Breuil received his salutation
coldly. He attempted no apology for his absence, for,
reluctant to enter, unasked, on a full explanation, he
was glad, after a slight refreshment, to escape to his
room. He immediately directed his attention to the
occupation in which he had been interrupted the
previous
day, and, having finished his letter, proceeded to
take the money from the place of deposit; but, to his
surprise and alarm, though he found the secretary locked
indeed with all safety, the treasure was gone!
Obeying his first impulse he hastened to relate his
misfortune to M. de Breuil, whose reception of the
information only increased his perplexity. With a cold
and offended air he directed M. Deverin to be
summoned
;
and then, followed by the young men,
proceeded
to the apartment of Lucius. There was no
appearance of violence on the desk, and, from the
situation of the room, it was impossible that the robbery
should have been committed from without.
`The thief is then within,' said M. de Breuil, and,
with great formality, he proceeded to a thorough search
of the house and of every individual. Nothing was
discovered. Then, as if no longer able to command
himself, turning to Lucius, `Young man,' said he, `it
is as difficult for me to express as to restrain my feelings
at this moment. You are the son of a man to whom I
owed muchI have endeavoured to repay it, and your
own conduct, until lately, has inspired me with respect;
but when,' he continued, with increasing warmth, `you
seek to shelter your own imprudence and folly, to use
no harsher terms, under the pretext of a robbery
committed
upon you within the sanctuary of my house, I
can no longer keep silence. Yet even now, your youth,
and the claims of your family, induce me to urge you
to consider what you are doing; and to beg you, while
you have not as yet irretrievably exposed yourself, to
adopt a course more manly and more safe.'
Lucius, utterly confounded, could scarcely avail
himself
of the pause, which M. de Breuil was compelled
by his own vehemence to make, to ask an explanation.
At length, by implication, inuendo, and passionate
exclamations, he learned that he was believed to have
lost the money himself in vicious excesses. He had
been seen to frequent a house known to be the resort
of the vilest people, and under suspicious appearances.
His late hours, his mysterious silence, his embarrassed
manner, circumstances the most trivial, were
remembered
and brought in evidence against him with the
impetuosity of a Creole and the indignation of insulted
hospitality. Lucius could only oppose to them a
narration
of those facts, which the death of Whitby now left
him at liberty to reveal, requesting M. de Breuil to
accompany him instantly to the spot, to take the
attestation
of the woman and boy. He assented, and with
feelings easily imagined Lucius directed him to the
house. They entered it. It was silent as the grave.
They proceeded to the chamber of the dead, which he
naturally supposed would afford a testimony that none
could gainsay or resist. No human being was to be
seen; even the lifeless body was no longer there!
Lucius, in amazement and consternation, could only
reply to the incredulous looks of M. de Breuil, by
asseverations of his truth, which he felt humbled to the
dust to be compelled to make.
After a fruitless search, `Let us,' said M. de Breuil,
`examine further into this mysterious abode, from which
even the dead escape!' and, proceeding to a distant
room which Lucius had never entered, they plainly
perceived marks of recent occupancy and of vulgar
debauch.
The confusion of Lucius at this discovery had all the
appearance of detected guilt. While the uncertain and
distracted thoughts which pressed on him at one moment
impelled him to rush from the presence of M. de Breuil
forever, the next he was deterred by the reflection that
this course was open alike to the guilty and the
innocent
,
and would in itself have no tendency to remove
the suspicious under which he labored. In addition to
this, fidelity to the interests of his employers demanded
of him the sacrifice of his personal resentment. The
place where the robbery was committed was most likely
to afford some clue to its detection. When, therefore,
M. de Breuil turned to leave the house, Lucius
continued
to accompany him. They proceeded in silence,
each absorbed in his own reflections. The situation
of Lucius was indeed one of difficulty and
embarrassment
.
In a land of strangers, the friend on whom he
could chiefly rely prejudiced against him, his integrity
liable to the most injurious suspicions both there and at
home, the sensibilities of a virtuous, ingenuous youth,
to whatever could touch his fair fame, his dearest, almost
sole possession, were all alive; while his distress was
increased by the consciousness, that the tumult of his
mind, as exhibited in his flushed cheek and perplexed
countenance, might serve to confirm every suspicion
against him.
`Gracious heaven!' thought he, `by what fatality
am I, the innocent and the injured, made to appear the
guilty! What causes me to blush and to tremble as if I
were indeed a scoundrel? It seems as if the mere
imputation
of such baseness had unmanned me, and that
I begin to feel myself the very wretch I am supposed.'
M. de Breuil perceived his emotion, and, naturally
compassionate, amidst all his suspicions felt some
relentings
which inclined him to guide the unfortunate youth,
if possible, out of the labyrinth in which he believed
him to have involved himself. When, therefore, as
they entered the house, they encountered Deverin,
`Come hither, Etienne,' said he to him, `I have
occasion
for you.'
Deverin looked as if he desired to avoid his eye and
his command, but the latter was repeated, and he was
compelled to obey. Leading the way, therefore, into
a retired room, and closing the door, `I have,' said he,
`such a reliance on your honor and delicacy, Deverin,
that, for myself, I could scarcely enjoin on your secrecy
in regard to the events of this morning; but, for the
assurance of Mr Lloyd, it is proper, that, in his presence,
you should pledge yourself to every observance
necessary
to his reputation.'
Stung beyond endurance at the suggestion that his
reputation could be supposed to depend on such a
contingency
,
Lucius, whose conflicting emotions had served
hitherto to control each other, but who was now no
longer able to command himself, exclaimed with
passionate
earnestness, `You insult me! cruelly insult me,
M. de Breuil! Why have you saved my life thus
wantonly
to destroy what I value beyond ten thousand lives?
I am a strangeryou may suppose a helpless onebut
difficult as I may find it immediately to dispel the false
colors with which your absurd prejudices have invested
me, the Spirit of Truth and Justice is everywhere! and
by means apparently the most insignificant, can lead to
the detection of a villain.'
As Lucius uttered these words, Deverin, whose
restless
glance at the door indicated a desire to be released
from a disagreeable conference, was about to give
M. de Breuil the promise he had required, when the
sound of a repeater was distinctly heard, and, darting
forward with the rapidity and the grasp of an eagle, the
hand of Lucius was on the collar of Deverin.
`It is the voice of Heaven!' he exclaimed, while the
wretch, detected without the possibility of escape,
unresistingly
permitted him to take the watch from the
pocket in which he had concealed it, and, falling on his
knees, entreated for pardon. M. de Breuil, with his
usual impetuosity, struck the imploring Deverin to the
ground, and, seizing the hand of Lucius, `I have
wronged you! I have wronged you!' he repeated,
`Oh! how basely! forgive me! and let my vengeance
on him who has thus abused my confidence atone for
my offence.'
Lucius, escaped from the snare that had been spread
for him, was too happy not to be generous. He did
not therefore reject the proffered acknowledgments of
his repentant friend; but declared that all the satisfaction
he required, was a knowledge of the means by which he
had been thus practised against.
Deverin, trusting, by a frank avowal, to recommend
himself to mercy, made a full disclosure of his guilt.
It appeared that his propensity to gambling, though
indulged
with such care and secrecy as to elude the
observation
of his too confiding patrons, had long existed,
producing its usual consequences, hardness of heart,
and an abandonment of all rectitude.
With the keen scent of a beast of prey, he had not
failed to perceive, that, as Lucius must occasionally
have large sums in his possession, or at his command,
he would be a convenient victim. An infidel in the
virtue of which he felt himself incapable, he dared to
suppose that Lucius would not scruple to violate the
trust reposed in him. With this view he strove to
ingratiate himself in his favor; but, to his mortification,
discovered that he was impracticable under the ordinary
mode of operation. Afraid of committing himself so
far as to risk a discovery to M. de Breuil, he was
obliged to lay a deeper plot, which accident favored, and
to which a feeling of personal dislike also instigated
him. He had aspired to the richly portioned daughter
of his friend, nor did he feel doubtful of his consent
could he win that of Elise. Her rejection of his suit,
which occurred soon after her acquaintance with Lucius,
he had attributed, perhaps not without cause, to that
circumstance. The manner of Lucius also had led him
to believe that the prize which he had himself found so
tempting, would overcome the pride and prejudice of
the young American. To destroy his reputation,
became
now, therefore, even more the object of his desire
than to obtain his money, believing, that, his influence
removed, Elise would permit a renewal of his addresses.
Although not personally known to Whitby, he was
no stranger to the practices of his associates, the
pursuits
of his own companions not unfrequently preparing
for them a descent to that more abandoned class.
Jealousy
quickened a mind naturally addicted to low
cunning
.
By watching and dogging, having traced Lucius
in his secret visits, and having secured the cooperation
of the woman and boy, he determined to turn his
discovery
to his own purposes. The timidity of Whitby
rendered him the unconscious abetter, by concealing
from his friend that the place in which he received him,
was still the rendezvous of the gang; a concealment
which the size and interior arrangement of the house
favored. At the same time that Deverin insinuated
suspicion into the mind of M. de Breuil, he as artfully
contrived to divert him from the generous intention he
more than once declared, of remonstrating with his
VOL. II. 6
guest. This he was the more easily induced to relinquish
from the manner of Lucius himself, repelling rather than
inviting such frankness. The gentle and imperfectly
understood admonition of Elise, therefore, was the only
obstacle which opposed itself to his designs, and this we
have seen failed of its purpose.
Perceiving that his suggestions worked as he wished,
he would perhaps have been satisfied had he failed of
that which was his primary object; but, ever on the
alert, he had discovered that the money was in the
possession of Lucius. This, together with his
opportune
absence, could not be resisted. He had no
difficulty
in securing the booty by means of false keys,
without leaving marks of violence. Apprized by his
coadjutors of the death of Whitby, he converted a
circumstance
,
at first startling, into greater security. If
Lucius was thereby released from his promise, he
triumphantly reflected that, at least, all evidence in
support
of his assertions, was removed; and that `dead men
might indeed tell no tales,' he immediately concerted
the removal of the body.
Everything had gone as he wished; and the failure
of the offered proof must have ended in the entire
condemnation
of Lucius. Thus argued Deverin, when, in
passing the open door of Lucius's chamber, during his
absence with M. de Breuil, he saw his watch lying on
the table, where it had been placed in the morning, and
forgotten in the confusion of subsequent occurrences.
Deverin was aloneno one had seen him enterno
assertion of Lucius would now be believedsuspicion of
himself was impossible. Stimulated by success, and urged
on by the fatal impulse by which the villain is sometimes
forced to a step so absurd as to appear the very mockery
of the Evil Spirit himself, he laid his hand on the bait,
and was retreating from the house, when he was met by
M. de Breuil. The sequel has been already told.
The robbery being so recent, the recovery of the
money was not difficult. As for Deverin, frightened
into the nearest approach to virtue of which he was
capable, a dread of the punishment of vice, he so well
played his part, that M. de Breuil, unwilling to punish
him to the extent that he deserved, instead of casting
him off forever, banished him to a distant part of the
country, there to await a trial of his reformation.
Leaving him, therefore, with whom we have nothing
more to do, let us return to the main body of our story.
M. de Breuil, truly grieved by the injustice of which he
had been guilty, and desirous to remove every
remembrance
of it from the mind of his guest, was so
importunate
,
that Lucius was constrained to abandon his
intention of leaving his house. The return of Elise
soon restored the complacency and vivacity which these
occurrences had disturbed; and, equally desirous to
repair the injury he had sustained, she was even more
kind and charming than ever.
At length his tedious negociation was brought to a
close, and Lucius announced to M. de Breuil that in
two days he should leave the island. He received the
intelligence with the most flattering expressions of
regret
,
and directed the conversation to the expectations
which his young friend had in his own country. After
ascertaining that these amounted to little more than
what might result from the confidence and regard of his
present employers, M. de Breuil, in the kindest and
most unequivocal terms, offered him his daughter's hand,
with a portion large enough to place him at once in a
situation not only of independence but affluence. This
offer was accompanied by the embarrassing intimation
that no objection need be apprehended on the part of
the lady. Poor Lucius was thunderstruck! Such were
his simplicity and directness, that it never occurred to
him that a motive of which he was himself unconscious
could be assigned to his actions; and he hardly knew
how to meet the evident misconstruction of them which
was implied in the manner of this offer. Stammering
and blushing, he at length expressed, in the least
offensive
terms he could command, that it was impossible for
him to avail himself of the generous dispositions
manifested
towards him. M. de Breuil colored, but, as if
afraid to trust himself with further conversation, left the
room; and Lucius, glad to avoid a meeting again on
that day, contrived to occupy it on board his vessel, in
preparations for his departure.
Here, as he paced the deck, giving occasional
attention
to the arrangement of the cargo, many painful
feelings assailed him. He felt not, as some might have
done, a sensation of gratified vanity in a conquest over
the affections of a young and beautiful girl; on the
contrary, he severely rebuked himself, that, by not
sufficiently
guarding his actions, he had inflicted suffering
on an innocent heart. That thoughtlessness, which to
others would have furnished their excuse, in the view
of his upright spirit was an offence.
`I am inexcusable,' he exclaimed, `not to have
foreseen this danger;' and, though he could not think
without a pang of being cast out with resentment from
the affectionate remembrance of Elise, he fervently
desired, that, even by that stern proceeding, her
tranquillity
might be restored.
The next day, the last he could spend with his
hospitable
friends, he sought occasions of meeting them.
Elise did not appear, but M. de Breuil had recovered
his usual courteous manner, and avoided all allusion to
the painful subject of their late interview.
The day wore away, and still Elise did not join them.
`Am I not to see Mademoiselle de Breuil?' at length
inquired Lucius; `we sail to-morrow morning.'
`My daughter has requested to see you this evening,'
replied M. de Breuil; `and, if you will walk in the
balcony, I will let her know that you await her there.'
Lucius bowed and directed his steps to the place.
It was on that side of the house which overlooked
the garden. Never was night more beautiful. The
heavens were of that clear, deep blue, which, to the
eye intently fixed on them, seems to disclose all space;
the atmosphere was of that delicious temperature and
purity in which the bare sense of existence is in itself
happiness, and the moon, arrayed in a refulgence never
seen in more northern latitudes, poured forth her beams
on the broad ocean, soothed to repose in the light of
her lovely countenance. On one side extended, almost
without limit, plantations of cane; on the other, rose in
the distance, yet distinctly perceived, majestic palmettos,
whose far spreading foliage, sustained by lofty columns,
seemed like a temple, reared by nature for her own
worship. From the garden beneath came up, as
incense
,
the perfume of the orange, and the odors of a
thousand flowersand all was still, save the unquiet
spirit of man.
Lucius, as will easily be believed, was not in that
imaginative mood which drinks in ecstasy from the
external world; and he heard the light step of Elise
with a secret wish that he were amid the snows of
Siberia, rather than in that paradise of beauty, light,
and fragrance. As she entered the balcony he
approached
her. The traces of disorder and weeping
were still on her countenance. Taking her hand, and
leading her to a seat, `I was unwilling,' said he,
`Mademoiselle de Breuil, to leave you without
expressing
6 *
in person my farewell acknowledgments for all your
kindness, and begging that'
`Stop,' said she, with an energy of manner that made
him start, and over which she seemed herself to have
no control, `stop! I have not sought this interview to
waste in idle courtesy the few moments I have allotted
to it. I know my father's communication to you; I
knowhow it was received. With the tenderness of a
parent he felt some natural risings of resentment at the
rejection of his child; but I have extinguished them.
There are other feelings I cannot so easily quiet,'
continued she, but with a faltering voice, and for a few
moments she remained silent.
Her agitation was contagious, and in accents as
tremulous as her own, Lucius attempted to say`I can
never cease to regret the pain I have caused you,'
but, interrupting him with a proud yet noble air, she
exclaimed, `Do not suppose that I seek to obtain from
your compassion what I could not from your love. No!
worlds would not tempt me now to receive you as a
husband, and it is because I feel this assurance so
strong within me that I can thus speak to you; but I
must learn from your own lips, and by that honor which
you value above all things, if you have, knowingly and
deliberately, trifled with a heart that trusted you?'
She paused as if for an answer, and Lucius, in a tone
of deep seriousness, replied, `With the same solemnity
with which you have interrogated me, I can aver that
I have not.'
`Then,' said she, `I am satisfied. I can now tell
you that the wound you have inflicted does not rankle.
You have a generous soullet it not be pained at the
remembrance of Elise. She may have been deceived
for a time, but she imputes not to you the intention to
deceive. You were happy and grateful, and for a brief
space she believed you loved her. The illusion is over;
but there remains to her the consolation of your integrity,
and one other reflection which she will not relinquish.
Think you, that amidst all her reckless gaiety, and
though she felt the stirrings of a noble spirit, a sympathy
with all that was good and great, a power of loving and
of intensely suffering for those she lovedthink you, she
could long forget the poison that lurked in her veins?
She was not so simpleso ignorant that the prejudices of
society have proscribed her. These, and not you, have
injured her. You have pitied her, and but for them
might perhaps have loved her. It is not, then, original,
irremediable inferiority of nature which separates us.
Oh! no. It is,' said she, covering her animated face
with her beautiful hands, `it is only this unfortunate
complexion!'
For some moments she sat thus, while Lucius, unable
to speak, could only gaze on her in pity and admiration;
when, rising and taking his hand, `Regard me, then,'
said she, `not as a mortified and resentful woman, but
as an unhappy being, who knows, nevertheless, how to
support the destiny allotted to her'and with a gentle
pressure of his hand she disappeared from the balcony
so quickly, that Lucius, overwhelmed, had no power to
arrest her.
When sufficiently recovered he longed to follow her,
to say how tenderly he would cherish her remembrance,
how much he prized her friendship and desired her
happiness
;
but, dreading further conference, her fleet steps
had carried her beyond his pursuit.
At an early hour the next morning he parted from
M. de Breuil, who, at that moment, seemed to feel only
the pain of losing him, and the vessel stood out to sea
under a clear sky and a favoring breeze. Lucius, after
contemplating the receding island with mingled emotions
of thankfulness and regret until it melted away in the
blue distance, bent his eyes and thoughts towards home
and the dear objects it contained; and to these it is
proper that we should now return.
Mrs Lloyd had not heard of her son's illness until he
was convalescent; and, though ignorant of his
subsequent
difficulties, her anxiety suggested many
apprehensions
.
To quiet these, it was not sufficient that
some kind friend should say, `You surely can have
nothing to fear for your son. He at least is safe.'
Her experience of life, while it had enlarged her
indulgence
for the young, had also increased her fears.
When she reflected on their ignorance, and that their
knowledge of good and evil was too often purchased,
like that of our first parents, at the expense of the
paradise
of innocence, she trembled for them. Sustained,
however, by her habitual reliance on that care which
exceeded even her sense of its necessity, and occupied
with her daughter, the months glided by in tolerable
cheerfulness.
One evening, as Mrs Lloyd sat sewing beside her
little work-table, on which Frances leaned, with a
lesson
open, indeed, before her, but discoursing on matters
entirely irrelevant, the arms of Lucius encircled them
both before any intimation of his approach had been
given. The tumultuous joy created by his safe return
had hardly subsided into a quiet assurance, when a new
circumstance called forth their gratitude, intelligence
of which was thus communicated by their friend Mr
Steward.
`My dear Madam,' said he, `you have faithfully
discharged
your duty to your husband and his child; and
I have great pleasure in assuring you, of what I know
you will not regard with indifference, our entire
approbation
of your son. He has more than equalled our
expectations by the good sense and patience with which
he has managed a concern much more intricate and
arduous than we supposed it would be when we
committed
it to so young a man. I have also the further
gratification of informing you, that he is henceforth a
partner of our house. His character is the best capital.'
It would be superfluous to describe the satisfaction
of Mrs Lloyd. `The widow's heart did, indeed, sing
for joy.'
Lucius, thus promoted to a situation of more
independence
,
was enabled to realize some of the wishes he
had formed for his mother's comfort. He would even
have placed her in a more desirable residence, but,
careful of his interests, she refused.
`Delay these magnificent projects, dear Lucius, a
while,' said she; `when you think it necessary to have
a wife we will have a larger house. We need not
enlarge
our casket, until we have jewels to fill it.'
The little Frances, who, though she may have been
forgotten, was not, in her own estimation at least, so
unimportant a person, daily became more interesting,
and was the light and joy of their secluded abode; but
it must be confessed that she sometimes cast a shade of
anxiety over it, by a fault, which, as it was her only
one, will perhaps find toleration. She tenderly loved
her mother, but, when she had diligently gone through
the prescribed lessons, had assisted Dorothy the cook
till she cried `Mercy!' had watered her little garden,
and, impatient of the tedious process of germination,
had taken up one day, the seeds planted the
preceding
,
she had nothing more to do. Her doll had long
since disgusted her by her immobility, and though she
found a substitute in a favorite kitten, yet she could not
always play ball with Mitty, or find interminable
amusement
in seeing her run round after her own tail. At
such times, she would throw herself into her chair, and
despondingly exclaim, `Mother, what shall I do?'
Let not the modern young lady of seven or eight
years of age, for whose entertainment Miss Edgeworth
and other kindred minds have been catererslet not
such contemn our poor little Frances. There were not
then, as now, inexhaustible stores of intellectual
amusement
;
and after reading `Robinson Crusoe' over and
over until it was a matter of indifference to her whether
the Caribees ate him and Friday or not, weeping over
`Nancy and her Canary bird,' execrating `Blue-Beard,'
longing to awake the `Sleeping Beauty' and admiring
the expeditious transportation of the `
Seven-league-boots
,'
as much as the friends of internal improvements,
now-a-days, do canals and rail-roads, her stock was
spent and her `occupation gone.' Her mother had
indeed tried to instruct her in the mysteries of knitting
and sewing; but her tears dropped as fast as her
stiches, and, for some reason or another, her needle had
as many dips and variations, as that of the compass.
In the listless, unoccupied moments that remained,
she had acquired a habit of playing truant, thus
enlarging
her acquaintance much to the anoyance of her
mother. Finding Frances, whose obedience was not
proof against her love of society and the seductions of
popularity, incorrigible under the mild system of
government
,
Mrs Lloyd determined that a French boy, whom
she had recently taken into her family, should attend
Miss Frances whenever she went out. At first, Frances
was quite pleased with this arrangement, and would
look over her shoulder with great complacency at her
little footman. She soon found, however, as others
have found before her, that grandeur was accompanied
by a restraint which more than counterbalanced its
advantages
,
and that her wings were completely clipped.
In vain she endeavoured to elude, or to coax her guard;
in vain, for her, some well known haunt opened to the
right or to the left; Antoine, like a sign-post, pointed
immoveably straight forward. On one occasion, she
was roused to an open rupture. Mrs Lloyd was in the
habit of telling Antoine to what places Frances was
permitted to go. One morning, after having given him
her instructions, at Frances's urgent request her bounds
were enlarged, but her mother forgot to communicate
the same to the little
valet de place
. Out they sallied,
and Frances, having gone the rounds, which, according
to the apprehension of Antoine, comprehended the
extent
of her limits, was, with a light step and happy face,
tripping off in another direction, when in an
authoritative
tone he exclaimed,'
`
Non, Non, Mademoiselle, en avant! en avant!
'
In vain she attempted to explain. Antoine understood
no English, and, only suspecting her usual centrifugal
tendencies, shook his head and with all the
vehemence
and gesture of an infant Talma, cried, `
Marche!
Marche!
'
Unable to command herself at this gross violation of
her rights, Frances resorted to the usual impotent
expressions
of female resentment.
`I will not
marche
, I say, you naughty French
boy, I will not
marche!
'
Just at this juncture a young lady came from a shop,
and, crossing the pavement near the angry disputants,
was attracted by the scene and stopped to inquire the
cause. Antoine began in French, but the appearance
of Frances, who was not slow in telling her own story,
interested the inquirer so much, that he was unheeded.
So well, indeed, did she state her wrongs, that the lady
invited her to enter the carriage, saying she should go
where she pleased, and that afterwards she would set
her down at her own door. The delighted Frances
accepted
the invitation eagerly, and Antoine, in utter
ignorance
of all that had been said, saw her ascend the
steps with as much amazement, but not as much
veneration
,
as if a fiery chariot had descended to receive
her. He looked after her a few moments, then
proceeded
homewards, shrugging his shoulders, and
saying
,
`
Eh bien! Madame sa mre la grondera bien, de cette
dmarche
.'
Frances however had no such fears. Engrossed in
her new acquaintance, she forgot the object so
strenuously
contended with Antoine, and directed at once to
the street in which her mother resided. When they
arrived within a few doors of the house, the coachman
was ordered to stop.
`I must beg you to alight here, my dear,' said the
lady.
Frances entreated that she would accompany her
home, with an assurance that her mother would be
delighted
to see her; but her importunities were of no
avail.
`Will you not, then,' said Frances, with some
embarrassment
,
`will you not tell me your name and let me
come and see you, since you cannot come to my
mamma's?'
`Even this I must refuse, my sweet child; but,'
added she, hesitatingly, `if you do not wish to forget
me, you may call me
l'Inconnue
.'
Compelled to acquiesce in this arrangement, her
chagrin somewhat appeased by the attractive form of
mystery in which the adventure was enveloped, Frances
bade the stranger farewell, and hurried to communicate
the occurrence to her mother.
`Can you not describe this wonderful unknown?'
asked Mrs Lloyd.
`No,' replied Frances; `I can only say that her eye
made me think of a queen, and her mouth of an angel;
but I should know her again in any part of the wide
world.'
The idea of her
incognita
became now, to Frances,
the absorbing interest. She could think of nothing
else, and regularly directed her walk to that part of the
city where she hoped again to meet her. Week after
week however elapsed, and no trace of her appeared.
One afternoon that Lucius was walking with his
mother and sister, Frances, after expressing her
admiration
of some shells with which a friend had just
presented
her, inquired, `Do these beautiful shells come
from the West Indies to which you went some time
ago, brother?'
`The same,' replied Lucius.
`And you say there are a great many handsome
things there besides?' continued she.
`There are indeed,' answered he.
`What makes you look so grave?' asked Frances
with an inquisitive look. `It seems to me you are
always sorrowful when you talk of the West Indies.
I should not suppose that a country full of flowers and
fruits and birds and all sorts of beautiful things, could
be unpleasant to think of.'
Lucius was at this moment following with his eye a
female on the opposite side of the street, whose face,
concealed in the folds of a veil, he could not distinguish,
but whose figure awakened a train of thought which
aptly blended with the images that Frances was thus
calling up.
As the lady passed on, a little chubby boy had
occupied
the walk with his kite and line, which he was
laboring to disentangle She stopped for an instant that
he might have time to remove them; then, as if fearing
VOL. II. 7
to embarrass him further, stepped lightly over, and, by
so doing, disclosed the prettiest little feet that ever
sustained a flying nymph.
`I know but one woman who has such!' thought
Lucius.
At this instant Frances suddenly ceased her prattle
and sprung from his side, exclaiming, `'T is she! 't is
she! I know her veil!'
Before they could attempt to arrest her progress, she
was nearly across the street. Mrs Lloyd and Lucius,
from a natural curiosity, followed, and arrived at the
spot in the same moment that Frances triumphantly
exclaimed, `I have found you at last! I have found
you at last!'
At these words the lady, turning quickly round,
disarranged
the close covering which had concealed her
face, and, like the sun bursting from a cloud, the bright
eyes of Elise de Breuil met the astonished gaze of
Lucius!
`Elise! Elise!' exclaimed Lucius, starting as if
electrified, `is it indeed you!'
With an unsuccessful effort to control her emotion,
she replied, `It is indeed my very self; but I doubt if
your ingenuity would have made the discovery, had it
not been for my little friend here.'
Frances looked from one to the other for an
explanation
,
but in vain. Too much occupied in his own
inquiries, Lucius could not attend to hers; and Elise,
embarrassed and distressed, found one querist more
than she could satisfy. Mrs Lloyd, the only composed
individual of the party, at length found an opportunity
to solicit an introduction to Mademoiselle de Breuil;
and, while they are proceeding to her lodgings, we will
make a retrograde movement and be in readiness to
meet them on their arrival.
Lucius had not long left St Domingo before the
promising aspect of affairs there changed. The French
despatched forces under Le Clerc and Rochambeau, to
reduce the island to its former condition. They met
however with a resistance, which, though honorable to
the cause of freedom, renewed all the horrors of the
late revolution. Toussaint himself was in a distant part
of the country, and Christophe had the command at the
Cape. In answer to a summons to surrender, he replied
in these characteristic words; `You shall not enter
Cape Town till it be reduced to ashes; nay, even in
the ruins I will renew the combat.'
This threat he fulfilled. M. de Breuil's elegant
establishment was involved in the common destruction.
Hurrying with what he could save of his personal
property, he sought refuge for himself and daughter
on board an American vessel, just at the moment to
secure his passage. It was no time for fastidious
scruples
,
yet Elise could not find herself destined to the
only port where Lucius resided, without an alarm to her
female pride at the inference that might be drawn from
her thus following him to his own country. In the
mortification and distress that this occasioned, she
obtained
from her father a promise, that on their arrival
she might be permitted to remain in strict seclusiona
promise he readily gave, as he trusted soon to reembark
for Europe.
Having reached their destined port, Elise rigorously
adhered to her determination, remaining almost
constantly
in her own room, and, when she did venture out,
always having recourse to the protection of a carriage,
or wrapping herself up in an impervious veil. Supported
by the energy of her spirit, she sunk not under the
agitating feelings which such a situation would naturally
produce, but devoted herself with a tender assiduity to
cheer and comfort her father. Her rencontre with
Frances had nearly subverted her resolution. The
attractive
manners of the child, her striking resemblance
to her brother, the simple but earnest request that she
would make herself known, almost subdued her; but,
reflecting that if she could now with propriety present
herself, she could not with safety, she determined to
persevere in a seclusion, which, if it were not happiness,
was, at least, tranquillity. Thus passed the interval
until the accidental discovery we have related.
As Elise entered their little parlour she said with
animation, `I have brought you a cordial, my father,
which will cure your head, by being applied to your
heart.'
Lucius advanced with an eager salutation, and M. de
Breuil received him into his extended arms, exclaiming,
`Ah my friend! how delighted I am to see you! I have
been nearly the victim of a punctilio. It has been more
difficult to endure this system of non-intercourse than
the loss of houses and lands.'
Turning then to Mrs Lloyd, he expressed, with all
the courtesy and vivacity of his nation, his pleasure at
again seeing her; but the transient exhilaration
subsided
,
and Lucius perceived, that, though he tried to be
gay, he was not happy. He observed, too, when
sufficiently
composed to speculate on inanimate objects, that
their lodgings presented a painful contrast to their late
elegant abode, though there were still traces of taste
and refinement. On a table, against which Elise had
leaned her guitar, lay her drawing materials, and a
half-finished
Belle de Nuit
, which, shunning the garish light
of day, seemed a fit emblem of herself, blooming in the
night of poverty and obscurity. A little stand was
placed beside M. de Breuil, on which were a
bonbonire
,
a bottle inscribed `
Vinaigr Balsamique
,' a jar of flowers,
and a book in which he had been reading.
Mrs Lloyd was making similar observations, and lost
no time in urging their friends to accept every
accommodation
that she could offer. This request, though
enforced by the entreaty of Lucius, was unavailing,
and they could only obtain a promise, readily given by
M. de Breuil, to cultivate with all cordiality their
renewed
acquaintance.
Though M. de Breuil faithfully performed his part of
this engagement, Elise, with a true feeling of propriety,
avoided, as much as possible, an intercourse which she
foresaw could only tend to misery.
Mrs Lloyd had not been an undiscerning spectator
of the interview of Lucius and Elise. With his usual
delicacy he had preserved the strictest secrecy on the
subject of her attachment and the offer of her father.
Mrs Lloyd, however, perceived, in the unguarded
moment
of their meeting, an interest of no common
character
,
and the idea once entertained, her observations
were too keen not to find continual confirmation. The
beauty of Elise had made scarcely less impression on her
than on Frances. As she contemplated her symmetrical
form, her dignified movement, her intellectual eye, the
witchery of her smile, the graceful contour of her face,
the expression of truth and purity which gave its highest
charm, she felt rebuked for the lurking prejudices of
which she was conscious, and could not suppress the
reflection of the Assyrians in regard to the no less
contemned Jewess; `Who would despise this people,
that have among them such women!' Early
prepossessions
however prevailed, and, though she did ample
justice to the endowments of Elise, disclosed in their
further intercourse, she watched with unceasing
solicitude
to avert the apprehended evil.
7 *
Lucius himself was still less at ease. The sight of
Elise had renewed a subject of most painful reflection.
It is a proverbial observation, therefore we could not,
perhaps, if we would, disprove it, that `love begets love.'
In the present instance, however, if the selfish principle
were at work, it was so secretly as not to be suspected
by Lucius himself. The last sad scene at St Domingo
had manifested that character in Elise most in unison
with his own. Her kind construction of his conduct,
her generous consideration for his feelings at such a
moment, her self-sustaining spirit, were the evidences of
moral qualities, to which his own nature responded.
When these, together with the consciousness of the
suffering he had caused, were superadded to the
sentiment
previously excited by her beauty and the charm
of her society, it is not strange that he should be a prey
to `sweet and bitter fancy.' His early English
education
had preserved him from the excess of those
prejudices
,
which, in this country particularly, attach to the
injured and unfortunate race whence Elise remotely
sprung. These feelings are easily imbibed, however,
in a society where everything tends to implant, and
nothing to counteract them; but it was not without
violence
to his sense of justice that Lucius had admitted
the belief of an insuperable obstacle to such a union.
These had been the reflections of Lucius during their
separation. Elise was now presented in a view, that,
to a generous mind, was even more interestingan
impoverished exile, dependent for protection on the
precarious
life of a parent who might not long endure the
reverse to which he was subjected. Besides, if his
delicacy had revolted from the connexion when
mercenary
motives might have been supposed to render him
less fastidious, he was proportionally attracted now,
when, bringing no dowry but her virtues, his conduct
could not thus be perverted. He did not seek counsel
from his mother, because, assured that no objection
existed
on her part, except that by which he was himself
embarrassed, he also considered it a question involved
by circumstances which rendered him alone the
responsible
and adequate judge.
In this conflict of opposing feelings, he might
probably
have pursued that course which the conduct of
Elise rendered easy; but M. de Breuil, as if to
indemnify
himself for his long privation would submit to no
farther restraint. Lucius could not withhold those
attentions
which cheered his unfortunate friend, who,
though he manfully struggled with his calamity, could
not maintain the contest with the same success as
formerly
.
His beloved Elise was not then, as now,
exposed
to the danger of becoming a solitary and indigent
outcast in a foreign land. His apprehensions on the
score of his finances, too, continually increased. The
failure of a house in England in possession of funds
upon which he had relied for his subsistence in that
country, had at once prevented his leaving America
and diminished his means of support.
Lucius, convinced that there must be some pecuniary
anxieties, commissioned his mother to relieve them, for
obvious reasons not choosing to do it personally. She
willingly undertook the office, but Elise, though she
received her offers gratefully, assured her that they had
no present difficulties of that kind. `Nor,' added she,
`have I any great fears for the future. If my father be
saved from the suffering of poverty, I have no solicitude
as to myself.'
This Mrs Lloyd was afterwards better able to
understand
,
when she accidentally discovered that Elise had
contrived to augment their little store, without her
father's knowledge, by the sale of ornamental
needlework
in which she excelled, and by which she trusted
to obtain a permanent support, should other resources
fail. This virtuous effort, so quietly and delicately
made, could not but affect Mrs Lloyd. She sighed, as
she exclaimed, `What a pity such a being should be
proscribed! and that, too, for a tinge of complexion which
is disregarded in a Spaniard or an Italian!' A secret
remonstrance inquired, `And how dare I thus contemn
one, to whom our common parent has allied me by all
that I regard as most excellent in my own nature?'
The visits of Frances were the only indulgence Elise
allowed herself. The little creature would sit hours
beside her, as if spell bound, while she sung their
native
songs, bent over her tambour frame, or sketched
from memory the beautiful scenes of her own lovely
land. When her tears fell, as, under her creating
pencil
some well known object rose to view, Frances,
drawing
still nearer, would put her arm softly around her,
and say, `Dear Mademoiselle! do not weepit makes
me cry too, and I do not like to.'
`I once did not like to cry, either, my sweet Frances,'
replied Elise, `but now I love tears better than smiles
except yours,' added she; `your smiles are always
welcome, for they neither hide nor mock a wounded
spirit.'
The expression of such feelings, however, was rare,
and Elise always appeared to reproach herself for them
by increased efforts at self-command, but they touched
deeply the sensitive nature of Frances. One day she
came home, and, throwing herself into a chair with a
dispirited look, she was silent a few minutesan event
of too rare occurrence not to excite attention.
`What is the matter, my love?' said her mother; `are
you not well? or are you fatigued? How far have you
walked?' `Only to Mademoiselle de Breuil's,' replied
she, and was again silent. After some moments, in
which she seemed lost in reflection, `I would do
anything
,'
exclaimed she, `to make her happy. She is so
good! so sweet! Sometimes she can be lively, too,
but she is always sadder than ever afterwards.' Again
she pausedthen suddenly addressing herself to Lucius,
she said, `Brother, do you know nothing that would
make her happier?'
Lucius had taken up a book till the dinner should
enter, and endeavoured by intense attention, to escape
the necessity of a reply. The stratagem was more
successful with Frances than her mother, who observed
with uneasy thoughts the kindling cheek of Lucius.
Mrs Lloyd was too skilled in the pathology of the
gentle passions, not to perceive that the disease was
making progress. Her uncertainty in regard to her
son's decision, was attended with more anxiety from the
conviction, that, whatever it might be, he would not
lightly abandon it. She dared not attempt to influence
him directly, distrusting the only argument she could
use. She even feared, that, under the excitement of
a strong interest, the very obstacle she would suggest,
might, by appealing to his compassion, induce the step
she wished to prevent. The only resource was one
which she had some time meditated, but from which she
had naturally shrunk. This was an application to Elise
herself. Improving, therefore, the first favorable
opportunity
afforded by the absence of M. de Breuil, with
a heart sickened at the thought of the pain she was
compelled to give the interesting girl, she unfolded her
wishes, leaving it to the magnanimity of Elise to
determine
whether she would consent to a union with a
young man under circumstances, which, though
involving
no guilt, yet, in an artificial state of society, must
be injurious to him.
Elise listened in silence, while Mrs Lloyd with
averted
looks, cautiously proceeded. When she had
concluded
she turned for a reply.
Elise sat with her arm resting on the table, her hand
supporting her head, and her eyes firmly closed, as if
to conceal her emotion, which was nevertheless
betrayed
by the convulsive movement of her face. Mrs Lloyd,
though alarmed for her success, yet, moved by her
appearance
,
took her hand.
`I have grieved, perhaps offended you, Miss de
Breuil,' said she; `could you know with what
reluctance
,
I am sure you would pardon me.'
`I might, indeed' replied Elise, at length, `I might
indeed have been spared this superfluous trial. Know,
Madam, that your wishes have been anticipated. Your
son has within a few hours received the answer you
would prescribe. Although chiefly moved to it by a
resolution not to abuse his generous attachment to his
own disadvantage, I was not insensible to what I easily
divined were your feelings. However pained, be
assured
that I am incapable of cherishing resentment;
but had you better understood me, you would have
saved me from the double mortification of a rejection
from the mother as well as the son.'
`The son!' exclaimed Mrs Lloyd in astonishment.
This led to a frank communication of the circumstance
alluded to.
Mrs Lloyd was subdued and humbled. The
voluntary
self-devotion of Elise, after so much suffering,
when assured that the offer of Lucius was the dictate
of that sentiment which alone could satisfy her, rose in
bright contrast to her own timid and calculating
conduct
.
`You shall not,' she exclaimed, while a glow of
enthusiasm
suffused her face, `you shall not, noble girl!
be the sacrifice of a cruel prejudice.'
As she uttered these words, the door opened, and
Lucius entered.
`You are opportunely come,' said his mother, `to
assist
me in repairing a wrong I blush to have committed.
I will no longer be accessary to the separation of two
beings formed for each other.'
Lucius was in an instant at the side of Elise, pouring
forth the language of entreaty and affection.
`Oh!' cried she, her upcast eye imploring strength
and guidance, `this is, indeed, the sorest temptation
that has yet beset me! Shall I at last descend from
that high purpose, which has sustained meshall I
degenerate
into a weak, selfish girl, willing to accept
happiness
,
even to the injury of him I love!'
Should any fastidious reader perchance waste his
time on our unpretending tale, we advise him here to
close the book, and imagine a termination in
accordance
with his own feelings. He may, if he please,
suppose
that Elise persisted in her resolution, but that,
sinking under the misery it occasioned, her life was
sacrificed to a distinction, unsanctioned either by Nature
or Religion. To another class of readers, if such we
are so fortunate as to have, we will venture to disclose
the whole truth, but in few words and a subdued tone,
well aware that we `tread untrodden ground;' and must
be careful, lest we rouse that spirit which guards, so
scrupulously, `established forms and precedents.' It
will do for those who are sure of sympathy to bring off
their heroes and heroines with flying colors; and in the
words of the old song,
`Make bustling preparation
For the nuptial celebration.'
They may, even, in the manner of Richardson, set
forth a whole country in coaches, liveries, and
escutcheons
,
to do honor to the happy pair. For us, however,
we must conduct our young people in the quiet and
unobtrusive
way in which they were content to be happy,
to the reward of their distinguished attachment.
Elise, unable to resist the united entreaties of Lucius,
Mrs Lloyd, and her father, yielded; but not without a
sigh to that generous renunciation to which she had
condemned herself. In the continually developing
vigor of her character, her gentle virtues and devoted
love, Lucius found increasing cause to bless his destiny,
and for the indulgence of an honest pride that he should
have discerned and appropriated a treasure, which others
would ignorantly have contemned.
To Mrs Lloyd Elise became at once the delightful
companion and friend, the respectful and affectionate
daughter; and M. de Breuil, in the happiness of his
child, found a compensation for all his troubles.
LIONEL.
BY ROBERT MORRIS.
The
brave, the bright, the beautiful have fallen,
By human passion, from the loftiest heights
Of honor and ripe intellect. The seers
Of former times, the Hercules of Gath,
The wisest and the wiliest of men,
Woman's light bonds have fettered.
Decrepid Archenessa, bent with years,
Possessed the heart of Plato. Socrates
Bowed down to lewd Alphasis, and bright Lais,
Corinthia's syren wanton, rioted
In princely Pyrrhus' soul. Alas! for man,
That he should be the slave of idle thoughts
And dream away his reason!
I 've a tale
That seems but as a thing of yesterday
Its memory is so vivid. There was one
Whom I had known in boyhood. I can see
His glowing cheek, his rosy lip, e'en now
An image of the past most beautiful.
His eye was a delicious thing of light,
And his glad voice and mellow utterance
Broke forth `like the wild carol of a bird.'
Lionel! with thy ample brow and flowing hair,
Standing bewildered by Niagara
Gazing with breathless and intense delight
Into its boiling cauldronLionel!
Thou star that set in darkness! how can I
VOL. II. 8
Call back life's rosy images, when thou
That once wert bright and eloquent as youth,
Art folded in the grave. He was a child
Of a strange beauty. His red lip was thin,
But delicately curled, as a fine thought
Of scorn or passion touched it with a smile;
His brow was pale as marble, and as smooth
As the blue sea of summer. Early thought
Gave to its polish utterance, and a shade
Slept sadly o'er his eyelash, as if woe
Bore heavily on his spirit. He was one
To win you from your ordinary moods
To pause and contemplate. He had a soul
Delicate as perception, and a mind
Brilliant as meteors, but as erring too.
He loved the paths of naturethe green dell,
The fall of waters, and the raging sea
Sunset was glorious, and starry eve
Could lead him up to high imaginings
Of God and his infinity of worlds.
A shade came o'er the young boy's destiny
He suddenly was an orphan, and the world
Beckoned him to the conflict. He forsook
The haunts of youth's Arcadiathe green hills
And laughing brooks of summer, where his voice
Rung joyous cadences; and he forsook
His academic studies, and the one,
The kindred spirit of his early dreams,
Who shared romantic reveries with him
In life's unclouded morning. He forsook
The necromantic pageantry of dreams
For cold reality. The hollow world,
Drear as a desert, burst upon his view.
He was alone in spirita frail bark
Tossed on misfortune's tempest. Lionel!
Earth was too drear for thee, and darkness came
To clothe thy soul in weariness, before
The bud of thy creation was matured.
Poor and unknown, unfriended, and depressed,
His boyhood wasted on in bitterness;
And then another shadow dimmed his fate.
`Is there a God?' his evil demon cried.
`Creation's face is very beautiful,
The stars of heaven are glorious, and the sun
Rolls on a high career in heaven; but I'
He gazed upon a mirror; his proud brow
Was white as alabaster; his bright eye
Flashed like a wild intelligence; his form
Was scarcely half concealed in tattered shreds
He turned away in agony and raved.
A lofty spirit kindled in his soul;
But he was poormost miserably poor,
And bitterly he cursed his destiny.
`Is there a God?' again the startling thought
Maddened his intellect; again the wrath
Of desperation kindled on his lip;
His form convulsed an instant; the cold dews
Rolled from his burning temples; a deep groan
Came from his beating bosom, and his brain
Was maddened by intensity of thought.
Another change came over him. He now
Had thrown his boyhood by, and the warm heart,
Pure as a crystal fountain, had been tinged
With the world's guiltiness. His face was pale;
His eye glared dark and scowling; his thin lip
Forever curled in mockery. Lionel
Was one who scoffed at Heaven. A fearful creed
Had blotted the bright promise of his youth.
She, the fair spirit of his early dreams,
He had betrayed and ruined. His fair fame
Was blackening in the shades of infamy.
A modern Cleopatra had called forth
His secret sympathies. Gay Adela
Was fair as ancient Hynesraven hair
Fell o'er her polished shoulders, and wild eyes
Glanced through bewitching lashes. She was all
That Helen might have been in rosy youth,
Fresh from the babbling fountain. She was all
That would bewilder Antony again
To sacrifice ambition; and she came
A thing of startling beauty to despair,
And Lionel bowed down to her.
'T was night.
He stood beside a river. The bright stars
Were mirrored in its bosom; the pale moon
Moved silently through heaven. He cursed his fate,
And gazed upon the waters, with his brain
Revolving its mad impulses to leap.
A sweet, shrill voice fell on his pausing ear,
Staying his purpose. Lionel quickly turned,
And a fair girl stood trembling at his side.
`Who art thou,' he exclaimed, `thus lonely here,
Beneath the midnight moon?'
`A hated thing
A bleeding-hearted woman! Who art thou?'
`A beggar with a mind, whose bitter hours
Creep on so laggardly towards the grave
That I would fain propel them.'
Adela
Threw back her glossy tresses. A bright brow,
Lit by a gleam of moonlight, lay above
Two flashing gems of vision. Her frail hand
Trembled beneath the starlight, as she cast
One finger like an icicle to heaven,
And shrieked to Lionel, `Is there a God?'
He bowed himself and groaned; then took the hand
That trembled like an aspen leaf in his,
And gazed upon her earnestly, and mused.
Time's sands ran swiftly now. Lost Lionel
Forgot his early destinies, and she,
The ruined beauty, was the world to him,
And he was life to her. He now had been
Struggling for sustenance for her he loved.
His frame was wasted, and his sunken cheek
Was hollow with despair. He fell again!
And she for whom he had been urged to crime,
Shared every danger with him. Even when
Their cup of bitterness had reached the brim,
She came to him in prison, half insane,
And, plunging a cold poniard in his breast,
They yielded up life's miseries, and died!
8*
THE MURDERER'S GRAVE.
A few
hundred yards from the small stream which,
known by the whites under the appellation of `Line
Creek,' divides the territory of the Muscogees or Creek
confederacy from the state of Alabama, stands, or rather
stood, a ruined cottage of logs. Travelling through the
wilderness several years ago, I passed this desolate
spot. The walls, blackened by the smoke of many fires
and in part already decayed, stood tottering to their fall;
the roof was entirely gone; a part only of the chimney
was left, built in the custom of that country, of split
sticks, and thickly plastered on the inside with mud.
The fences had fallen around a small field which showed
traces of former cultivation, and was now fast filling up
with briars, plumb bushes, and sedge grass, where the
still evident marks of the hoe and the cornfield gave
proof that human beings had once found there a home.
The mists of night were closing around us, the dark
magnolia forest which frowned on the secluded spot,
and the thick and gloomy swamp of the Line Creek,
which stretched its unhealthful morass almost to the
door, gave to the whole scene the stillness and horror of
death. Although habituated during a journey of many
days to the solitude and gloom of the wilderness, I
was struck with the peculiarly lugubrious aspect of the
scene, and with an undefinable feeling of melancholy.
I stopped my horse to survey it more at leisure. My
companion who had ridden a few yards in advance, not
hearing the accustomed sound of my horse's tramp,
turned his head to learn the cause of my lingering, and
rode back to the spot where I had halted.
`Here,' said he, `is Riley's grave. Remark that small
mound of earth resembling the heap of soil accumulated
from a fallen tree, and which is, in truth, the effect of
the trunk to which those decaying pinknots once
belonged
;
there the murderer fell, and there he lies buried.'
Not being so familiar with the legends of this wild
region as to remember the story of the man whose crime
and death had given a name to this lonely scene of
desolation
,
I inquired into his history, and listened in deep
and silent interest to a tale of revenge and remorse,
strongly illustrative of the aboriginal character.
Barney Riley, as he was termed by the whiteshis
Indian appellation is now forgottenwas a petty chieftain
belonging to the confederacy of the Upper Creeks.
Being a `half breed,' and, like most of the mixed race,
more intelligent than the full blooded Indians, he
acquired
a strong influence among his native tribe. Regarding
the people of his father as allied to him in blood and
friendship, he took very early a decided part in favor of
the United States in the dissensions among the Creek
nation, and, after the breaking out of war in 1812, joined
the American forces with his small band of warriors.
Brave and hardy, accustomed to confront danger and
conquer difficulties, he led his men to battle, and in
many instances proved by his activity of material
service
to the army. His gallantry and abilities attracted
the notice of the commander in chief, and Riley's name
was coupled with applause in many of the despatches
during the campaign. On the restoration of peace, he
returned to his people honored with the thanks of his
`Great Father,' and sat down to cultivate his fields
and pursue the chase as in times gone by. Although
distinguished in war and in council, he was still young,
and devoting himself to his
one
wife, a lovely Indian girl,
he seemed contented and happy.
About this time the restoration of tranquillity, and the
opening of the rich lands just ceded to the United States
on the upper waters of the Alabama, began to attract
numerous emigrants from the Atlantic settlements, and
the military road was soon thronged with caravans
hastening
to these fertile countries at the West. The country
from the Oakmulgee to the settlements on the
Mississippi
,
was still one howling wilderness, and many
discontented
spirits among the conquered tribes still meditated
a hostile stroke against their white oppressors.
Travelling
was of course hazardous and insecure, and persons
who were not able to associate in parties strong enough
for mutual defence, were fain to procure the guidance
and protection of some well known warrior or chief,
whose name and presence might ensure a safe passage
through those troubled countries.
Of this class was L. I knew him formerly and
had heard some remote allusion to his fate. Though his
misfortunes and embarrassments had driven him to seek
a distant asylum, a warmer heart beat not in a human
bosom. Frank and manly, open to kindness and prompt
to meet friendship, he was loved by all who knew him,
and `eyes unused to weep' glistened in bidding `God
speed!' to their old associate. L, had been a
companion
in arms with Riley, and knew his sagacity, his
courage, and fidelity. Under his direction he led his
small family of slaves towards the spot upon which he had
fixed for his future home, and traversed the wild and
dangerous path in safety and peace. Like most men of
his eager and sanguine temperament, L was easily
excited to anger, and though ready to atone for the
injury
done in the warmth of feeling, did not always
control
his passions before their out-burst. Some slight
cause of altercation produced a quarrel with his guide,
and a blow from the hand of L, was treasured up by
Riley, with deep threats of vengeance. On the banks
of yonder creek he watched his time, and the bullet too
truly aimed, closed the career of one who little dreamed
of death at the moment. His slaves, terrified at the
death of their master, fled in various directions and
carried
the news of his murder to the nearest settlements.
The story of L's unhappy end soon reached his
family, and his nearest relatives took immediate
measures
to bring the murderer to justice. Riley knew that
punishment would speedily follow his crime, but took no
steps to evade or prevent his doom. The laws of
retaliation
among his countrymen are severe but simple
`blood for blood'and he `might run who read them.'
On the first notice of a demand, he boldly avowed his
deed and gave himself up for trial. No thought seemed
to enter his mind of denial or escape. A deep and
settled
remorse had possessed his thoughts, and influenced
his conduct. He had no wish to shun the retribution
which he knew was required. When his judges were
assembled in the council at the public square, he stood
up and addressed them.
`Fathers!' said he, `I have killed my brothermy
friend. He struck me, and I slew him. That honor
which forbade me to suffer a blow without inflicting
vengeance, forbids me to deny the deed or to attempt to
escape the punishment you may decree. Fathers! I
have no wish to live. My life is forfeited to your law,
and I offer it as the sole return for the life I have taken.
All I ask for is to die a warrior's death. Let me not
die the death of a dog, but boldly confront it like a brave
man who fears it not. I have braved death in battle.
I do not fear it. I shall not shrink from it now.
Fathers! bury me where I fall, and let no one mourn
for the man who murdered his friend. He had fought
by my sidehe trusted me. I loved him, and had sworn
to protect him.'
Arrayed in his splendid dress of ceremony, he walked
slowly and gravely to the place of execution, chanting
in a steady voice his death song, and recounting his
deeds of prowess. Seating himself in front of the
assembled tribe upon yonder fallen tree, and facing the
declining sun, he opened the ruffle of his embroidered
shirt, and, crossing his hands upon his breast, gave with
his own voice the signal of death, unmoved and
unappalled
.
Six balls passed through both his hands and his
bosom, and he fell backward so composedly as not to
lift his feet from the grass on which they rested. He
was buried where he fell, and that small mound marks
the scene of his punishment; that hillock is the
murderer's
grave; that hovel, whose ruins now mark the
spot, was erected for his widow, who lingered a few
seasons in sorrow, supporting a wretched existence by
cultivating yonder little field. She was never seen to
smile, or to mingle with her tribe; she held no more
intercourse with her fellows than was unavoidable and
accidental, and now sleeps by the side of her husband.
The Indian shuns the spot, for he deems that the spirit
of the murderer inhabits it. The traveller views the
scene with curiosity and horror, on account of its story,
and, pausing for a few moments to survey this lonely and
desolate glade, hastens on to more cheerful and happy
regions. With this short narrative we put spurs to our
horses, and, hurrying along the road, in a few moments
found ourselves beyond the gloomy and tangled forests
of the creek.
MUSINGS.
TO ROSABELLE.
BY WILLIS G. CLARK.
There
is light abroad in thy pathway now,
And a stainless smile on thy virgin brow;
There are dreams that float in thy spirit's sight,
Till thy young eye swims in untold delight
Till the wide earth seems but a paradise,
Where the purest blossoms and odors rise.
With song, and vision, and footstep free,
Fair girl! will sorrow e'er steal on thee?
The world is gay to thine ardent eye,
With hues of joy in its pictured sky;
With a touch, like the wakening glow of spring
It is Pleasure's brightest imaging!
And she cheers thy path with a seraph tone,
With a voice that is melting, like music's own;
Like the halcyon's fleeting and raptured lay,
On the far, calm sea, as it dies away.
Hast thou marked the course of a fresh blue stream,
In its light and shade, like a changeful dream?
When the opening buds, on its side, would fling
Their gift to the spring-gale's viewless wing?
When the soft, low tones of the humming-bird
Stole out, like olian music heard?
When the glancing leaves of the forest trees,
Were whispering gladness to sun and breeze?
Were there hopes that swept o'er thy spirit then,
While the stream danced on in its quiet glen?
Were there tears of bliss in thy kindling eye,
As its glance was cast to the golden sky?
Hadst thou one thought, that the scene would fade,
That a blight would steal o'er the summer glade,
That the cloud would frown in that festal heaven,
Or the tree's sere honors to dust be given?
Bright one! I would that the world might be
All joy and sunlight outspread for thee!
That thine early visions might yet remain,
When thy step has passed from youth's gay domain!
But thy dreams will flee like a wild brid's tone
Like the aspen's whisper, thou lovely one!
Thy hopes will fade in the viewless air,
And the wreath lie dead in thy golden hair!
There is yet a brighter and purer ray,
Which will pour its glow on thy flowery way;
It will light thine eye as it flits along,
Wake thy soul to love and thy lip to song;
And the untold bliss of its visitings,
Will thrill to thy young heart's holy strings
But 't will fleet like the rich cloud isles that glide
Through the summer-heaven at evening tide.
Thou wilt breathe Love's sigh but a little while,
Thou wilt bask but a moment in Pleasure's smile!
Above thee will darken the clouds of fate,
And thy innocent heart will be desolate!
Thou wilt look with a mournful feeling, back
On the withered buds in thy childhood's track
On the wasted hours of thine early glee
Pure girl! I am sad as I gaze on thee!
But there yet is peace! Thou may'st glean it still
From the crystal lakefrom the prattling rill
From the summer's glow, or the spring's clear glance,
Or autumn's faded inheritance.
Though Hope no dream to thy soul may bring,
Though Joy may sleep on its folded wing,
It will teach thee to bow to the chastener's rod,
While it lifts thy affections up to God!
LEAVES FROM A COLLEGER'S ALBUM.
Horace Fritz
! thou inimitable dandy! thou strange
compound of quiz, mimic, and cavalier! with thy nice
honor, thy racy humor, and thine exquisite quizzery so
mingled, that no one could tell whether it was likelier
that thou wouldst die harlequin or heromaster of the
art of elegant idleness; pet of the gentler sex, and thy
tailor's oracle! accomplished in everything but that for
which thou wast sent, and envied for everything but
thy noblest elementthe mind thou dist neglect
Horace Fritz! I saydid it ever enter that beautiful
head of thine, whose hyacinthine curls and perfect
contour
are before me, this moment, to the very life, that,
Proteus as thou art, thou wouldst ever figure in a
veracious
and consistent history?
Charles Wimbledon
! thou prince of college
good-fellows
!
didst thou ever dream of being the hero of a
story? Who that had seen thee, in thy faded brocade and
slippers, shuffling to a recitation from thine unopened
Eulerwho that had witnessed thine imperturbable
gravity while dazzling the simple intellects of thy tutor
VOL. II. 9
with extempore and audacious hypothesis as a cover for
thine ignorancewho that had seen thee, in thy moods
of philosophy, posed upon an abstract principle, with
thy chin resting on thy two palms, and thy hair like an
ill painted Medusathy legs thrust from under the table
and resting on thy heels, and thine eyes, beautiful with
intellectual light, fixed on the large nail in the wall
which served thee as a tether for thine imaginationin
a word, who that had not eaten with thee, and drunk
with thee, and slept with thee, night after night and
term after term, yawned with thee in thy gravities and
been convulsed with thee in thy gaieties, would have
dreamed that thou couldst, by any hyperbole, be made
the hero of a story?
Job Clark
! thou curiosity in human nature! thou
great, unsightly, romantic, true hearted, delightful fellow!
with a spirit so `tall' that thou walkest ever in the
stars, and a person so awkward that none but thine own
sex could ever look tenderly on theethou gorgeous
enthusiast, who, in a chrysalis of eighteen years, wert
insensible to the very sunshine of thy present existence
nature, poetry, and woman! thou lunatic by night! thou
sun worshipper by day, and thou poet in every season!
susceptible, chivalrous, diffident, uncouth, generous Job!
I am about to tell the world of thee. Behemoth as thou
art, thou wilt blush like a shy girl if I praise thee, and if,
in letting in the light upon thy virtues, I expose aught
at which the naughty will smile, I am sure, my dear
Job, thou wilt forgive me!
The Senior vacation had come. We had been
examined successfully for degrees, and were separating,
with six summer weeks before us, to meet once more at
Commencement. Charles Wimbledon, Horace Fritz,
and Job were going together to Niagara.
`Will you go, Tom?'
I passed a long sigh down the catalogue of my
available
wealth. It came back to my heart like a leaden
bullet.
Seven o'clock and a brilliant July morning. The
entries were crowded with porters; stage-horns were
blowing at the gates; Seniors in boots and black cravats,
an umbrella in one hand and a cloak in the other, were
hurrying across the yard; trunks and travelling bags
were scattered round under the trees; three legged and
battered furniture, whose `occupation was gone,' was
laid up against the fence, the property of rapacious
brokers; farewells were hastily exchanged; the
smothered
`God bless you!' of friends, whose hearts had
beaten pulse for pulse during the years that had come
to a close, and who, after one more brief meeting, would
part forever, was here and there just audible, and
melancholy faces and elastic steps, the merry good bye
to duty and the sad good bye to mates, the gay notes of
departure and the evident clinging of fond associations
as the last look was taken, all mingled together in the
strange and trying contrasts of a final vacation.
Again! the horn sounds a prolonged note. One
more grasp! another deep `God bless you!' and with
a crack of the whip are divided ties which can never in
this world be matched or reunited.
I turned away from the gate. Three or four poor
students in their threadbare coats were leaning over the
fence, gazing with melancholy earnestness after their
happier classmates, and one, who had been confined to
his bed till he was childish with sickness, and whom
they had bolstered up to the window that he might see
them go, had just put aside impatiently the cup which
the nurse was pressing upon him, and was sobbing in a
passion of tears.
I could not bear the stillness of the deserted entry.
I shut my door violently, and when the reverberations
died away I felt alone in the world.
The next week I received a joint letter from my chum
and his company. What follows is an extract from the
part written by Fritz.
`The pretty Quaker sat in a corner of the cabin when
I first went below, talking to an old woman through an
ear-trumpet. She was the prettiest, simplest looking
creature I ever saw. Her plain drab silk frock was
fitted closely to a most bewitching figure; her cheek
and lip looked as if she lived upon roses, and her brown
hair was smoothed away behind the funniest little ear in
the world. Her foot was not so small as one we wot
of, but it had never worn a tight shoe, and had the
perfect
lines of statuary; and the ancle!hang me, Tom,
if I did n't long to be a little cotton stocking!
`How should I get acquainted with her? Impudent as
I am, I never could be
nonchalant
with a country girl.
My art forsakes me when there is no suspicion of it.
I could make love to a belle with less embarrassment
than I could make a bow to a rural. While I sat
wasting my brains on expedients, Job started suddenly
and broke out with one of his Latin apostrophes to
something which delighted him in the scenery. The little
Quaker looked earnestly at him and then whispered to
her companion. It was evident that she thought him
crazy. I had my cue. I went up and patted him
soothingly on the shoulder, and whispered some
nonsense
or other into his ear, and then crossed over to
the lady.
`I beg you will not be alarmed, Miss, said I,
he 's not at all dangerous. He 's very gentle to
ladies.
`Then he
is
out of his head, poor man, said she,
looking at him compassionately. Are you his keeper,
Sir?
`What a question, Tom, to a buck of my water! I
looked into the glass opposite me, to see if it was indeed
Horace Fritz, or no, who was so insulted. No
oh! no, that gentleman and I are taking him home to his
friendscan do nothing for him at the hospital, poor
fellow!
`How long has he been so, Sir?
`Ever since he was eighteen years old, Miss.
`Dear me! so long? What made him so?
`Love, Misslove! said II thought to be
facetious
,
Tomhe got in love with a Miss Moonlight
when he was only sixteenMiss Diana Moonlight
charming girl!
`Did she refuse him, Sir?
`Tom, it was too much! to take my beautiful allegory
for earnest! I had no conception simplicity could be so
simple. Miss Diana Moonlight! Heavens, what a
goslin!
`Why, nononot right out; but he went to see
her very often, and would sit and look at her without
speaking a word for whole evenings together.
`How tired she must have been! said Simplicity.
`She never showed it in her manner, Missand
though he 's not handsome
`Oh! very ugly!
`There was but one gentleman whom she was ever
known to prefer.
`Was he handsome, Sir?
`A splendid fellow! His name was Apollo. He
kept a carriage and four, and used to drive by the
windows every day.
9 *
`Did the crazy gentleman know that she liked him,
Sir?
`Oh! yes, Miss. He was with her frequently when
Apollo drove by, and the moment he came in sight, she
turned as pale as ashes.
`Dear me!
`And by the time he got opposite the window, he
blushed violently and she fainted away.
`Bless me! how very singular! Are they married
now, Sir?
`Nobody knows. She's very inconstant, and he 's
so hot headed that nobody can live near himbut they
go off together frequently.
`Alone, Sir?
`Yes, indeed, and that 's what crazed my poor
friend here.
`
Splendidissime!
exclaimed Jobthe sun was
setting
nitidissime! fulgentissime!
and he threw his
arms up and down in his peculiar pump-handle style
you know.
`Poor man! poor man! exclaimed the drab
bonnet
in great alarm. Go to him, Sir! go to him, Sir!
`Hush! hang you, Job! said I, punching him at
the same time with a bit of my science; but in the mean
time the drab bonnet was carried off by her deaf aunt,
and I just caught a glimpse of her as she vanished in
the ladies' cabin.
`The evening was delicious. It was bright moonlight,
and after supper the passengers all came upon deck.
There were no seats, as the canal bridges are so low
that you must lie down in order to pass under, and my
pretty friend, wrapped in a large cloak and flanked by
the old lady, who, she told me, was a Methodist aunt of
hers, was leaning, in a half reclined position, upon a
travelling bag, with that bewitching little ancle just
peeping out into the moonlight.
`I am glad you have come, said she, as I dropped
upon my elbow at a little distance; I want you to tell
me the rest of the crazy man's story.
`She turned her face towards me as she spoke,
and threw back her bonnet so that the moonlight just
fell upon her lips and left her eyes in shadow. I was
ashamed of having quizzed such a beautiful creature,
Tom. If I could have done it without mortifying her I
would have confessed it allbut it was impossible, and
feeling sufficiently punished for my folly by the necessity
of continuing it when not in the vein, I proceeded.
`There is little more that would interest you, Miss
`My name is Rachel, Sir.Oh! Tom, if you had
seen that smile!
`Thank you! mine is Horace. There is little more
that would interest you, Miss Rachel. My poor friend
was sent to the hospitalYale collegeyou take,
Tomas soon as his symptoms became alarming.
He has been there four years, and is no better. He is
gentler now, it is true, and sometimes writes poetry very
like a sane person, but there 's no hope of his ever being
as he used to be.
`Poor creature! said Rachel, with a sigh that
made me wish my quizzery to the devil.
`She dropped her eyes as she spoke, and began to
trace the plaid of her tartan cloak with her dimpled
forefinger
,
evidently musing on Job's melancholy situation.
Her innocent confidence and sensibility touched me.
Upon my word I felt as tender as a Freshman.
`Rachel! said I, I beg pardonMiss Rachel
`You may call me Rachel if you will, said she,
raising
her soft lashes and looking at me with an expression
of almost sisterly fondness.
`I took up the little dimpled hand, and half raised it
to my lipsRap! came the ear trumpet of our
Methodist
aunt down upon the fingers;
`Come to the cabin, you slut, you! come along to
the cabin! sparking here with a strange gentleman!
Ar' n't you ashamed of yourself?Kissing your hand,
indeed!Go along to the cabin, you tyke, yougo!
`Tom, you might have heard her a mile.'
The extract to follow is from Job's letter. I must
make an apology for my queer friend. To those who
know him it will be unnecessary, of course; but to those
who do not, I will just say that Job Clark is a pure,
unsophisticated
Vermont boy, with not one particle of
knowledge of the world, and a mind of an overrunning
and most luxuriant enthusiasm. At the time we speak
of he was just at that state of existence when the ideal
world touches without mingling with the realwhen, as
every sometime enthusiast will remember, the glory of
a beautiful creation is extended to everything that
moves upon it, and there is no eye for deformity,
because
in nature there is none visible, and his own heart,
kept, even yet, apart from the collision which developes
it, has not yet taught him the chilling secret of its
depravity
.
It is at this period, if ever, that the generous
impulses have their perfect waythat everything about
us takes the color of our own mind, and every impression
is a sensation of pleasure. It is then that the
beautiful
but frail philosophies of the ancients are drunk in
with an unquestioning eagerness, and believed because
felt to be worthy of an ennobling consciousness; and it
is after this that infidelitynot only of revelation, but of
ourselves and our immortal but much clouded destiny,
comes on with the terrible reaction of deluded
enthusiasm
and the first discovered bad passions of the world.
But here is a part of his letter.
`Have you ever read Undine, Tom? Did you
conceive
of a river of wondrous and perfect beauty?
Was it fringed with all manner of stooping trees, and
kissed to the very lip by clover? Did it wind constantly
in and out, as if both banks were enamoured of its flow
and enticed it from each other's bosoms? Was it
hidden
sometimes by thick masses of leaves meeting over
it, and sometimes by the swelling of a velvet slope that
sent it rippling away into shadow? and did it steal out
again like a happy child from a hiding place, and flash
up to your eye till you would have sworn it was living
and intelligent? Did the banks lean away in a rich,
deep verdure, and were the meadows sleeping beneath
the light, like a bosom in a silk mantle? and when
your ear had drank in the music of the running water,
and the loveliness of color and form had unsettled the
earthliness within you, did you believe in your heart
that a strip of Eden had been left unmarred by the angel?
`We have been on the edge of such a river for eighty
miles. The motion of the boat is imperceptible, and
the scenery glides by like a dream. Everything has
been beautifulbeautiful! The sun set gloriously last
night, and soon after, the moon rose full and perfect
from the bosom of a white cloud. Never was there a
more magnificent night. Do you recollect in the
Epicurean
,
Tom, the night upon the Nile, which
Alciphron
says, was like that which shines upon the sleep
of the spirits who rest in the valley of the moon on their
way to Heaven?
`I do believe that I have seen this river before. It
satisfies something in my heart like a recollection.
Every feature in its Elysium of a valleyrock and tree,
bank and waterhas moved my memory like
something
I imperfectly recollect. One of two things is
certainI have seen all this before, or, there is a
degree
of beauty which stirs the spirit by its
approximation
to something with which it has been familiar. How
manymany feelings of this kind have we which we
never define, but which, without a theory of previous
existence, are perfectly unaccountable! How often do
whole trains of thoughtwild and unutterable thought
pass through the mind, every shade of which is familiar,
while we know, perfectly, from the very nature and
cause of suggestion, that never before in this world
could they have been felt or engendered. Is it true,
after all, that this is not the beginning of our existence?
Is it true, that the magnificent idea of a series of
existences
,
ascending, and innumerable as the stars in
heaven, is not visionary and idle? that, as the great
Wordsworth says,
Our birth is but a sleep and a forgetting;
The soul that rises with us, our life's star,
Hath had elsewhere its setting,
And cometh from afar.
Not in entire forgetfulness,
And not in utter nakedness,
But trailing clouds of glory do we come
From God who is our home.
`How much more sublime than ever, if this is true,
is his address to a child:
Thou whose exterior semblance doth belie
Thy soul's immensity!
Thou best Philosopher, who yet dost keep
Thy heritage, thou eye among the blind!
That, deaf and silent readst the eternal deep;
Haunted forever by the eternal mind!
Mighty prophet! Seer blest!
On whom those truths do rest
Which we are toiling all our lives to find,
In darkness lost, the darkness of the grave;
Thou, over whom thy immortality,
Broods like the day, a master o'er a slave,
A presence which is not to be put by;
Thou little child, yet glorious in the might
Of heaven-born freedom, on thy being's height,
Why with such earnest pains dost thou provoke
The years to bring the inevitable yoke,
Thus blindly with thy blessedness at strife?
Full soon thy soul shall have her earthly freight
And custom lie upon thee with a weight
Heavy as frost and deep almost as life!
`Dear Tom, I have bored you with my
Pythagoreanism
,
but it has brooded on me all day, and I must tell
somebody. Fritz would laugh at it, and Charles is an
unbeliever, and what could I do?
`This morning we had one of those thin, watery
atmospheres which are peculiar to the rivers. Apart
from the pleasure of breathing itfor to me its rarity is
like exhilirating gasit threw me into a mood of
delicious
mysticism. The decided outlines of the scenery
were lost or softened away, and, with the quiet motion
of the boat, it was not difficult to believe every rock a
gray ruin, and the apparent gliding by of the tall trees
the stalking of giant phantasms. It was an atmosphere
in which Ossian would have seen Temora like a
spirit of Heaven, half folded in the skirt of a cloud,
or have sung, Rest in thy shadowy cave, O Sun!
Thou shalt sleep in the clouds, careless of the voice of
the morning.
`Tom! did you never wish you were the Wandering
Jew, and could live forever?'
The remaining part of the letter was written by my
chum. It is principally a description of one of Horace's
practical jokesan amusement of which he was sadly
fond. I do not approve of telling idle stories, but it brings
out a trait or two of Job's character, and is, literally,
and without embellishment, true. The captain of the
canal packet  has since gravely told me the story as
he understood itof course with some slight variations.
Charles thus describes it.
`Yesterday you know was Sunday. It was one of
those hushed, breathless mornings that seem peculiar to
the Sabbath. Job had put on his black coat and a white
cravat out of respect to the day, and was sitting alone
on the forecastle in a brown study. The passengers
were all reading or asleep; the pretty Quaker looked
serious, and Fritz was horribly
ennuied
.
`Egad, Charles, said he, thrusting his hands into
his pockets after a long yawn, and eyeing Job with that
quizzical expression of his, does n't he look like a
parson?
`Presently he gave one of his portentous laughs and
turned suddenly on his heel.
`Captain, said he, addressing him gravely as he
stepped upon deck, that gentleman yonder in a black
coat is a Methodist clergyman. You see how he sits
and thinks. His mind is very uneasy about travelling
on Sunday. He says it would be a relief to him if he
could preach to the passengers, and he wanted me to
ask your permission. Now if you 've any objection
`Not the least, said the captain, bowing politely;
I'll propose it to the passengers.
`He went below and stated the request. No
objection
was made, and after moving the table to the upper
end of the cabin and placing the desk upon it for an
extempore pulpit, he came again upon deck. Fritz stood
by with a look of immoveable gravity.
`All 's ready below, Sir, said the captain, coming
up to Job, and touching his hat respectfully.
`Sir? said Job.
`All 's ready for the sermon, Sir.
`Sermon? said Job.
`Yes, Sir, the passengers will be happy to hear you.
`Hear me! `a sermon!' why, I 'm not a clergyman!
`The captain turned to Fritz. He met him with a
look of profound astonishment. The captain was
staggered
.
Fritz touched his forehead significantly and
shook his head.
`Aha! said the captain, comprehending; and he
went below and announced that there would be no
service
,
as the preacher was taken suddenly ill.
`Now, Job, said Fritz, as soon as the captain was
gone, I 've told him you 're a preacher.
`Why, Fritz!
`No matter nowhe 's in a devil of a passion and
has gone down for his pistols. If you do n't read a
sermon, I must fight himthat 's poz.
`Job was in a cold sweat. The idea of a duel was
too horrible! But then to read a sermon to forty people
in a canal boat!and perhaps they would ask him to
pray! He hesitatedit was a dreadful alternative!
`So, said Fritz, buttoning up his coat and looking
determined, I must fight, I see.
`Oh no, Fritzno! I 'llI 'llI 'll read the
sermon
come,
FritzI 'll read itbutbutdo n't fight,
do n't fight!
`Thank you!thank you! exclaimed Fritz, with
warmth, and pulling out a rank Universalist sermon
which he had found in the cabin, he gave it to Job, and
went in search of the captain.
`After explaining to him that the minister was now
in a lucid interval, and had again expressed a wish to
VOL. II. 10
preach, the proper arrangements were made, and Job,
trembling like a leaf, went down with the sermon in
his hand.
`It looked very appalling. The passengers were
seated on each side of the cabin in two long rows. A
large Bible lay on the desk, and a glass of water had
been set beside it by the captain, who was fearful of a
return of the malady.
`Job's knees knocked together as he rose. He
opened the sermon and read the text in a tremulous
voice.
`He has forgot the prayer! whispered the
captain
poor
fellow!
`Job went on. The sentiments grew bold. The old
woman with the ear trumpet, who sat at a little distance,
moved nearer. It grew worse and worse. The old
lady looked at her trumpet. There was no obstruction.
She moved close up to him. There came a flat
assertion
that hell was a mere bugbear. Up jumped the
old lady
`You a Methodist minister!
You
a Methodist
minister! How dare you call yourself a Methodist
minister, you Universalist, you!
`Job turned to the titlepage. He had not understood
a word of what he had read. Sure enough, it was a
Universalist sermon. He gave Fritz a look of
indescribable
distress, hurled the sermon indignantly out of
the cabin window, and rushed upon deck.
`Crazy!crazy as a loon! exclaimed the captain,
as he stepped into the middle of the cabin to apologize.
But we are at Rochester, so
Yours, my dear Tom,
Charles
.'
AUTUMN MUSINGS.
BY GEORGE LUNT.
Come
thou with me!if thou hast worn away
All this most glorious summer in the crowd,
Amid the dust of cities and the din,
While birds are caroling on every spray
If, from gray dawn till solemn night's approach,
Thy soul hath wasted all its better thoughts,
Toiling and panting for a little gold,
Drudging amid the very lees of life,
For this accursed slave that makes men slaves
Oh! come with me, into the pleasant fields;
Let Nature breathe on us and make us free.
For thou shalt hold communion, pure and high,
With the great Spirit of the universe.
It shall pervade thy soul; it shall renew
The fancies of thy boyhood; thou shalt know
Tears, most unwonted tears, dimming thine eyes;
Thou shalt forget under the old brown oak,
That the good south wind and the liberal west
Have other tidings than the songs of birds,
Or the soft news wafted from fragrant flowers.
Look out on nature's faceand what hath she
In common with thy feelings? That brown hill
Upon whose side, from the gray mountain ash
We gathered crimson berrieslooked as brown
When the leaves fell twelve autumn suns ago.
This pleasant stream, with the well shaded verge,
On whose fair surface have our buoyant limbs
So often played, caressing and caressed
Its verdant banks are green as then they were
So, went its bubbling murmur down the tide.
Yes, and the very treesthose ancient oaks,
The crimson-crested maple, waving elm,
And fair smooth ash, with leaves of graceful gold
Look like familiar faces of old friends.
From their broadbranches drop the withered leaves
Drop, one by one, without a single breath,
Save when some eddying curl round the old roots
Twirls them about in merry sport awhile.
They are not changed; their office is not done;
The first free breeze of spring shall see them fresh,
With sprouting twigs bursting from every branch,
As should fresh feelings from our withered hearts.
Scorn not the moral;for while these have warmed
To annual beauty, gladdening the fields
With new and ever glorious garniture,
Thou hast grown worn and wastedalmost gray,
Even in thy very summer. 'T is for this
We have neglected Nature! wearing out
Our hearts and all life's dearest charities,
In the perpetual turmoil, when we need
To strengthen and to purify our minds
Amid the venerable woods; to hold
Chaste converse with the fountains and the winds!
So should we elevate our souls; so, be
Ready to stand and act a nobler part
In the hard, heartless struggles of the world.
Day wanes; 't is autumn's eventide again;
And, sinking on the blue hill's breast, the sun
Spreads the large bounty of his level blaze,
Lengthening the shades of mountains and tall trees,
And throwing blacker shadows o'er the sheet
Of this dark stream, in whose unruffled tide
Waver the bank shrub and the graceful elm,
As the gray branches and their trembling leaves
Catch the soft whisper of the coming air.
So doth it mirror every passing cloud,
And those which fill the chambers of the west
With such strange beauty, fairer than all thrones,
Blazoned with barbarous gems and gorgeous gold.
I see thy full heart gathering in thine eyes;
I see those eyes swelling with precious tears;
But if thou couldst have looked upon this scene
With a cold brow, and then turned back to thoughts
Of traffic in thy fellows' wretchedness,
Thou wert not fit to gaze upon the face
Of Nature's naked beautymost unfit
To look on fairer things, the loveliness
Of earth's unearthly daughters, whose glad forms
And glancing eyes do kindle the great souls
Of better men to emulate pure thoughts,
And, in high action, all ennobling deeds.
But lo! the harvest-moon! she climbs as fair
Among the clustered jewels of the sky,
As, mid the rosy bowers of paradise,
Her soft light, trembling upon leaf and flower,
Smiled on the slumbers of the first-born man.
And, while her beauty is upon our hearts,
Now, let us seek our quiet home, that sleep
May come without bad dreams; may come as light
As to that yellow headed cottage boy,
Whose serious musings, as he homeward drives
His sober herd, are of the frosty dawn
And the ripe nuts, which his own hand shall pluck.
10 *
Then, when the lark, high courier of the morn,
Looks from his airy vantage o'er the world,
And, by the music of his mounting flight,
Tells many blessed things of gushing gold
Coming in floods over the eastern wave,
Will we arise, and our pure orisons
Shall keep us in the troubles of the day.
THE CAMP MEETING.
On
the sixteenth day of September, in a memorable
year, a Camp Meeting was appointed. It was to take
place not many miles from New York, and great
preparations
were making. Notice was given in every
direction. The religious and the irreligious, the devout
and the curious, alike convened at the time appointed,
with equal impatience, though not with the same
motives
.
To the pious Methodist it was to be a season of
prayer, of holy communion, of divine influences, of deep
self-abasement and of inward strivings. To the idle
and restless it was merely a method of beguiling time.
To the vulgar and profane it afforded opportunities
for carousal, for foolish jests, and licentious conduct.
Every precaution was, as usual, taken for securing the
band of Christians who encamped from riot and intrusion,
but beyond the lines expressly marked for their purpose
they could have no control, and the road was bordered
for several miles by wagons, by booths where liquor was
sold and distributed, and by mountebanks and fiddlers.
The spot selected for the encampment was a green
valley. On one side of it arose grass-covered hills,
and on the other flowed a clear, deep, and rapid stream.
The tents, amounting to several hundred, were pitched
on the hills around. Some of them were of plain white
cloth, others of a more fanciful form, and diversified by
stripes of red or blue. A stage, which answered for a
pulpit, was erected of plain broads and placed on the
banks of the water. It was large enough to contain
five or six preachers at once, and had a flight of steps
ascending to it. In front of this were seats arranged in
rows, with aisles dividing them, the men sitting on one
side, the women on the other. The seats covered a
great extent of ground, and rose gradually, conforming
to the hill, back, so that the last row of seats overlooked
the whole.
It was not till the evening of the second day that the
meeting was general, and all the tents pitched. A shrill
blast was then blown from a trumpet, and the people
quitted their tents, where they had established their
domestic comforts, and took their seats fronting the
pulpit, which was filled by preachers. So far, the
scene was noble and picturesque. The multitude, as
you looked down from the hills around, was countless.
They had, like the children of Israel, pitched their tents
in the wilderness, and stood waiting on the banks of
Jordan till they might cross to the land of spiritual
promise. All was solemn and impressive. Even the
scoffers, if such there were, were awed into silence.
The moon rose in the heavens with unshorn majesty,
its silver rays reflected by the stream, and forming a
beautiful contrast to the red light that glared from lamps
suspended from the trees, or raised aloft by poles.
The meeting was opened by fervent prayer. Every
hearer was still and mute. One preacher after another
arose and addressed the audience. Sometimes a deep,
low groan was heard, but the work appeared to linger.
The language of the preacher became more and more
vehement. At length a pale young man rose up, and
commenced in a melodious and commanding tone.
`Why tarry ye, O Lord God of Hosts? Why tarry
ye? Gird on thy sword and come forth! Call on the
young men and the maidensthe infant that is just
opening upon the morning of life, and the hoary head
that is sinking with the last rays of evening. Tell them
that the reaper is comethat even now the chaff is to
be separated from the wheat! Tell them that the day
of judgment is at hand! It is at hand!' he exclaimed,
with vehemence, and striking on the thin boards of the
pulpit with a force that resounded to the most distant
tents, while the sweat fell in drops from his face. `The
day of judgment
has
come! Howl and gnash your teeth!
Call on the mountains to cover you! flee! hide
yourselves
!
the Avenger has come! the Lord is hereHe
is hereHe is here!'
Shrieks of `He is here!' `He is here!' resounded
from every part of the valley, as the preacher, exhausted
by his own emotion, sunk back upon the seat, and
covered his face. The work was now begun. Many
a poor wretch felt that there was no hope for him, and
declared that the fire was already consuming his soul.
A ring was formed round the pulpit, and those who were
`under conviction' brought into it. Some continued
screaming and calling for mercy until they suk under
the violence of their excitement and fell upon the ground,
motionless and apparently dead. Others, with uplifted
voices, sung rapturous hymns of joy over the fallen
convicts, and others burst out into loud and vehement
shouts of `Glory! glory! glory!'
As it approached midnight, it was thought best by
those who were least excited, to dissolve the meeting.
The apparently lifeless were borne to the tents to which
they respectively belonged. In some of the tents the
voice of prayer, of praise, of deprecation, and
self-condemnation
was still heard, but, in most, the flesh had
overcome the spirit, and tables were set out with
provisions
,
which they hastily swallowed, and then flung
themselves on their beds of straw and slept profoundly.
One only was left upon the ground. It was a young
girl of a fair and delicate complexion. Her dress
did not resemble that of the Methodists, but was of a
fashionable and rich texture. Her mind had evidently
yielded to the general excitement, and she lay in an
obscure
spot, overcome by her emotion, and her face still
wet with the tears she had shed, of penitence or terror.
It is possible she might have remained in this situation
till morning, had not one solitary wanderer passed that
waythe young preacher who had first kindled the
flame that had spread so widely. He had remained, in
imitation of our Saviour, to watch and pray, regardless
of hunger or fatigue, until his hair was damp with the
dew of the night.
Perhaps when he first saw the form of the beautiful
being who obstructed his path, he imagined that the
angels had come to minister unto him. He stopped,
however, and gazed upon her with a surprise that
partook
more of earth than heaven, then, bending over her,
he exclaimed, `Awake, O sleeper, awake!' His voice
roused her from her insensible, dreaming state, and,
raising
herself on her elbow, she looked wildly about her.
`Oh! what will become of me,' said she, bursting
into a flood of tears, `what will become of me!'
There is something in real feeling that speaks to the
heart. The preacher quitted his solemn, inflated
language
,
and said, in a natural tone, `I will conduct you
to your tent.'
He attempted to raise her, but she was powerless.
`I will go and get help to carry you,' said he, kindly;
but she caught his arm, and intereated him not to leave her
alone. He shrunk from her touch. Strange thoughts
crossed his mind. It was true, the being before him
looked innocent and lovely, but she might be Lucifer or
some other fallen angel. Christ was tempted in the
wilderness, and his heated imagination had already
drawn a parallel between himself and the Saviour of
the world. With uplifted hands he knelt and prayed.
The tears of the young girl again fell in torrents; her
sobs became audible; it was evident that emotion
wrought powerfully upon her mind. The terrors of
conscience again returned; she called herself the most
vile, the most abandoned of creatures. Such language
was music to the ears of the pious preacher. He no
longer dreaded a mortal, humbled by the sense of her
own guilt. He ceased to use the treatenings and
denunciations of the gospel. He talked to her of mercy
and pardon, and, as he gazed upon her tender and
innocent
face, believed they might be in store for her.
Various were the alternations of her countenance. It
seemed to accommodate itself to the language of the
preacher. When he prayed it was sublimed by devotion;
when he spoke of future punishment and an avenging
God, it was the image of terror, and, when he again
changed his theme and talked of the joy and peace of
those who were brought out of darkness into marvellous
light, of the happiness of the regenerate soul, then it
glowed with hope and enthusiasm.
The preacher was interrupted by the approach of a
woman, who expressed her joy at finding the young girl,
said she had gone to one of the tents when the people
dispersed, had fallen asleep, and did not miss her till she
awoke from her first nap. It appeared as if she had some
authority, for the girl took her offered arm, and, turning
to the preacher, said, `Pray for me! O pray for me!'
and, supported by the woman, quitted the spot.
The young man remained alone. The light of one lamp
after another gradually expired, and even the moon had
sunk behind the hill before he aroused from his reverie.
All at once starting up, he walked with a hurried and
rapid pace till he entered one of the distant tents.
The next morning the trumpet again resounded, and
the multitude collected. The young preacher spoke
with even more fervor than on the evening before, and
the same excitement was produced by his voice and
language. His eye wandered over the wide extent of
seats, but he looked in vain for the evening convert.
He ventured upon a few inquiries concerning her, but
she had been unregarded and unknown.
The meeting continued several days, but the young
convert was seen no more. Yet her image haunted the
mind of the preacher; his first doubts returned; he
thought anew of the temptations that beset the christian
pilgrim on his journey. Even the seeming innocence
and beauty of the object brought stronger conviction
to his mind that she might be employed by the fiend
of darkness. Perhaps he felt that he could not have
selected a more ensnaring form. The consciousness
that she clung to his thoughts, that her image sometimes
mingled even in his very prayers, and then again her
sudden disappearanceall seemed to him like mystery,
and filled him with dismay. He almost expected to
meet her in his lonely walks. In the night he dreamt
of her and awoke with the conviction that the enemy
of man was wrestling for his soul. His watchings and
prayers were redoubled; his life became more austere,
and his habits were those of self-denial and restraint.
To the eyes of his followers he was already a siant, but
he himself knew that he was a sinful, erring man.
This deep and vital sense of his own infirmities, of
the wanderings of his mind, of his need of a quickening
spirit, gave force and energy to his language, and
sensibility
to the tone of his manly and eloquent voice.
Whenever he spoke in public, the meetinghouse was
thronged. His fame extended even to the circles of
fashion, and many a fair lady condescended to sit, side
by side, with her waiting woman, and submitted to
being
crowded by her footman, for the sake of hearing
this second Whitefieldfor so was the young Evans
called. Black eyes and blue forgot for a moment their
brilliancy, and came away dimmed by their own tears.
It was to one of these crowded audiences that the
preacher was pouring forth the fervor of his thoughts
with an eloquence and rapidity that put to scorn the
rules of rhetoric, when suddenly he stoppedhis eyes
became fixed and motionless, but not cast upward as if
to catch heavenly inspiration; his hands fell powerless
by his side, and, after an unsuccessful effort to proceed,
he sunk back into his seat.
Another preacher arose and made a concluding
prayer, and dismissed the audience. Evans had not
looked up. With his face buried in his hands, he
remained
till nearly all had left the building; then, with
slow and cautious glances, he gazed around; but he
saw not the form, which, to his enthusiastic imagination,
had come again to drag him downwards, to fill his mind
with earthly thoughts and alienate it from the blessed
visions of immortality. Slowly he descended the steps
of the pulpit and entered the porch; but he had nearly
fallen when he perceived the terrific object standing
near the door as if laying in wait for him; and yet,
when she approached him and extended her hand with
an ingenuous smile, he had not resolution to refuse it.
`It is a long while since we have met,' said the
young lady.
`Three years,' replied the preacher, not trusting
himself to look up.
`And yet,' said she, `that night is present to me as
if it were but yesterday.'
`I remember it well,' said he, in a low voice.
`Perhaps,' returned she, `you may think your zeal
was thrown away; but it was not wholly so. This is
not a place, however, to talk of experiences. If you
will appoint an hour to call at Mrs Rodman's in C
Street, who, I know, is one of your friends, I will
be there.'
`I have no time,' said he, coldly, `for worldly
appointments
.
My duty calls me to labor in the vineyard of
the Lord.'
`And does not your duty,' she replied with quickness,
`call you to gather fruit for the harvest?'
`I have but little hope,' said he, solemnly surveying
her gay and showy dress, `of that fruit which the world
has blighted.'
The color rose high in her cheeks, and her head was
thrown back with a slight
hauteur
that gave her plumes,
which the preacher considered the trappings of vanity,
additional motion. He turned to go. Her momentary
resentment subsided, and she hastily said, `I shall be at
yours and my friend, Mrs Rodman's, tomorrow morning
at ten o'clock. Perhaps you may come; if not, I, at
least, shall have done my duty,' and with an air of
dignity, she passed him.
He was bewildered as he gazed after her. They
were the same features; it was the same voice; but he
could not realize how three years could have wrought
such a change in her manner and language. The
trembling
,
timid girl now stood before him, a full grown,
VOL. II. 11
elegant, self-possessed woman. He knew not how
intercourse
with fashionable life and the adulation of the
world substitutes, for the diffidence of youth, an air of
conscious importance. The native power of his own
mind prevented his feeling worldly inferiority before this
pupil of fashion, but he had unconsciously assumed
more deference of manner.
After some reflection he determined to meet her the
next morning. She was no longer dangerous in his
view, for she now appeared to him like the gaudy
beauties
who walk Broadway by thousands, and on whom
he seldom glanced. Yet he was convinced that her
mind was once tender and open to conviction, and perhaps
the grace of God might again revisit it. At all events,
it could not injure him to converse with her, and
possibly
it might benefit her.
In the mean time, Frances Randolph, for so was the
former convert and now one of the reigning beauties
called, waited with impatience for the appointed hour.
She had, from childhood, been left to her own
guidance
.
Her mother died when she was young, and she
had been taken from school to preside over her father's
splendid and hospitable table. She had money at will,
was full of enterprise and talent, and, though deficient in
the acquirement of knowledge, and the best purposes of
education, yet she possessed sufficient materials to
dazzle
and captivate. The rumor of the Camp Meeting had
excited her curiosity, and, attended by an old domestic
who was subservient to her wishes, she had
accomplished
her purpose of attending it. It was not surprising
that her mind had partaken of the general enthusiasm,
and, as has been already seen, she bid fair to become
one of the most zealous of the converts. But the
domestic
who attended her, alarmed by the effect produced
upon her young mistress, resolutely refused to stay a
day longer, and early in the morning they quitted the
camp ground. The impression soon faded from her
imagination
,
but when, three years after, she recognised
in the celebrated Evans, the same preacher who had
so much excited her feelings, she determined to indulge
a new whim by seeing and conversing with him.
Evans, in the mean time, passed a restless and
agitated
night, and the emotion excited by an earthly object
was renewed with additional violence. He had been
early placed under the guidance of an uncle, who was a
Methodist preacher, and his own glowing and ardent
mind led him naturally to pursue the same profession.
He had talked and preached of the great enemy of
mankind who went about like a roaring lion seeking
whom he might devour, till he seemed to believe him
omnipotent. True, he would have shrunk with horror
at the idea of making him the ruler of the universe;
yet those who listened to his impassioned eloquence
came away less impressed with the consoling thought of
redeeming mercy, of a tender and watchful parent ever
ready and willing to aid, than of the horrible dominion
of the prince of darkness, the adversary of souls.
Frightful visions haunted Evans through the night, and,
in the morning, when the appointed hour arrived, the
distress of conflicting emotions rested on his
countenance
.
But how did it vanish before the bright and
beaming smiles and unrestrained welcome of the young
lady! Could anything unholy come in such a form?
`Lead me not into temptation,' is not merely the
prayer of a Christian, but of a philosopher and a sage;
of one who studies the influence of circumstances, of
character, and situation; who, in the strength and vigor
of manhood, has investigated his own resources; who
feels that it is wise to avoid a combat under which he
may sink, or at best gain an unprofitable victory.
Evans was ignorant of the customs and habits of the
gay world. His associations had been confined to the
class to which he belonged, and though many were
refined and polished, they knew nothing of the arcana
of fashion. Their thoughts and views were
heavenward
.
He, too, thought but little of any other world
than his own in which he lived, and that to which he
was journeying. He could form no idea how monstrous
must be the amalgamation of a Methodist convert and
a reigning belle in the same individual; and still less of
the versatile character of a fashionable woman, who
could at one moment dote on religion for its novel
excitement, and, the next, discuss a point of dress with
equal ardor. To him all that Frances said and thought
of herself was reality. She related to him the effect the
Camp Meeting produced upon her mind, and, perhaps
unconsciously, exaggerated the state of her feelings
when she assured him, that long after she labored
under the deepest conviction of sin and an inward
self-abhorrence
;
certain it is, that no one could have detected
this awakened state, not even the nicest observer, under
the tissue of gauze, flowers, and feathers, which still
continued to adorn the fair penitent, and made her the
`mould of fashion' when she walked Broadway or
fluttered in the ball room. He considered her as
compelled
to sacrifice to the world the best powers of her
nature; that she was chained by situation and habit,
and that it was his duty to assist her in breaking bonds
that would destroy her forever.
It is possible, had she been left wholly to his influence,
he might have succeeded; but more congenial, though
not so novel excitements, were constantly operating.
When she quitted the preacher with her heart warmed
by his eloquence, it was to listen to the seducing voice
of flattery and ambition. She attended the Methodist
meetings as often as she could without exciting
observation
,
or when they did not interfere with some alluring
invitation or splendid public ball. Much time, however,
she certainly gave to Evans, and, while her pious friend,
Mrs Rodman, rejoiced in the progress she viewed her
as making towards heavenly perfection, she little thought
how much of vanity had mingled in her attention to it.
With Evans, weeks and months passed rapidly on.
He had ceased to think of temptation or danger; but,
now that he felt secure, earthly hopes were fast
undermining
his heavenly aspirations. Perhaps he had no
precise view in his intercourse with the young lady; yet
her image filled his waking and his dreaming thoughts.
He loved to listen to the history she gave of her own
emotions; and how could it be otherwise when they
were excited by himself? Could he help, in return for
this communication, expressing his own fervent wishes
for her happiness both here and hereafter, that a creature
so lovely, so fashioned after the image of the Creator,
should prove herself worthy of her high destination?
By degrees they talked almost wholly of themselves.
It was after one of these interesting conversations when
Miss Randolph had left the preacher absorbed in the
dreams of his own imagination, in which were mingled
the brightest pictures of love and domestic happiness,
that Mrs Rodman quietly entered and took her seat.
After a few attempts at conversation, she remained
silent at her work, for she would not disturb the
reflections
of the preacher. She was convinced that they
were intense and sublime. Sometimes, however, she
stopped and gazed upon his face. It was lighted by an
emotion she had never seen beforenot even in the
pulpit. The good lady was not in the habit of analyzing
expression; if she had been, perhaps she might have
discovered that there was more of earth than heaven
in the thoughts and recollections that lingered there.
Women are not given to obstinate taciturnity. Once
11 *
more Mrs Rodman renewed her attempts at
conversation
,
and with much more success than before.
`I am thinking,' said she, `what a wonderful change
has taken place in Frances Randolph. She has been
to two class meetings within a short time, and I am sure
she would rather attend one of our love-feasts than any
of the balls or plays she used to be so fond of. Oh!
Mr Evans, you have been a blessed instrument in this
work! I wish she could be the means of bringing her
father to convictionher husband, I have no doubt,
she will'
`Her husband!' said Evans, looking at the speaker
with astonishment.
`Why, yes,' said Mrs Rodman, `you know she is to
be married next month to a son of Mr Reid, the rich
merchant.'
`Impossible!' said Evans.
`Why, it does seem strange,' replied she, `but I have
no doubt she expects to convert him. You know it is
said in scripture, The believing wife shall convert the
unbelieving husband.'
The preacher's countenance did not light up with any
expression of hope or joy that corresponded to the good
woman's, but, bidding her good morning, he hastened
to his home.
The veil was now lifted. He felt that it was the
creature, and not the Creator, he had been worshipping.
It was long before he could realize that the lesson was
a salutary one. Bitter was his struggle, but his religion
had been too vital, too sincere, and too much ingrained
in his very existence, not to conquer. After a few days
had passed, in which Frances was surprised that he did
not meet her as usual, he sent the following note;
`I learnt a few days since that you were soon to be
married. I accuse you of nothingbut we meet no
more. You have been a more dreadful tempter to me
than I had at first feared. I have devoted those powers
to you, which ought to have been devoted wholly to the
service of God. Farewell!'
When the note arrived Miss Randolph was arraying
herself for a `Greek ball.' She had made a sort of
compromise
between her Methodist views and the charitable
designs of the gala. `Even Evans,' thought she, `would
approve of my giving a few dollars to the suffering
Greeks,' and she surveyed herself with peculiar
complacency
in the whole length mirror that was lighted by
girandoles and stood in a recess in her chamber.
Her dress was unusually splendid. She had felt fully
justified in sparing no expense that might make her look
lovely in the cause of virtue, and resolved, with many
other belles and beaux, to spend her strength that night
in the cause of humanity, and dance till the morning
dawned. It is to the ingenuity of the present age that
we owe the happy invention of making `charity its own
reward.'
Miss Randolph extended her slender arm loaded with
braceletsall in the cause of the Greeksand took the
note from her servant. She broke the seal, and, turning
to a lamp, read its contents. For the honor of human
nature it must be recorded that she fell into a strong
hysteric. She gave up the Greek ball, and her lover
called for her in vain.
In about three months after the reception of the note,
Evans saw in the newspaper an account of the marriage
of Mr Reid and Miss Randolph. It was the last pang
he felt on her account. No recital of balls, dress, or
wedding cake reached his ear. Her walk and his were
widely different. She went on in the broad path of
fashion; he returned to his accustomed habits, a better
and a wiser man.
THE HUDSON.
BY H. PICKERING.
Imperial
Flood! on thy romantic banks
I waked to life and joy; but ah! too soon
Was exiled thence; and now, when the soft morn
Which shed its rosy light upon my youth
Is past, and gathering clouds involve the day,
I come a weary wanderer to thy brink
To kiss thy wave. Oh! would to Heaven that thou
Wert still the same as when my infant eyes
Unconsciously upon thy waters gazed
And I unaltered too! Half that warm prayer,
Sighing, I well may breathe; but can a few
Swift circling suns in thee produce a change?
As proudly onward roll thy waves to-day,
As when a thousand years ago they poured
Their tribute to the sea; but where are now
Thine ancient honors? where thy wood-crowned heights?
Thy sylvan banks umbrageous?He who first
Into thy trackless deep dared urge his prow,
And saw shoot like a meteor o'er thy tide,
The Indian skiff, and wild eyes peering out
The densest shadesbeheld thee, Mighty Stream!
In all thy grandeur. Mountains that beneath
Thy undiscoverable depths extend
Their giant feet, then far in the blue heavens
Precipitous rose with their incumbent woods;
And lofty verdurous tufts, more beautiful
Than aigret upon Soldan's diadem,
Crowned each bold crag; while from thy northern founts
E'en to the ocean's brim, dark forests spread,
Which, waving with the breeze of even or morn,
Alternate threw their broad continuous shade
O'er half thy watery realm. Look now abroad!
For lo! o'er all the rich productive glebe,
Upland or champaign smooth, where towered superb
The vegetable kings, cedar, and larch,
And fir, and statelier oakall that e'er bloomed,
Or yet shall bloom in songthe procreant power
Of cultivation reigns, and virgin fields
That never drank the sun, with harvests wave,
On the slant hill the orchard slow matures
The golden apple, and the trees of climes
Far distant, while they yield a penury
Of shade, shower fruits and blossoms o'er the land.
Mutation strange! by other eyes than mine
Careless beheld; and by the aid alone
Of thine, indulgent Fancy, now revealed.
Yet must I love ye still, my native banks,
And still admire; and thou, Exuberant Flood!
That laugh'st to see wild-bounding from above
Thy mountain torrents, and, to thy embrace,
Through tangled thicket and through secret dell,
Lurest every bashful and pellucid stream
How dost thou win my heart! Thy shores, indeed,
Have been despoiled; and bowing 'neath the axe,
Trees that for ages on thy mist-robed hills
Had borne their leafy glories in mid heaven,
Have thundered to the vales. But shall not man
Grow wise? for nature, with maternal care,
A tenderer growth has reared; and many a grove,
The sacred relic of our ancient woods,
Still sees itself depictured in thy wave.
And yet, Majestic River! should the blast
Of desolation sweep thy utmost bounds,
E'en then, amid the waste, thou must possess
Enduring grandeur. Now, two glorious forms,
Beauty and Majesty, o'er thee preside
Inseparable; and, whether the morn
Silvers thy waves, or with the setting sun
They glow with crimsonwhether calm, or lashed
By tempests into foamthou hast for me
Inimitable charms. But when the moon
Lifts her bright circlet o'er yon shadowy hills,
And wraps thee in her light, while not a breath
Steals o'er thy waters, and night's mantle falls
Upon the woods, and deepest solitude
And silence reign, and heaven and earth seem drawn
Insensibly to eachhow is my soul
To ecstasy then kindled! Brighter scenes,
And varied more, with the first beams of day,
Flash on the eye. Then restless life awakes;
The husbandman elated hies afield;
Wanton the flocks upon the green hill side,
And mount and valley ring. Far o'er the plains,
In every dell, and on each gentle slope,
Its modest front some peaceful cot uprears;
Bosomed in trees, upon the broad flood's marge,
The ambitious villa stands; and hamlets, towns
And cities stretch along the extended shores,
While with light wings, as if with life endued,
Swift o'er the wave the graceful shallop glides;
And ever and anon, breasting the surge
With a resistless might, comes rushing by
Some ark magnificentto every eye
A form of wonderand by power occult,
Reckless of winds and tide, urged through the deep!
The praise, immortal Fulton! be to thee;
For though my country still with coldness lists
The claim of gratitude to thee and thine,
Science and Poesy shall aye delight
To crown thy bust with never fading bays.
But now, while yet the invigorating breeze
Flies o'er the hills, yon steepy way attempt
With foot adventurous, and exulting climb
The mountain's brow; or, if the toilsome path
Deter, on bright Imagination's wing
Ascend the towering Kaatskill, and through fields
Of heaven let the charmed sight excursive range.
Behold! the summit gained, the ravished soul
Breathing etherial air, feels its fine powers
Dilate, in thought yet soars, and meditates
A loftier flight. But to itself recalled,
With what ineffable delight the eye,
Yet heavenward turned, surveys the clear blue vault
And stainless ether! For, O wonder! see
The billowy clouds convolved below thy feet,
And thou as if upon a lonely isle
Amid the storm-rocked sea! And tumult wild
And storm are there; and hark! the thunder roars;
And yet another and a louder peal!
And lo! the winged lightning! how it darts
Athwart the shadowy deep! Flash after flash
Succeeds; and now 't is night beneath, and now
Insufferable day! The affrighted earth
Trembling beholds, and from her thousand hills
Sends back the thunder's note. At length 't is o'er!
The storm is lulled to peace; and day's glad beams
Piercing the gloom, effulgent looks the sky,
And renovated nature smiles serene.
Bright, glorious view! See where the land extends
On this side and on that, boundless as air;
Till the far hills, blending their soft blue tints
With the sky's azure, seem to mix and lose
Themselves in heaven. Within the ample round
Save the vast central ridge on which thou stand'st,
And here and there an isolated mount
All seems a smooth, extended plain, where each
Soft vale and gentle eminence, outspread
And level to the eye, with vivid green
Resplendent shine; while through the midst, stretched out
In longitude immense, the river streams
In one bright line to the far distant main.
Oh! that the Muse could aye attune her lyre
Mid rural scenes, and that war's clarion hoarse
Were never heard! But in no distant times
These banks, so peaceful now, by hostile feet
Were trod. The red man fought, and is at rest.
He fought, and in a noble causenot so
Our elder brothers. Free themselves, they aimed,
O strange! to forge for us, even heirs alike
Of freedom, the indissoluble chain.
Then mortal Hatred swelled! and Battle reared
His sanguine crest; and fields were won and lost;
But soon a memorable day arrived,
Whose close even distant realms beheld with awe;
When Saratoga's echoing hills proclaimed
In voice of thunder, `Victory is ours!'
Ah! hush that note of triumph; can it chill
The vanquished, or the conquering host once more
Arouse? Both sleep forgotten!Yet not all
Whose hearts were fired in freedom's cause may rest
Inglorious. Washington, whose patriot zeal,
Consummate prudence, and exalted soul,
Were all devoted to his country's weal,
In cloudless splendor through all time shall live;
While he, the Child of Glory! whose young brow
Immortal Wisdom stooped from heaven to crown
Whose death surprised a nation into tears
With that great name henceforth forever linked,
A like resplendant destiny will share.
But whither am I led? Return, my Muse,
Nor deem it alien from the theme, that thou,
The Emporium of this Bright New World, shouldst claim
One parting strain. How wondrous is thy rise!
But yesterday thou wast not; now thy port
By the green isles encircled, and through which
The Hudson ceaseless rolls his mighty flood
Is thronged with fleets innumerous! Say, what power,
What wizard's art hath called thee from the deep,
And compassed thee with glory round about?
How like a queen on her imperial throne
Thou look'st! nor less than regal is thy wealth
From various foreign lands and from thine own
Poured in, profuse. Oh! marvellous result
Of industry with enterprise combined,
And kindly intercourse with other climes!
Who may the future scan? What eye can read
Thy distant fortunes, Empress of the West?
Lo! in the magic mirror I uphold,
Thou seest thy ripening greatness; wide thy bounds
Extend, temples and palaces arise,
Arts flourish, and the pomp of luxury
Rolls through thy gorgeous streets. But in the heavens
Behold the appalling sign! and on it writ
In characters of fire`Carthage is not,
Nor Tyre, nor Sidonand their fate is thine!'
VOL. II. 12
THE SCHOOLMASTER.
`Priscian, a little scratched.'
On
a memorable day in August, I emerged from the
red schoolhouse on the Germantown road, where, for
sixteen years, I had trained the rising generations of
men in all the sciencesbut more particularly in the
knowledge of reading and writing.
Of my little scholars I took a mournful and affecting
leave, bestowing on them a parting address, betterthat
is, longerthan three hours, which it is my intention
to publish, as a specimen of eloquence in modern times.
It produced a great sensation among the benches, and
I had the pleasure of seeing many eyes as red as beets
with weeping, though I scorn to deny that I perceived,
simultaneously, the scent of an onion.
Packing my wardrobe in the crown of my hat, and
my coin in a small tobacco-box, I walked slowly and
sorrowfully down to the great city, which, like Babylon
of old, is of brick, and which was founded by a man
not unlike myself in his reverence for a right angle.
The city is a magnificent chess board; and if a knight
would advance thereon a mile, it is needful to turn thrice
to the right and as often to the left.
Let me not omit to premise, that I had, at
Germantown
,
cherished a tender sentiment till it threw a purple
light, chequered with shade, over my whole existence.
Therefore I resolved to journey westward, seeking
in aliquo abdito et longinquo rure
some `happy valley,'
where I could cultivate love without jealousy, or, in
other words, pass life without care. These at least
were the motives that I held out to the world; that is,
to half a dozen friends who inquired coldly whither I
would go; yet, doubtless, I was somewhat incited by
that restless national spirit, that leads so many to seek
Fortune beyond the mountains at the very moment
when the goddessthough I am no heathenbegins to
smile on them at home.
Though no sectarian in philosophy, I travelled as a
peripatetic. My only comrade was one, who, though
ranked among curs, is more faithful to his master than
some other dogs of higher lineage, and that wear richer
collars. His, however, was a `braw brass collar,'
bearing
his master's name, and his own, which was Jowler,
and a motto,
Cave Canem
, suggested by a great traveller
who had read it on a Roman threshold at Pompeii.
In my hand I ported a crabstick that I had cut in the
woods of Camden, and I carried in my pocket a ferule,
that had descended from my grandfather, and which,
therefore, I have tasted as well as administered. This
I took as a diploma, to be a passport to the confidence
and tables of the greatof esquires, judges, and
generals
,
titles, that, in a plain republic, where none seek
or refuse an office, often pertain to one fortunate man.
Indulge me with a last word concerning the ferule,
or, as Maro hath itfor I like a
new
quotation
`
Extremum hunc mihi concede laborem
.'
Generally I prefer it to the birch. In Latin I hold a
divided opinion; but in `rhetoric,' and its kindred
studies, it seems fitting and emblematical, to deal with
the `open palm.' Moreover, in `correcting' an offender
it is proper to look him in the face. If I see there a
sullen obstinacy, I am too much his friend to spare him;
but if I mark a manful resolution to bear the pain, and
a shrinking only from the disgrace, that is a boy after
my own heart, and he has little to suffer from the
severity of his master.
Thus attended and equipped, I went forth rejoicing,
for I had much to delight, and nothing to afflict me, till
I came to the Susquehanna, where, at Harrisburgh,
I lamented anew over the grave of a friend, Simon
Snyder, who had been governor of the commonwealth.
But that friendly man was dead, and probably decayed,
though there is authority no less than Shakspeare's
and the grave-digger gives the reasonthat `a
tanner
will last you some nine year.'
The Susquehanna is broad but not deep, and you
may, if you would perpetrate injustice, apply the same
character to me. It has a sonorous name, and is a
beautiful stream, bending, with a noble sweep, around
wild or cultivated hills, reflecting their pride, and
carrying
upon its waters the rich products of their soil.
Not far from York I ascended the South Mountain,
an outpost or advanced guard of the Alleghanies, and
time and travelling soon brought me to the main body.
I passed an hour at a rude village to which Indian
massacre has given the name of Bloody Run, and here I
studied diligently the features of a countenance entirely
seraphic. It was like the most celestial of Raffaelle's
Madonnas or the purest of Carlo Dolce's Saints. I had
not thought when I left Germantown behind, to find
such beings among the mountains. Yet this admiration
of what was beautiful and pure, had no connexion with
infidelity, and could not have offended the lady whose
ring the schoolmaster aspires to wear. It was but his
perception of the same qualities in another that are so
attractive in her, though in no other can they be, to him,
so amiable. I left the dark haired cherub with regret,
for I may never see another, or her, again.
At Bedford I entered the schoolhouse, making known
to the master my name and calling, and as much of my
life and opinions as might attract his regard, when the
kind soul seated me at his desk, pressing me to
examine
his school; and the examination I closed with a short
address.
He walked with me several miles, to the foot of the
Alleghany Ridge, but when I asked him to ascend it,
that good and grave man shook his head, for he was of
few words when signs could express his meaning.
I left him standing like a statue of Silence, while I
walked briskly on, animated with renewed benevolence
to the whole human race; for the kindness of that worthy
gentleman seemed to be transferred to my own soul.
This ridge gives its name to the mountains, and, to
geographers, the bold figure, `the backbone of the
United States;' but Uncle Sam has grown so much
from his original shape, that at present the spine is
somewhere in the side of that strong man.
Having reached the summit I looked down upon an
interminable valley or `glade,' where cultivation had
so much encroached upon the wilderness, that the rivers
reflected alternate forest and farm. Other ridges, blue
in the distance, lay before me, and the Laurel and
Chestnut gave names to the next.
On the bleak side of the Chestnut Ridge, I entered
a log cabin that had been the abode of misfortune,
where an old soldier retired to his miserable dole, and
shared it with the needy traveller; though seldom was
the most needy as poor as General St Clair. Fellow
citizens! it is neither generous nor just, when a man
has served us faithfully and long, to turn him out to
graze on the hill side like an old war horse that can no
longer charge; or to let him starve like an aged hound,
that has lost his teeth for an ungrateful master.
12*
The Alleghanies have little of the sublime, but much
of the beautiful. In wildness and abruptness they
cannot
be compared with the White Mountains. Yet,
when villages with red schoolhouses shall be sprinkled
over them, he must go far who would find a more
attractive country.
To me these mountains were charming and new, and
I loitered among them with a schoolboy lightness of
heart, careless of the future and oblivious of the past.
Often did I quit the road, attracted by the sound of a
waterfall or the coolness of a fountain, of which
thousands
are gushing from the rocks.
I could never, when alone, resist a ducklike
propensity
to play in running water, though I have frowned
upon the same pastime among the urchins of the school,
principally from a care of their health, but partly from
that unamiable principle that makes us so intolerant to
our own faults when we see them reflected in others.
It may sink me as a moral philosopher in your esteem,
as much as it would raise me as a good soul among my
scholars, to confess that I toiled half a day among the
mountains to make a dam across a little torrent, and
that, when I had completed this beaver-like monument,
I left it with the regret that all men feel when dismounted
from their hobby. Your own I believe to be Pegasus,
but seldom, as I think, have you reason for a similar
regret.
As I was sitting on a log, listening to the sounds of
my little waterfall,
`mellow murmur, and fairy shout,'
they seemed at intervals to be mingled with the tolling
of a distant bell, and it had great solemnity of effect, to
hear, in these solitudes of creation, the sound that man
has consecrated to the worship of the Creator.
Yet I knew that I was distant fifty miles from even
the rudest church, and this sound, to state the truth,
was too puzzling for satisfaction. I was forced to give
it up as a bad conundrum, lamenting that the senses,
with a little aid from fancy, lead us to error as well as
to truth, for, deciding by the ear, I could have almost
sworn that I had heard a `church-going bell.' Yet in
turning the angle of a rock I fell upon a little colony of
emigrants, and what I had listened to was but the bell
that tinkled from one of their herd; though, while it
lasted, my delusion was complete. So it is in other, and
in all things; therefore let us have more charity for the
opinions of others, and less confidence in the infallibility
of our own.
These people were hospitable as Bedouins, and
pressed a hungry traveller, who never stood upon
ceremony
,
to a supper of venison collops that would have
satisfied Daniel Boon.
As I swam with the current, I saw less of the stream
of emigration than I should have seen if going eastward;
yet I found emigrants of almost every European nation,
though, mostly, they were from the British Islands.
Among these were many Irish, though there were not
wanting the `men of Kent' or of `pleasant Tivi'dale.'
Some of them had flocks and herds, and others were no
richer than a pedagogue, and this is saying little for
their wealth. But it is a most unfortunate road for
charity. The fountains of benevolence are frozen,
where every man is a publican.
I once met at a Dutch tavern a humble old man,
who seemed to owe little gratitude to fortune. The
German boor repulsed his timid efforts at conversation,
for a Dutchman, though not always civil to a traveller
who has money, is invariably rude to him who has it not.
The poor man next solicited the acquaintance of my dog,
who very frankly wagged his tail in reply, for he is as
good natured, almost, as his master. As the veteran
seemed to have survived the last of his friends, and was
as venerable in front as Cincinnatus himself, I invited
him to share my supperit was not of turnipsand
had the pleasure of seeing him assail it as if he had
seldom fared so well.
There is, in the morning, a singular appearance about
the mountains. The body of mist, rising from the glades,
settles at a certain altitude, and, from above, it looks
like an ocean with islands; for the green summits of the
lesser hills rise above the vapor, and present to the eye
and the imagination an insular paradise; yet, when the
mist had arisen, like a veil from a pretty face, it was
not always to increase my admiration, for the fancy
discovered
beauties in the obscurity that the eye could
not find in the light of the sun.
On the summits of the mountains I beheld frequent
vestiges of the tempest in trees riven by lightning or
prostrated by the tornado; and they suggested, to a
humble pedestrian, the consoling reflection that the
highest are not the safest places. It was my fortune to
behold a war of the elements as awful as that which
assailed the demented monarch; but, like Lear, I was
near to a hovel one of the hospices erected for the
poor or benighted traveller, and there I rested through
the night, sheltered from the fury, but elevated and
appalled by the uproar of the tempest.
The next day the wind was still a hurricane, and as
I descended to the thick forests of the valley it was a
singular sight to behold the tops of the trees wrenching
in the gale, while not a leaf was stirred below.
Deep woods and solitudes have always inclined my
spirit to devotion. The `solemn temples' that the piety
of man has raised to the worship of his Maker, are less
impressive than a primeval forest; and among churches,
those that have the greatest devotional influence on the
mind are Gothic cathedrals, that owe half their
character
to their resemblance to a grove.
To sustain it in devotional duties, human weakness
requires the aid of local situation and solemn
ceremonials
.
The piety of even the devout Johnson was `
warmer
in the ruins of Iond' and the Liturgy of the
English
Church no less elevates the confidence of the
righteous, and inspires hope in others who pray to be
delivered from evil.
Having crossed the mountains, I descended the Ohio,
the most beautiful of rivers. The Alleghany is limpid
and swift, the Monongahela more turbid and slow. One
may remind you of a Frenchman, the other, of a
Spaniard
;
in their union, they may bring to your recollection
a grave and placid gentleman, who desires to take for
the better, a more joyous companion.
In this rich and wonderful valley of the West,
grandeur
is stamped upon the works of creation. What are
the meagre and boasted Tybur and Arno, the Illyssus and
Eurotas, to a stream navigable to three thousand miles,
and rolling, long before it meets the ocean, through a
channel of sixty fathom! What, but grottoes, are the
vaunted caves or catacombs of Europe, to the mighty
caverns of the Westcaverns that extend beneath
districts
wider than German principalities, and under rivers
larger than the Thames. Ye sun-burnt travellers! whose
caravans have rested under the shade of the banyan
while ye marvelled at the circuit of its limbscome to the
Ohio and see a tree that will shelter a troop of horse in
the cavity of its trunk.
A stroll even now upon the `Beautiful River,' will
explain the enthusiasm that led the first bold hunters of
the `Long Knife,' to the forests of the `Bloody Ground.'
Danger was but a cheap price, at which they enjoyed
the rich, wild profusion of the West, when it first
opened
to the admiration of civilized man.
It was my good fortune to see one of these aged sons
of the forest, who, in his youth, had loved danger and
venison better than Robin Hood; for Kentucky had
other rangers than guarded deer in Sherwood Forest.
The lands that he had taken in the wilderness now hold
a populous city, and have made the fortunes of his
counteless progeny. He had paid the purchase by
instalments
,
and when the dreaded day of payment
approached
,
he would stroll with his rifle a few hundred
miles to shoot an Indian for the bounty on his scalp.
I descended the river as I had hoped to pass through
lifesuffering no damage from the rapids, and lost in
admiration of the beauty of the banks. At Vevay in
the county of Swisserland I moored my bark, and have
cast anchor for life among a kind and simple race that
sing the
Ranz des vaches
in an adopted country,
hallowed
by names that remind them of their Alps.
P.
BENNETT'S BRIDGE.
BY JOSEPH H. NICHOLS.
This is a wild and picturesque pass of the Housatonic, about
twenty miles from its mouth, near the pleasant village of
Newtown
,
Connecticut. The river at this spot, after emerging from a
deep gap overhung by bold bluffs, separates, for some distance, into
three distinct streams, the banks of which are connected by three
lofty bridges in succession. The view in every direction is grand
and imposing. The fourth stanza alludes to the crossing of the French
army, under Count Rochambeau, at this place, in the war of the
Revolution, and which encamped for several days in this vicinity.
The very walnut trees beneath which the soldiers and the maids of
the village danced, are now standing, green and fruitful as ever.
Thou
beautiful, romantic Dell!
Thy banks of hemlock highlands swell,
Like huge sea billows, o'er the isles
Round which the branching river smiles.
Look up! how sombre and how vast
The shadows those dark mountains cast,
Making noon twilight; or, look down
The giddy depths, so steep and brown,
Where claret waters foam and play
A tinkling tune, then dance away.
Oft, with my oak leaf basket green,
On summer holidays serene,
Along your hill-sides have I strayed,
And, on the ground, all scarlet made,
Picked, in full stems, as low I kneeled,
Strawberries, rubies of the field,
Coming late home; or, in the flood,
Cooled the warm current of my blood;
While swam the house-dog after me,
With long red tongue lapt out in glee.
'T is glorious, here, at breaking day,
To watch the orient clouds of gray
Blush crimson, as the yellow sun
Walks up to take his purple throne,
And melts to snowy mists the dew
That kissed, all night, each blossom's hue,
Till, like a tumbling ocean spread,
They hide low vale and tall cliff's head,
And many a tree's fantastic form
Looks like some tossed ship in a storm.
How still the scene! yet, here war's hum
Once echoed wildly from the drum,
When waved the lily flower's gay bloom
O'er glittering troops with sword and plume,
Who, on the clover meadows round,
Their white tents pitched, while music's sound,
From horn and cymbal, played some strain
That oft had charmed the banks of Seine,
And village girls came down to dance,
At evening, with the youths of France.
Fair was the hour, secluded Dell!
When last I taught my listening shell,
Sweet notes of thee. The bright moon shone,
As, on the shore, I mused alone,
And frosted rocks, and streams, and tree,
With rays that beamed, like eyes, on me.
A silver robe the mountains hung,
A silver song the waters sung,
And many a pine was heard to quiver,
Along my own blue-flowing river.
TO THE ICE MOUNTAIN.
BY JAMES O. ROCKWELL.
Grave
of waters gone to rest!
Jewel, dazzling all the main!
Father of the silver crest!
Wandering on the trackless plain,
Sleeping mid the wavy roar,
Sailing mid the angry storm,
Ploughing ocean's oozy floor,
Piling to the clouds thy form!
Wandering monument of rain,
Prisoned by the sullen north!
But to melt thy hated chain,
Is it, that thou comest forth?
Wend thee to the sunny south,
To the glassy summer sea,
And the breathings of her mouth
Shall unchain and gladden thee!
Roamer in the hidden path,
'Neath the green and clouded wave!
Trampling, in thy reckless wrath,
On the lost, but cherished brave;
VOL. II. 13
Parting love's death-linked embrace
Crushing beauty's skeleton
Tell us what the hidden race
With our mourned lost have done!
Floating Sleep! who in the sun
Art an icy coronal;
And, beneath the viewless dun,
Throw'st o'er barks a wavy pall;
Shining Death upon the sea!
Wend thee to the southern main;
Bend to God thy melting knee,
Mingle with the wave again!
FIRST MEETING OF THE OLD AND NEW WORLD.
1492.
BY MRS SIGOURNEY.
She
comes! she comes! with her white sails spread,
With her banners proudly streaming,
With a haughty brow, and an eye of dread,
Through its darkened fringes beaming.
And who is she, mid these island shades,
Unshielded from wrong or danger,
Who hastes from the depth of her forest glades
To welcome the stately stranger?
Her glance heeds not the gathering storm;
In its simple joy it blesses,
And the grasp of her hand is as free and warm
As the wealth of her ebon tresses.
But the gold of her rivers shall turn to dust,
Ere from history's scroll hath faded,
The deeds of that visitant's savage lust,
Who thus her realm invaded.
Yes, many a pitying eye must weep
O'er the Old World's shameful story;
At the scourge which she raised o'er her sister's sleep,
And the blood that stained her glory.
EXTRACTS FROM A SEA BOOK.
BY SAMUEL HAZZARD.
`
You
must leave college,' said the doctor, with an
ominous shake of the head.
I was sitting in my rocking chair; my head bound up
with camphor, and my pulse going like a race horse.
`You must quit college, and that without delay.'
`Quit college!' exclaimed I; `dear doctor! your
remedy is worse than the disease. Quit college! why
I have been here but four months, and am just
beginning
to make a figure.'
`Let me tell you, Mark,' replied he with great
seriousness, `that if you stay here, you will be more
likely to figure at a funeral than at an examination.'
There was an earnestness in the doctor's manner that
quelled my impatience, and a chillness in the idea he
suggested, that went to my heart like a bolt of ice.
`But, my dear Pierson,' said I, in a low tone, almost
at a whisper, `do you really think my case dangerous?'
`It is not so bad as it might be, and as it will be,
unless you follow my directions.'
`And supposing it at the worst,' said I, `why should
not I stay here under your care? If there be on earth
a physician that can work my cure, you are surely
the man.'
`My dear boy,' replied he, solemnly, `I cannot
minister to a mind diseased. Let me ask, what can you
do here, if you stay?'
`True, doctor, I have studied none for a fortnight.
My eyes are spoiled, and my head does nothing but
ache.'
`Well, I know you well enough to say, that you
cannot stay here and witness the march of mind,
without wishing to join it.'
`True, doctor.'
`Well, then, let me tell you, that of all the disorders
incident to the human system, none does the physician
encounter with more reluctance, and with less success,
than an ambitious spirit chafing with the infirmities of a
diseased body. Medicine will do for a consumptive or a
rheumatic; but your hopeless lover and disabled scholar
are beyond its reach. Therefore, I say, be off as soon
as possible, and banish college and all its associations
from your mind.'
`A Herculean task, that last, doctor;' said I, with a
long drawn sigh. `What in nature shall I do with
myself
in my banishment? I cannot bear to be idle.'
`That is the very thing I would have you avoid.
You are already beset with a legion of blue devils; and
if you sit here moping over your misfortunes a week
longer, your head will be a rank Pandemonium. You
must not allow yourself to reflect upon the past. Your
thoughts must be all thrown forward; and better be
employed in building air-castles of rainbows and
moonshine
,
than conjuring up around you a desert peopled
with monsters.'
The zeal with which the doctor pressed his point
raised a smile, and melted down my stubbornness like
wax.
`Well, my dear friend,' said I, `you must do with
me as you please. What course shall I adopt in order
to resist the devil effectually?'
Dr Pierson mused a moment and then asked abruptly,
`Were you ever at sea?'
`Once. It was when my father brought me from my
native isle to this country. But I was a child then, and
it is fourteen years ago.'
`So much the better,' said he. `Come! we will
make a shipment of you home. The sea air shall brace
up your weakened nerves, and the novel scenes of ocean
and of the Antilles and the revival of early associations
shall divert your mind from its melancholy. What say
you, Mark,' continued he, giving me a cheerful slap on
on the shoulder, `will you go?'
`Do not doubt it, doctor,' I replied, rising and shaking
myself; `there are still some living in that distant land
who will rejoice to see the wanderer return, and give
him a West Indian welcome. I 'll go, doctor.'
`I will leave you then; and remember, stay not to
repent, but be off on the instant; and, my dear fellow,
may your voyage be prosperous, and may health and
friendship greet you on your arrival at your native land.'
My lot has been cast among strangers; but I thank
God, not in every instance among heartless strangers;
and occasionally have I found men like my good
physician
,
who, with a tenderness like a woman's, could
administer relief as if they felt compassion for the
13 *
sufferer. Reader! wert ever sick! Didst ever lose a
limb? If so, thou hast felt the truth of what I say.
But, to be drenched by some starved Lampedo, with a
face colored like his own jalap; or to be hacked and
carved like the carcase of an ox by a grim, bloodthirsty
ruffian, with no more feeling than his own scalpel
it always appeared to me strange that offended nature
could lend to such inhuman practitioners the
cooperation
of her genial influence. Yet are there eminent and
successful operators of this unamiable class. Science
and iron nerves overcome the repugnance of shrinking
humanity, and compel to their service the reluctant
nature. I grant it necessary that the `physician and
surgeon' should possess a sound mind, a steady hand,
and abundance of professional lore; but are either of
these incompatible with the external show of tenderness,
or inseparable from brute harshness and the insensibility
of a stump? And if, under these disadvantages, without
knowing how to touch a tender spot, or to handle a
`bruised reed,' a cure is sometimes effected, how much
more good might be wrought were this knowledge
oftener found united to the mechanical part of the
profession
!
How much more rapid would be the recovery
of the sick and wounded! How many tears of anguish
might be spared! How many lives saved!
Dr Pierson wrung my hand and left me. I could not
speak, for I loved him as a father. I then addressed
myself in earnest to my preparations, and in six hours
was ready for a voyage of six months. The weather
was thick and rainy, and I returned from the boat to
college. Judge of my surprise and indignation to find
my chum in the act of selling, for a trifling consideration,
the only token of affection which I had left with him,
my three-stringed fiddle. My poor old fiddle, that I
would not have exchanged for the royal harp of David!
I had become familiar with its cracked tones, and loved
it for its very oddity. Oh! human nature!
The `Seabird' was under weigh. As I went on
deck she was lying, with her canvass spread to court
the salutations of the rising breeze, midway between
Governor's and Staten Island. Day had just dawned,
and the gray mists of morning hung like a veil of
enchantment over the distant city, revealing faintly its
edifices, its spires, and the dense forests of spars that
lined its shores. An hundred vessels, which the
indications
of a favorable breeze had induced to quit their
moorings, lay motionless on every side of us, looking
like snow-white birds, who had come forth from their
secret places at that witching hour to sport on the
unruffled bosom of the bay. At that moment our sails
hung listlessly against the masts, and the exhalations
that curled upon the waters rose perpendicularly to the
upper regions of the air. Soon, however, they began to
flutter and chafe with the rigging as if impatient at the
tardy movements of the wind, till, as it came murmuring
from the Jersey shore, mist and ripples and ships were
moving swiftly towards a point, which, in the dimness of
the hour, seemed the opening into another world.
We soon reached it, and the perilous scene of our
future labors opened before us. Here our voyage was
to begin; and, with the idea, came the rush of emotions
which a landsman must always experience on launching
for the first time upon the bosom of the great deep.
I can hardly analyze my feelings of that hour; there
was a mixture of joy and regret in them.
I now turned to look for the lighthouse. It had
disappeared
;
and the vessels in whose company we had
sailed were scattered, like a frighted flock, towards
every corner of heaven. The breeze freshened; we
were shaping our solitary course for Turk's Island.
The highlands of Neversink, the last land seen on
leaving the coast, formed but a small arc in the immense
horizon, and, at length, the beams of the setting sun
lighted on nothing but our own little vessel and the blue
waters that rolled around us. The eye, unused to the
vast and monotonous scene, could find nothing to fix
upon but a bright cloud far away in the west, which
rested like some island of happy spirits, on the bosom of
that golden sea into which the sun had just descended.
`And now,' thought I, `I am in the world alone
upon the wide, wide sea.'
`We have every prospect of a favorable passage,'
said a voice near me; and for the first time since I
embarked I recollected that I was not the only
passenger
on board. The speaker was a venerable gentleman
of some three score years, with silver locks and a
countenance
expressive of amiable feelings, though
careworn
and melancholy. On his arm leaned a small and
extremely graceful female figure, to whom his remark
had been addressed, and both were gazing in the
direction
where the waters were still flashing with the living
splendors of the sunset.
`Beautiful!' at length exclaimed the lady, without
seeming to heed what the other had said. `How lovely
is this scene, my dear father. And see, what a beautiful
cloud! Does it not remind you of Magawisca's isles
of the sweet southwest?'
Who has not felt the magic of a voice? I had not
seen the speaker, and yet her tones came over me like
a pleasant music. They were deeper than the ordinary
tones of woman, and at this moment tremulous with
enthusiasm.
`You are the child of imagination, my dear Mary,'
said her father, affectionately, passing his arm round
her waist; `would to Heaven you were less so.'
`But,' said she, in a mournful tone, `I do not always
indulge in gay fancies.'
`True, my dear; your feelings change their hues as
often and as suddenly as the clouds of heaven. See
yonder; your enchanted island has already lost its
golden mantle, and now lies brooding on the breast of
the sea a dusky and threatening bank of fog. You will
now as easily people it with the demons of the storm,
as when gilded by the sunbeams with the spirits of the
blest. Thus suddenly do you pass from the brightest
dreams of happiness to the darkest forebodings. I
repeat
,
would to Heaven you were less the child of
imagination! You had been happier.'
The father, in alluding to her constitutional weakness,
had probably awakened distressing recollections; for
she hung her head and withdrew from his arm, and
when I approached to get a view of her face, her eyes
were filled with tears. She turned away quickly on
seeing a stranger. But that view was enough. I have
spoken of the magic of a voice, but what is it to the
human face!
`You seem interested with the singular deportment
of my daughter,' observed the old gentleman as she
retired.
I started, I believe in some confusion.
`She has just risen from a bed of sickness,' he
continued
,
with a melancholy accent; `and I am fearful
will never be herself again.'
`If I were to judge of her malady from her
appearance
,'
said I, `I should say that the mind has had more
to do than bodily infirmities with the ruin which has
been wrought in that lovely countenance.'
`You are right, Sir,' replied he, with a sigh`her
illness was occasioned by mental anguish, the cause of
which is buried deep in both our hearts. Suffice it to
say that the victim of intemperance seldom falls alone;
and that when a youth of high promise immolates
himself
on the altar of the disgusting fiend, tears and broken
hearts attend the sacrifice.'
The old man spoke with mournful energy and I pitied
him.
`Is there no hope of the reformation of such an one?'
I inquired.
`In this case none. It is more than six months since
William Ashton fled from society and went to sea as a
common mariner. The presence, the devoted affection,
the tears of my child could not reclaim himwhat then
can?'
`What, indeed!' repeated I. `And this voyage is
undertaken for the recovery of her health? You will
excuse my inquisitiveness,' I immediately added, `I
have lived long enough in your country to acquire her
characteristic mode of questioning.'
`I hold it every man's duty as well as interest,' said
he, `whose lot it is to travel on the great deep, far from
his home and kindred, to relate so much of his own
history
as shall entitle him to the sympathy and confidence
of the companions of his voyage. I am a Scotchman,
and my name is Douglas.'
`My name,' said I, `is Brae, and I am a Freshman
in  College; you have my whole history.'
The shadows of night had settled over the solitary
waste before we parted for the night. Many leagues
of sea had been ploughed in that short period, as the
ship, yielding to the impulse of the powerful breeze,
dashed on her way over the billows. Three days of
this propitious wind brought us off the Hatteras, and
though at the distance of three hundred miles from land,
we received the usual greeting of the Cape, and were
obliged to do homage to its strong spirit, under bare
poles, for several hours.
It will be supposed by those of my readers who will
have the charity to consider me a man of taste, that
during these three days I had not avoided the society
of Mary Douglas and her father. If I may so speak
without being misunderstood, or expressing my meaning
too strongly, I had become quite a favorite. I found
her mind all that her countenance had promised. Her
sufferings had been cruel; sufficiently severe, indeed,
to cause a temporary alienation of her reason, but
its only remaining trace was an occasional wildness
of the eye and an imagination highly and sometimes
painfully susceptible of excitement. In her moments
of animation it was delightful to stand by her side,
leaning
on the tafferel, and behold the world of romance
her playful fancy would call up above and around us.
Each golden cloud, touched by the magic of her tongue,
floated in the element a fairy palace of aerial spirits.
The ocean and everything visible on its surface, the
finny herds that glided through its depths, were all made
to assist in supporting, and adorning, and peopling her
ideal world.
`See,' she exclaimed, pointing with her delicate finger
to one of those curious marine animals called the `
Portuguese
man of war,' `yonder is a bark fit for the flag
ship of Queen Mab's high admiral.'
`Her majesty has a squadron on the waters this
morning,' said I, `for yonder come a dozen more.'
The beautiful creatures, who have been taught by
nature
a noble art which the pride of man would arrogate
to himself, with their bodies low in the water like a deep
freighted ship, and their purple sails distended with air
like a balloon, passed us slowly and gracefully, most
gallantly bearing up into the wind. `You have
extended
the fairy queen's dominion,' continued I; `I never
suspected before that she made any pretensions to the
empire of Neptune.'
`And why not?' she quickly replied. `Why should
every green grove and hill side be trodden by myriads
of invisible and tiny sprites, and fancy refuse her aid to
people these blue depths? There are fairies on land,'
she continued, smiling, `and fairies I am determined
there shall be at sea.'
`You have only to wave your wand, enchantress,' said
I in her own vein, `and we shall see not only their
mimic fleets, but Queen Mab herself, and her whole
corps de ballet
, dancing on the crest of every wave.
Her father was happy to see her possess even the
shadow of enjoyment. `You will not have many days
to revel in these watery realms of fairy land,' said he,
`if we go on at this rate.'
The propitious and powerful breeze that had brought
us out of port, and which had, temporarily, been put to
the rout by a counter and more violent gust from the
Hatteras, had now revived, and came sweeping from
the northeast in a steady gale. Swift flew the `
Seabird'
on her snowy wing, dashing recklessly through
the exulting elements, as if anxious to redeem the time
that had been lost in port.
`It is a phenomenon which I have never heard
satisfactorily
explained,' observed Mr Douglas, `that some
parts of the ocean should be subject to the almost
perpetual
dominion of the tempest, and others be as
remarkable
for their calmness. Now this part, which we
are leaving so rapidly, is styled by mariners the stormy
latitudes; and justly; for I have made more than six
voyages between the West Indies and New York, and
never did I pass the shores of America between the
latitudes of thirtyfive and thirty degrees, without
experiencing
more or less bad weather.'
`Captain Ben. Starboard, that I made my first
voyage under,' said the captain, in his broad, heavy
way, `used to call this part of the sea, the kingdom of
thunder and lightning; and right enough, as Mr
Douglas
says; for I believe the surly gentleman who has his
moorings on the shoals of the Cape, but who often takes
a cruise as far as Bermuda, burns more of heaven's
gunpowder than any other man along shore.'
`If you want to see thunder works in real style,' said
a grim old seaman at the helm, `though to say the truth
I've seen it crack and blaze a couple of degrees to the
leeward in a manner to make a man think his ship
engaged
with a first rate; but if you want to see it in
what I call real sea style, you must haul upon this wind
till you cross the ocean, then take a sheer through the
straits till you find a piece of water called the Gulf of
Lyons. There, in a squall, the clouds hang so low and
heavy that you can't tell whether the fire comes out of
the heavens, or the waters; and the thunder sounds for
all the world as if father Neptune and all his regiment
of sea-born devils, had clapped their heads above the
water, and were giving you your last hail into etern.'
`Mind your hel-um, old Jack Cable,' said the
captain
,
sternly, breaking the old tar's figure in two.
Still blew our brave northeaster.
`Don't you call this the regular trade wind?' asked
Mr Douglas.
`You never take the trades north of twentyseven or
eight;' replied the captain, `and we are just passing
Bermuda.'
But, trades or not, certain it is that this fine eight
knot breeze lasted from the twentyfifth of April to the
first of May; and carried us from the latitude of Cape
Charles past the boisterous realm of Hatteras, through
the calm and weedy waters that leave the northern
shores of the great Bahama chain, into that beautiful
strait on one side of which rise the cloud capped
summits
VOL. II. 14
of St Domingo while the other is limited by the
blue line of Cuba.
Perhaps it would be difficult to find a section of the
sea more calm and beautiful than the portion extending
from the limits of the stormy latitudes to that long
sweep of sand keys and rocky islets, that skirt the
northern shores of the monarch of the Antilles. It is
frequently more placid than the seaman loves, and is
covered with beautiful weeds brought by the Gulf Stream
and other currents from the Bahamas and the shores of
Florida. Thousands of acres of it were floating round
us; sometimes in broad, compact bodies, miles in extent,
then, in long narrow beds, as regular as if laid out by
the hand of man.
`This surely must be Neptune's garden,' said the
delighted Mary; `here are all the plants of the rock,
all the blossoms of the sea collected.'
`Beautiful as they are, my dear,' said her father,
`they have frighted stouter hearts than yours. When
the sailors of Columbus found themselves surrounded
as we are, they began to think that they had passed the
limits of navigation or reached the end of the world,
and that their ship would finally be fetered in the midst
of these unknown seas, as a monument of the vengeance
of Heaven for the temerity of their leader.'
On the twentyeighth of April we crossed the tropic.
As all but Miss Douglas had passed it before, the sailors
reluctantly consented to dispense with the usual rites
in honor of his aquatic majesty. Early the next
morning
,
a pair of uncouth looking birds, styled, in nautical
ornithology, Neptune's doves, and known on land as
the beautiful white bird of the tropics, made their
appearance
.
After reconnoitering us fore and aft, without
deigning any reply to our hail of what news from their
master, the outlandish strangers flew off to the
southward
.
Then Jack Cable, the oracle of the forecastle,
shook his head.
`Ah! my lads,' said he `I knew that no good would
come of not paying your compliments to the commodore
yesterday. You never see his fowls but when there is
some bad luck stirring, and if you don't hear from it
before we make Turks Island, you may set me adrift
before a twenty knot breeze, in a leaky long-boat.'
But notwithstanding the prognostications of evil, and
though the sea-god's constable, John Shark, came
prowling round us at evening, we arrived safe the next
day at the dreary Isle of Salt.
Turks Island is a most dismal looking spot. It is
too low to be seen farther than five or six miles, and we
were accordingly obliged to lie to, the preceding night,
to avoid running it down. A description of this island
will apply to most of the other Bahamas in its
neighbourhood
.
They are mere sand banks. But the most
rugged districts of our earth are the richest in mineral
treasures, and the ocean strews its rarest gems on the
shores of the most desolate islands. On the sands and
rocks of the Bahamas are found the rarest tinted shells
and the finest specimens of coral. Ours, however, was
not a voyage of pleasure nor of scientific research.
We glided rapidly past the solitary isle, and were the
next morning close in by St Domingo.
And here, as if during the night we had been
translated
to another planet, everything was new and full of
wonder. Our eyes had been used to nothing but the
tame scenery of the southern section of New England
and New York. Judge, then, of our astonishment,
when more than the most eloquent pens have written,
or the most vivid fancy conceived of the wonders of the
tropics, burst upon us in the full reality of vision. The
giant mountains formed the grandest feature of the
amazing picture. Around their base rolled vast volumes
of the whitest mist, above which their summits rose, like
islands of the upper world from an etherial ocean. The
deep hue of the forests which told that they never wore
other dress than green, the myriads of strange sea fowl
that screamed around us, the very color of the water
was that of a new climate. At length, the sun rose
with a splendor that is never witnessed north of the
tropics, pouring a broad and almost intolerable flood of
light upon the scene, flashing through the clouds and
along the waters like living fire. The sea of vapor
seemed to heave, and mounting higher till it caught the
sunbeams, circled the head of each fantastic peak with
a diadem glowing with a thousand dyes.
Our breeze was now leaving us. We spread all sail
to catch its last flutters, but soon relinquished the hope
of proceeding far that day; for the grampus, the sure
precursor of calms, now came tumbling his huge form
towards us, and when we reached the middle of the
Windward Passage, the green turtle, whom the slightest
movement in air or water frights to the caverns of the
deep, might be seen sunning himself on the surface of
the sea. It was then that we felt, for the first time,
the full power of a tropical sun. In the cabin the
mercury
stood at one hundred and ten degrees, in the sun
at one hundred and thirty degrees; and when it is
remembered that we had left the North American shore
only ten days before, in the wintry month of April, it
will be readily imagined that our sufferings from the
heat were extreme. But as regularly as the curtain of
evening fell,
`The land wind from woods of palm
And orange groves and fields of balm,
Blew o'er the Haytien seas,'
and, with its reviving freshness, in some measure repaid
us for the sufferings of the day. On deck, therefore,
we spent this and the two succeeding nights, creeping
like nocturnal birds from our coverts in the cabin or
beneath a sail.
There is nothing that a seaman loves less than a calm.
The rushing of the wind, in a small hurricane, is far
more welcome if it only blow the right way; and
peculiarly
aggravating is it to be becalmed within sight of
his destined haven. We could not as yet see Jamaica,
but along the southwestern quarter of the horizon lay a
pile of dusky clouds which the captain assured us was
the
loom
of that island. The reader will not wonder,
then, if, in our circumstances, all the strange oaths and
imprecations found in a seaman's vocabulary, were called
into service by our nettlesome captain and his crew,
and hurled without mercy on the winds and weather.
`You may have more wind than you want before
you reach Kingston moorings,' said I, a little nettled
at their absurd conduct.
`Blowblowlet it blow!' roared the captain; `I
would rather go to the bottom at once, than lie here
roasting in this sun that 's enough to cook a Guineaman.
Besides, Mr Brae,' added he, in a milder tone, and
pointing to the northwest, `yonder is Cape Maise, the
eastern end of Cuba, not fifteen miles off. Two hours
rowing would bring us off a gang of the picarooning
rascals to cut our throats if we should n't happen to hit
their fancy; and though this good ship is called the
Seabird, she is one of that kind which can 't rise without
a swell. I say then let it blow.' So saying he took his
glass and went into the main top, from whence he might
be seen for an hour reconnoitering the Cuba shore.
It was, as I have already stated, the fourth afternoon
of the calm. Impatience was visible in almost every
face. But my feelings agreed perfectly with the weather.
14*
There reigned as complete a tranquillity in my bosom
as in the elements. Mary Douglas was there; it was
enough; I felt not the sun; I feared no pirates.
Mistake me not, gentle reader. I do not say that I
was in love, for on the doctrine of tender sentiments,
I entertain some skeptical, perhaps treasonable ideas.
I only found myself strangely fascinated, was glad I
was just there, and as I was. I pitied Mary Douglas,
and would have done much to have made her happy.
She seemed better than when we sailed, but well or
substantially
happy she certainly was not. Still that hectic
glow would appear on her cheek and flutter and depart
like the tints of sunset, leaving it colorless as marble.
I would have given worlds to have placed the rose in its
stead. She lived in a world of fancy, and beautifully
would she deck the objects of her own creation; but
then there would come a revulsion in her feelings, a
deep dejection, when one who studied her speaking
countenance might rightly conceive that fancy, aided by
memory, that busy fiend, was conjuring up a far
different
scene. Oh! how has my heart yearned, as I have
gazed upon her in these sad moments, for power to
extract
the worm that had taken such deep hold upon her
peace; to recall her to a world she was so eminently
qualified to bless and adorn, and that should no longer
fright her from its stern realities by dreadful images of
the past.
She had closed her book and I had been sitting by
her side, I know not how long, perhaps an hour. Our
conversation had been interesting, but of its subject I
have only a confused recollection.
`Say no more, Mr Brae,' said she, rising; `I should
be weak to deny that I understand you; but,' looking
up in my face with a melancholy smile, `you know
something of my past history; you know that I once
loved;' here her lip quivered and the color left her
cheeks; `but he proved himself unworthy, and I tore
him from my heart! But oh! in doing this, think you
that I did not rend my heart strings?' She left me in
tears, and retired to her cabin, adding only as she passed,
`My heart is crushed, Mr Brae, I feel that I can never
love again.'
The sun had settled far towards the Mexican Gulf
before Captain Boltrop came down from his look-out.
Standing on the quarter deck, he again looked long and
anxiously to the westward.
`There is that between us and that shore,' he at
length said, `that I dread more than I would that shore
in a hurricane off San Domingo.'
`I thought that nothing could be more terrible to a
seaman than a gale of wind upon a lee shore,' observed
Mr Douglas.
`I had rather fall into the sea than into the hands of
a bloodthirsty picaroon,' said the captain very decidedly,
and with an air of great meaning.
Just then the splendid luminary dipped its flaming
circle in the waters of the Caribbean sea.
`There is a spot in the sun,' I exclaimed.
The captain looked at it a moment, and then smiling
grimly, `Ay, a spot, and a dark one too,' said he;
`watch it, Mr Brae, and see if it sets.'
The dark object, which appeared on the very disc of
the sun, and which I had taken for one of those spots
that are occasionally seen on his surface, instead of
sinking behind the bright and level waters with the part
of the luminary on which it was first observed, seemed
to mount upwards, and after lingering a moment on the
last visible arch of the glorious orb, it sprang into that
pure and glowing element which the sun had shed along
the western horizon. It wavered for a moment between
the heavens and the earth, as if uncertain to which
to attach itself, till, as the flashings of the dying light
became fainter, it appeared on the sea, a dark and
motionless speck.
`The sun has found water to wash him clear of your
spot, Mr Brae,' said the captain, with another of his
mysterious smiles; `I wish to God it had sunk with him.'
An air of deep care settled over his face. I knew
not what to make of him or of his words.
`Why, what do you take that speck to be?' I at
length inquired.
`Look for yourself, Mr Brae,' said he.
I took the glass from his hand, and examined the dim
distant object. `It is a boat, captain!'
`Ay, a boat!' echoed he, `and coming for us as fast
as twelve stout rowers can shove her through the water.
Now you know why I wished for a wind, and a hard
wind too.'
The beautiful twilight of the tropics had now settled,
in all its softness, over the quiet bosom of the deep.
The heights of Cuba rose majestically from its crystal
depths, boldly lifting their pointed peaks to the spotless
heavens, and I fancied that I could hear the small wave
break upon its coral strand, with a murmur as soft as if it
had never washed from those shores the stains of crime.
The heavy loom in the southwest, as if it had only
waited to grace the setting of the king of day, after
glittering for a moment in a thousand gorgeous colors,
settled behind the heaving breast of ocean, leaving only
a dark mass like a church with its spire in bold relief
against the sky. It no sooner caught our captain's eye
than he shouted, with as much rapture as a seaman ever
allows himself to express, `The Blue Mountain Peak
of Jamaica!'
The cry was echoed with enthusiasm by a dozen
joyful
voices. We were still one hundred miles from the
island, and were not gaining an inch on our way towards
it; still, every eye was turned to it with affection as to
a long sought home, and an emotion awoke even in my
breast, distinct from those which, of late, had usurped
its entire possession. The whole view to the westward
was beauty, unbroken by a single blemish, and nothing
of alarm was there save the dark spot on the sea to
which so suspicious a character had been attached by
our captain, but which had already disappeared in the
increasing darkness of the hour. But the east, as if
envious of the tranquillity that reigned in the opposite
quarter, wore a savage scowl. Enormous piles of vapor,
black as the smoke from a volcano's crater, shrouded
the heights of St Domingo, and blotted out the very
shores from our view. It looked indeed as if the island
had sunk, and another of subterranean formation had
risen from the depths of the sea to fill its place.
`I would give a month's wages,' said the captain,
with an air of deep thought, `if we could have that
squall upon us within an hour.'
I stared at him with a feeling between contempt and
astonishment.
`You doubtless do honor to a seaman's taste,' said I,
drily; `for my part, I dislike my fellow creatures so
little, that I would rather see a piratical privateer within
gun-shot than encounter the contents of yonder mass of
solid darkness.'
`It may be proved before you leave the ship, Mr Brae,'
replied he with great coolness, `that I fear the face of
man as little as another.' Then turning to the whole
ship's company, with very considerable dignity, `
Gentlemen
and shipmates,' said he, `I have reason to
apprehend
that danger is at hand. The boat that is putting
off to us is doubtless a pirate. Of armed men she is
certainly full; for I have lived too long on the sea not
to know the glitter of arms in the sun. It is more than
probable that she has comrades; for would one open
boat venture to attack a vessel of our size? Something
has been hinted about fear, and, to say the truth, I had
rather run than meet these gentry. But that is out of
the question, and fight we must as long as there is a
man to stand at one of those brass guns, or to pull a
trigger.'
Three cheers were the echo to this chivalric speech;
and not a moment was lost in preparing to give the
pirate a warm reception. A formidable show of
miscellaneous
articles of warfare was drawn from the secret
places of the ship, and there were finally mustered
on deck fifteen men, twenty stands of arms, and two
brass cannon. These last, after being wheeled to the
starboard side of the quarter deck, and charged nearly
to the muzzle, were thrust through port-holes towards
the quarter from whence our foes were expected. Our
small arms were loaded with three balls eachevery
man girded with a cutlass and a brace of pistolsand
the captain even carried his precaution so far as to have
the railings, bulwarks, and sides of the ship well
slushed
,
in order to give a slippery foothold if they attempted
boarding.
After all this bustle of preparation, every man posted
himself in a situation to command a view of the whole
prospect to the westward, and a look-out was stationed
in every top. By this time night had drawn her curtain
close around the scene, and no trace of the sun's
existence
remained but in his pale-faced representative,
now riding near her meridian. For an hour no sound
broke the deep silence that reigned throughout the ship.
Not a murmur to excite alarm, or even suspicion, arose
from the slumbering ocean, and it seemed even criminal
to believe that any being could be found daring enough
to disturb a tranquillity so deep and holy.
`It is a lovely hour,' said Mary, in a whisper, as if
afraid to trust her voice. `Can there be danger?'
`It is just such an hour as man selects for the
exercise
of his evil genius,' replied I, in her own tone.
Then came the land wind from Cuba, `shaking a
thousand odors from its dewy wings.'
`Can it be possible,' again said Mary, `that an air
which breathes of Araby, and which fans us as lightly
as does the mother's breath her sleeping infantthat
this pure and gentle element can cradle the hurricane,
and nurture the seeds of pestilence?'
`Just as possible, and as true, as that these beautiful
islands are peopled by the most unlovely of all the
human
race. Look there,' continued I, pointing eastward,
`for proof in part of what I say.'
The gigantic piles of vapor remained motionless as
rocks of adamant, resembling more the black smoke of
some smouldering mine of coal than exhalations of the
sun's raising. No lightning glanced from its bosom.
The feeble and timorous moonbeams were unable to
penetrate its dark depths, only faintly silvering their
edges, and rendering visible and more gloomy the
blackness
below.
`There is the hurricane in a visible shape,' said I.
Still the dark mass moved not, but stood upon the
waters, motionless, and black as a mountain of infernal
elements.
Hour after hour rolled on and the scenes on either
hand continued the same. Suspense had rendered the
men fretful and impatient, and after straining in vain to
discover some dim trace of the foe or to detect the dip
of their oars, many had closed their eyes in slumber.
Mr Douglas and his daughter had retired for the night.
The hour of midnight came and the moon was fast
sinking towards the sea. Like the rest I had become
weary.
`Well, captain,' said I, `what has become of our
friends from Cuba?'
`Gone to Davy's locker, I hope,' replied he; `but
there is no knowing how to calculate for the rascals, so
we had better keep a sharp look out yet.'
`For my part,' said I, `I am tired with looking at
nothing, and will just see how the squall comes on.' I
turned accordingly and a flashing on the water rising
and disappearing in quick and regular succession, met
my eye.
`There they are!' exclaimed the captain, whose eye
had taken the direction of mine; `the rascals have
rowed
clear round us, and are coming on from the San
Domingo side. Stand to your arms, boys! the rogues
are upon us.'
In an instant every man was at his post, and on the
alert.
`Stand in the shadow of the spars and rigging to be
out of sight,' continued the captain, `and not a man of
you fire till I give the word.'
`Ay, ay, Sir!' responded the crew with nautical
precision.
`And now,' said the captain, who really went to
work in a business style, `let us get this gun on the
other tack, Mr Brae, to be ready for the gentlemen.'
The piece was accordingly soon seen to thrust its
deadly muzzle through the opposite port, keeping a dead
aim on the boat, which, like an alligator, cautiously
dropped towards us, at less than a quarter of a mile's
distance.
`Strange,' said I, `that the fellows should choose to
row against the moon when by so doing they must know
we should see the glitter of their oars.'
`I suspect,' replied the captain, `that they had no
choice about it. You forgot that we have had more or
less wind off the land since sunset, and are at least six
miles from where we were then. The probability is that
the rogues lost us after nightfallso, as the Paddy says,
when they came where we were, we were not there.
But it seems they have found us at last.'
The boat was now very near us. Still not a sound
came from her. The closest and most painful attention
could not hear the dip of her oars, which rose and fell
like a piece of mechanism, glittering in the moonlight
like blades of silver.
`Boat ahoy!' cried the voice of Capt. Boltrop in its
most startling tones. No answer was returned to this
summons and the oars, were played more lively. `Keep
off! you dd rascals,' again shouted our commander
`off! or I'll blow you out of the water!'
This threat and the firebrand which I flourished with
great fierceness seemed to make the pirate hesitate.
The motion of the boat was arrested. Captain Boltrop
thought the victory already achieved and he again
raised
his voice in tones of authority;
`Throw your arms overboard, and come along side.'
A volley of musketry was the reply to this summons,
and a dozen balls whistled by and the captain's hat flew
across the deck. A deep imprecation burst from his
lips. The next instant a broad stream of flame issued
from the quarter deck, and the explosion of the piece
broke upon the dead stillness of the elements with a
noise like thunder. A distant crash, a heavy splashing
in the water, above which a cry of mortal agony was
terribly distinct, had arisen in the direction of the foe
VOL. II. 15
before the smoke dispersed sufficiently to enable us to
see the effect of one shot. No boat was then to be
seen, nor any trace of her crew; we had probably sent
every soul into eternity.
`By George!' cried the captain with something like
compunction in his tone, and rubbing his head with his
handkerchief, `I would rather have taken the rascals and
had them decently hanged than send them to the
bottom
in this off-hand manner. You could'nt have made
a better shot, Mr Brae, if you'
A horrid yell, rising apparently from the very depths
beneath the ship, stopped him in the middle of his
speech. A boat glided out of the smoke, and, shooting
under our bows, a dozen dark forms were seen
springing
from it to the side of the ship. But our precautions
had been wisely taken, and were completely successful.
No sooner did they touch the slippery vessel, than most
of them, with the most horrid blasphemies, fell back into
the sea, snapping their pistols at us even after they were
filled with water. At the same moment their boat, which
had been completely riddled by our shot, filled and sunk
to the bottom. Three only got upon deck and were
immediately
overpowered and secured. Five more were
with difficulty dragged out of the water and disposed of
in the same manner. One powerful fellow, however,
was not so easily quelled. He had succeeded in
getting
one foot upon deck, when a young seaman, named
Ralph, flew at him with the fierceness of a tiger. They
clenched, and after balancing a moment between the
deck and the water, the pirate, who was much the heavier
man, fell backwards overboard, dragging his antagonist
with him. They both sunk, but soon rose again about
four rods from the ship clinging closely together. Then
commenced a combat the most singular and appalling
I had ever witnessed. No one on board seemed to
think of devising means of assisting our champion. No
one dared to fire upon the pirate; for so closely were they
coiled together, so rapid were their evolutions, and so
dim the light shed by the moon, that it was impossible
to hit one without endangering the life of the other.
At the commencement of the struggle, their efforts
seemed to be aimed solely at drowning each other.
They whirled over on the top of the water, dashing
it about like wounded sharks. Both then sunk and
were for a while lost to our sight. Presently they rose
again, and exchanged thick and heavy blows, and
closing
with redoubled fury sunk again. Neglecting to use
their weapons, which would have put a speedy end to
the fray, they fought more like savage beasts of prey,
bent on throttling each other, than like human beings.
`Shall we stand and see our man murdered?' at
length exclaimed a voice from among the crew. It
operated
like magic to break the spell that had fallen upon
us all.
`Clear away the boat there!' shouted the captain,
and six men sprang to execute the order. Just then,
after an effort of unusual fierceness, both of the
combatants
sunk. They remained out of sight so long, that
the men who were letting down the boat, suspended
their operations, and we all stood breathless with
uncertainty
and anxiety awaiting their reappearance. At
length, about thirty yards off, the waters parted; but
only one man was seen to rise.
`Is it you, Ralph?' cried the captain in a suppressed
voice.
`Here is
some
of him at least on my knife-blade,'
responded
the freebooter with the accent and laugh of a
fiend; and springing nearly to his whole height out of
water, he threw the weapon, with great force towards
us. It passed over our heads and striking the mizen
mast, remained quivering, with its point buried in the
wood.
Another hollow laugh rang over the waters, and on
looking round, wide circles of ripples were seen moving
on the face of the moonlit sea, as if some heavy body had
just sunk into it. Vengeance was the tardy thought that
now rushed on every heart. Some, in the blinded fury
of the moment, actually discharged their pieces into the
centre of those waving eddies, without staying to reflect
upon its utter uselessness. Others, with their guns in
readiness, and eyes glaring upon the sea like panthers
robbed of their prey, stood prepared to fire the moment
he should show his head above the water. But he rose
no more. The winged messengers of death that had
been aimed at his life, sped harmlessly over his head,
and had it been possible to penetrate the secrets of the
great deep, he might have been seen reposing peacefully
on its sandy bottom by the side of his late antagonist.
A sullen silence pervaded the ship. The men looked
gloomily at each other, and with lowering brows on their
helpless prisoners, as if a sufficient atonement had not
been rendered for the life of their comrade. To one
skilled in the language of the human countenance, it
was evident that nothing but the restraint of discipline
held them back from a summary act of vengeance and
of crime, that would have sunk them to a level with the
pirates themselves.
Judging of the feelings of his crew from their looks,
or more probably from his own, and anxious to remove
the temptation to evil, the captain ordered our eight
prisoners to be stowed under the hatches, and they were
accordingly tumbled in with very little ceremony.
How many of this band of genuine desperadoes had
been lost, we had no means of ascertaining; for our
prisoners either did not, or would not understand
English
or French. But when they fired upon us, from
twelve to sixteen men were distinctly visible, and the
yell that followed our discharge was such as is never
extorted from mortal man but by the pangs of the last
agony. Six or eight, then, of the freebooters had
certainly
perished. What chance of success they might
fancy that an open boat could have against a vessel of
the size of ours, it completely bewildered us to imagine.
They must either have been intoxicated, or in the
situation
of a beast of prey, whom the goadings of hunger
will compel to rush upon a foe from whose face he would
otherwise have fled. Viewing it in either light it was
an act of the most daring hardihood. Our victory,
though complete, as has been already seen, was
blood-bought
.
Early in the engagement a ball had also
carried
away our captain's hat, making a lane through his
hair and raking up the skin in a frightful manner; and
I have a scar on my chin and another on my temple at
the service of any who doubt the truth of this narrative.
From the firing of the first gun to the depositing of our
prisoners in the hold, not more than ten minutes had
elapsed. The struggle had been fierce and boisterous,
but it had passed. The ship was restored to her usual
tranquillity and was moving before a gentle breeze from
the shore, yet so slowly as scarcely to scar the face of
the ocean.
The noise of the conflict had called up the terrified
inmates of the cabin; and all the ship's company were
now assembled on deck, silent, but too deeply affected
with the scene just passed to sleep more that night.
Mary was there; her cheeks flushed with the
excitement
which the events of the night had occasioned.
Still occasionally a cold shudder would rush through
her frame, as she murmured, in a suppressed voice
`That fearful cry!I shall never forget it.'
15*
She was in a state of high nervous agitation. Her
eye shone with uncommon lustre and glanced over the
sea unsteadily.
`The elements are to have their turn next,' said she.
Her eye was bent upon the scowling east. The
same motionless body of clouds was there, black as
before
.
Around it were rapidly revolving others of a wild
and ragged look, stained by the setting moon with the
color of brass. Others of the same hue were shooting
off from the main body, and moving rapidly towards the
zenith, like the advanced squadrons of an army. Then
the moon went down, leaving the ocean to a darkness
that accorded well with the portentous aspect of the
heavens. The intermitted breathings of the spicy west
wind, ceased entirely, and an appalling stillness in the
elements ensued. The water began to assume a most
singular appearance. Those who have seen on the
coast the rippling produced by an immense shoal of
white-fish, can form some idea of its agitation. The
dashing of a bucket would cover its surface with a
thousand sparkling points, and a shoal of berneta passing
rapidly, looked like balls of meteoric fire shooting
through the depths of the sea.
A low creaking sound from the rigging and the
warning
voice of the captain, announced that the long
expected
onset of the winds was at hand, and I had just time
to hand Mary to the cabin, when the ship was bending
low upon her side by the pressure of a furious gust.
No precaution which prudence and experience
suggested
,
to put the ship in a condition to grapple safely with
her powerful adversary, had been omitted by our wary
commander. No canvass was spread aloft but the three
close reefed topsails. A large detachment of those
brassy clouds before mentioned, had passed the zenith
when the first squall struck us. It lasted but a minute.
That minute however was sufficient to tear our topsails
into ribbands, and they were borne away like feathers
on the wings of the blast. A dead calm and `a horror
of great darkness' succeeded. A hollow, whispering
sound, like the moan of spirits in the air, was heard and
numerous little balls of pale light gleamed and vanished
on the dark canopy which had now completely invested
the heavens.
`We shall have it soon,' observed the captain in a
calm, low voice.
Scarcely had he spoken, when a meteor of uncommon
size and splendor, shot from a point near the zenith, and,
glancing across the dark back ground of the east, sunk
into the sea. Then the wailing voices in the air were
multiplied. A sound arose in the distance as of cavalry
rushing to battle, and every sense was drowned in the
roar of winds and the dash of waters. Like other
landsmen I had read of storms and tempests, of
mountain
waves lashed into fury; but what description can
do justice to the terrific truth of such a scene, or who
that is a stranger to the ways of God on the mighty
deep, can form even a faint idea of all that is meant by
a `storm at sea!'
The hurricanes of these seas are as shortlived as
they are violent. The dawn of day showed no trace of
the tempest that had deformed the night, but the tattered
rigging and well washed deck of our own vessel. Cuba
and St Domingo had sunk beneath the horizon, and
other heights on our right were lifting their misty
heads almost to the zenith. Within a mile of us lay a
sloping shore clothed with brilliant green to the water's
edge. No naked sand hills marred the beauty of the
landscape. All was green, save where, occasionally,
a rising eminence or an opening vale presented its
painted sugar works and breeze mills.
To form a back ground to this picturesque region
rose the magnificent range of the Blue Mountains.
`The Peak' is ten thousand feet high, and is certainly
one of the most beautiful elevations on the globe. It
stands in the centre of a circle of smaller mountains,
like a monarch surrounded by his ministers of state.
Along its base spots of red are seen, which, on near
approach, prove to be coffee plantations. A belt of
clouds embraces its middle, while its sharp summit,
crowned with impenetrable forests, enjoys perpetual
sunshine, and looks over half of the Caribbean sea.
`If there be an Eden on earth,' said I, `we have it
before us.'
`The sun shines not,' observed Mr Douglas, `on an
island more beautiful than Jamaica; and but for man,
who seems to have marked out the fairest portions of
God's earth for the exercise of his worst passions, it
might justly be styled a terrestrial paradise.'
The remark was just and striking. In taking a
survey
of the world, it is not upon the beauties of the
landscape
merely that the mind most delights to dwell.
And although, like the features of a stranger's face,
they are the first objects that meet and interest its
attention
,
yet recollecting that it is man who stamps a
character on all things here below, it turns from them
to contemplate the manners of society. In a
community
of virtuous and enlightened freemen, it discovers
a moral grandeur and beauty surpassing everything in
the natural world. The pride of the forest must stoop
to time; the beauties of vegetation must fade; the
mighty hills are to sink in the general wreck of nature;
but the virtues that exalt a nation are a garland which
the breath of eternity will not wither. Such is its just
estimation of the world. With what rapture, then, must
it turn to view the country where the grandest scenes
of nature dwindle into insignificance before the sublimity
of man's virtue. But where on earth shall such a land
be sought? Surely not within the tropics. By some
strange fatality, this broad zone, emphatically the
garden
of the earth, is trodden by slaves and barbarians.
Here, where the Deity is most visibly present by the
works of his bounty and power, man sins with the
highest hand. Here, where nature lifts her altars, the
everlasting hills, nighest heaven, his thoughts are most
grovelling. The stranger who would leave Jamaica
with most favorable impressions, must view it at a
distance
as we did, or be spirited to its shores, and alight
on a pinnacle of its sequestered mountains, where,
without
seeing a human being, he can view the island as it
came from the hand of its Maker.
But to return to our voyage. There is not on the
face of the globe a country, however beautiful in the
main, which has not its blemish. Thus, a few hours
sailing
enabled us to discover a prominent one in Jamaica.
We reached a part of the coast where, it is said, rain
or dew is never known to fall. Never could
imagination
picture a wilder scene of desolation. As if an
eternal sirocco breathed upon it, every germ of
vegetation
was blasted. Withered shrubs were thinly
scattered
over a vast chaos of rocks and barren mountains,
that on all sides presented frightful chasms, hollowed,
perhaps, by nature's omnipotent agent, the earthquake.
But the propitious breeze did not allow us long to
contemplate this region of horror. Again all was
beautiful
and green. The ship glided on with increased
velocity as she approached the end of her journey; the
coast flew by like a dream, and the goal of our
pilgrimage
rose upon the view. We passed the remains of
Port Royal. A ship of the line lay moored where once
stood the most populous part of the city. She is
emphatically
a `Sea Sodom;' for if ever the habitations of
men are subjected for their crimes to the direct and
dreadful wrath of the Almighty, then must the triple
overthrow of this ancient mart be regarded as instances
of such a visitation. Once it was burned to the ground;
once it was swept to destruction by a hurricane; and
again, as if her iniquities had risen to heaven and the
earth could sustain the burthen no longer, her
foundations
were shaken under her, and she sunk forever.
We passed up the beautiful bay of Kingston, and on
the afternoon of the sixth of May we came to anchor
about half a mile from the shore. Numerous boats
were boarding us and departing on different errands.
An hundred ships were discharging or receiving their
cargoes, to the cheerful song of the sailors. The
passengers soon collected in a group on the
quarterdeck
gazing on the thousand novelties that meet the
eye from the island, town, and bay. Mary was there, in
excellent spirits; every moment discovering and pointing
out, with the most animated gestures and exclamations,
some new object of admiration. At this moment a
barge from the castle shot across the bay, containing
an officer and a platoon of soldiers with orders for the
delivery of our prisoners into the hands of justice.
Accordingly, amidst a profound silence, they were
marched one by one from the hold, where they had been
immured for fifteen hours, and passed over the side of
the ship into the boat. There they were handcuffed
and bound. Two other barges were in attendance with
an equal number of men to act as guards.
The sight of these wretches painfully affected Miss
Douglas, and carried back her thoughts to the bloody
scene of the preceding night. She shuddered at the
recollection and murmured, `He that uttered that
dreadful
cry is not here.'
Although she had spoken in a low voice her words
fell upon the ear of the last prisoner, who was just in the
act of leaving the ship. He was a youth of about two
and twenty, with a slender but very elegant figure. His
countenance might have been striking and expressive;
but it was now disfigured with a scar, and bore the
infallible marks of long and habitual indulgence in
intemperance. I said he heard the voice of Mary.
He stopped, and stood as if he was nailed to the deck.
He put his hand to his forehead like one bewildered, and
his eye wandered over the ship as if searching for the
sound he had heard, till at length it fell upon Mary, and
he stood gazing upon her with a countenance varying
strangely from the vacant stare of idiocy to an
expression
of inexplicable meaning and even agony. She was
absorbed in her own reflections and heeded him not.
I made an exclamation of surprise, and directed her
attention to the miserable man who was so closely
observing
her. She looked, her eye met the ghastly
stare of his, and if a bolt from heaven had struck her
she could not have fallen more quickly.
`William Ashton!' cried the wretched father, `are
you not yet satisfied? Will you take her life too?'
The miserable man rushed past his guards, threw
back the curls from her forehead, and, gasping for
breath like one in the agonies of strangulation, gazed
upon her. Then, springing to the vessel's side, before
any arm could interpose, he buried himself in the sea,
and never rose more.
It was many minutes before Miss Douglas showed
any signs of life. At last, after a strong convulsion,
she opened her eyes.
`Where is he?' said she, starting up in the birth.
She stared wildly around, and then, pointing with her
finger, a single shriek, as if sent from her very soul,
burst from her, and again she sunk down insensible.
The shock had been too much for reason, if not for
nature. For the remainder of that day and all the
succeeding
night, we hung over her, uncertain whether
each fit might not be her last of mortal suffering. At
length she sunk into a deep sleep and reposed quietly.
She awoke perfectly calm. Looking her father
steadily in the face, `Where is he?' she repeated.
`My child! be calm,' said the old man.
`Am I not calm? Have I not suffered? and think
you I cannot suffer more? Let me know the worst.
Where is William Ashton?'
`In pity to your father, Miss Douglas,' said I, `
endeavour
to compose yourself. You shall know all in
time.'
`I do know it,' said she, in a hollow voice; `I know
it; I see it; they are leading him to the scaffold, to a
death of shame.'
`For Heaven's sake, Mr Douglas,' said I, `let her
know the truth; it may save her senses.'
The old man assented. Taking her hand he related
in the gentlest manner the fate of her unworthy lover.
With wonderful composure she listened to the narration.
The fountain of her tears broke up, and she wept long
and freely. Then, closing her eyes, her lips were
seen to move as in prayer. I bowed my face upon her
hand and joined in her silent supplication, whatever it
might be.
Her tears and mental devotion relieved her. Again
she slept, and awoke in quiet spirits. It was evident
that the news of Ashton's suicide was to her far less
terrible than the idea of his suffering an ignominious
death as a malefactor. Perhaps also there was a relief
even in the thought that he was removed from a life
of crime; and she could, with less sorrow, think of
him dead, than as a pirate and a companion of thieves
and murderers. Perhaps she had long since torn him
from her heart, as she once told me. But could it be?
Would the sight of him then have affected her so
strongly?
Mary now signified to her father that she felt able to
travel. The hour had come when we were to separate.
And now came my trial. I wished to speak to her of
myself; but every principle of manhood repressed the
selfish thought in her present situation. She seemed to
comprehended my feelings, and, extending her hand to
me with a smile, said, `Farewell! Mr Brae; I have
crossed your path, like a dark vision, but oh! forget
me. Let it be as a dream since we first met.' She
hesitated a moment. `I may have caused you
unhappiness
.
Most gladly would I have avoided it, and gladly
would I remove it now were it possible. But look upon
my face, and be convinced, that were it even as you
wish, you would soon have to mourn again. May God
bless you!'
The boat that was to convey her to the shore was
ready. I watched it till it disappeared.
`Are you ready to land, Sir?'
Awaking as from a trance, I gave the speaker a
bewildered
stare, and, for the first time during many days,
I recollected the objects of my voyage. With a feeling
of solitude, which even the thoughts of my home could
not subdue, I followed my baggage into the waiting
wherry, and in a few minutes placed my foot upon my
native land.
Twelve months after the events contained in the
preceding
narrative had transpired, I stood again upon
American soil. Various had been my fortunes in the
interim, but they are of no consequence to the reader.
VOL. II. 16
The companions of my voyage with but one exception,
were nearly forgottenits incidents, that were not
associated
with that one individual, remembered but faintly.
I was sitting in my study, discussing a subtle point
in ethics, when some one knocked. A servant entered
and handed me the following note;
`An old acquaintance requests the pleasure of Mr
Brae's company for a few minutes at the hotel.'
I rose instantly, adjusted my dress, and followed the
messenger.
Mr Douglas opened the door, and Mary, blooming
and beautiful beyond even my gayest dream, stood
beside
him.
There was no romance in what followed to any but
the parties concerned, and it were needless to dwell
upon the story. In a single sentence, therefore, I will
say that Mr Douglas had travelled with his daughter
until her health was reestablished; that he was, at the
time of which I speak, on the way to his residence near
New York, and that the Mary Douglas of my dreams
is now the Mary Brae of my bosom.
IDLENESS.
BY N. P. WILLIS.
The
rain is playing its soft, pleasant tune
Fitfully on the skylight, and the shade
Of the fast flying clouds across my book
Passes with delicate change. My merry fire
Sings cheerfully to itself; my musing cat
Purrs as she wakes from her unquiet sleep,
And looks into my face as if she felt,
Like me, the gentle influence of the rain.
Here have I sat since mornreading sometimes,
And sometimes listening to the faster fall
Of the large drops, or, rising with the stir
Of an unbidden thought, have walked awhile,
With the slow steps of indolence, my room,
And then sat down composedly again
To my quaint book of olden poetry.
It is a kind of idleness, I know;
And I am said to be an idle man
And it is very true. I love to go
Out in the pleasant sun, and let my eye
Rest on the human faces that pass by,
Each with its gay or busy interest;
And then I muse upon their lot, and read
Many a lesson in their changeful cast,
And so grow kind of heart, as if the sight
Of human beings were humanity.
And I am better after it, and go
More gratefully to my rest, and feel a love
Stirring my heart to every living thing,
And my low prayer has more humility,
And I sink lightlier to my dreamsand this,
'T is very true, is only idleness!
I love to go and mingle with the young
In the gay festal roomwhen every heart
Is beating faster than the merry tune,
And their blue eyes are restless, and their lips
Parted with eager joy, and their round cheeks
Flushed with the beautiful motion of the dance.
'T is sweet, in the becoming light of lamps,
To watch a brow half shaded, or a curl
Playing upon a neck capriciously,
Or, unobserved, to watch, in its delight,
The earnest countenance of a child. I love
To look upon such things, and I can go
Back to my solitude, and dream bright dreams
For their fast coming years, and speak of them
Earnestly in my prayer, till I am glad
With a benevolent joyand this, I know,
To the world's eye, is only idleness!
And when the clouds pass suddenly away,
And the blue sky is like a newer world,
And the sweet growing thingsforest and flower
Humble and beautiful alikeare all
Breathing up odors to the very heaven
Or when the frost has yielded to the sun
In the rich autumn, and the filmy mist
Lies like a silver lining on the sky,
And the clear air exhilarates, and life,
Simply, is luxuryand when the hush
Of twilight, like a gentle sleep, steals on,
And the birds settle to their nests, and stars
Spring in the upper sky, and there is not
A sound that is not low and musical
At all these pleasant seasons I go out
With my first impulse guiding me, and take
Wood path, or stream, or sunny mountain side,
And, in my recklessness of heart, stray on,
Glad with the birds, and silent with the leaves,
And happy with the fair and blessed world
And this, 't is true, is only idleness!
And I should love to go up to the sky,
And course the heaven like stars, and float away
Upon the gliding clouds that have no stay
In their swift journeyand 't would be a joy
To walk the chambers of the deep, and tread
The pearls of its untrodden floor, and know
The tribes of its unfathomable depths
Dwellers beneath the pressure of a sea!
And I should love to issue with the wind
On a strong errand, and o'ersweep the earth,
With its broad continents and islands green,
Like to the passing of a presence on!
And this, 't is true, were only idleness!
16 *
THE INTERVIEW BETWEEN CLEVELAND AND MINNA.
BY LOUISA P. HICKMAN.
`Yes, forever!' said Norna of the Fitful-head, stepping forward
from behind one of the massive Saxon pillars, which support the
roof of the Cathedral. `Here meet the crimson foot and the crimson
handHere you meet, and meet for the last time.'
The Pirate
.
The
lofty Cathedral is solemnly still,
While the shadows of evening its arches fill;
They are deepening along the ancient aisles,
And gloomily shrouding the massive piles
Of ruinous sculpture. One window remains
By the spoiler untouched, and its colored panes
The last faint gleams of daylight send,
The shadows within to deepen and blend.
Here walked the pirate chief, and here,
Mid fitting scenes for a heart so drear,
The past and future before him rise,
And visions as dark as the midnight skies
Surround him. Disgrace and death seem near,
And his brow is troubledbut not with fear.
`I shall soon benumbered with these,' he said;
`Beneath these stones with the quiet dead;
But a scaffold will witness my latest sigh,
With coward and traitor must Cleaveland die.
My bones on some lonely beach will perish,
And the name of the Rover none will cherish;
And Minna! Minna!how wilt
thou
hear
The fate of the lover thou once held dear?
Oh! with the thought of thy much loved name,
What visions are crossing my tortured brain!
Oh! would to Heaven we ne'er had met,
Since we may not meet again!
But the die is cast, the seal is set,
And the prayer and wish are vain.'
He lifts his brows from his clasped hands,
And the form of Minna before him stands.
Pale is her cheek, but the high soul shone
In her firm, unclouded eye;
There is not in her voice one tremulous tone,
Or one wavering woman's sigh.
`Cleaveland,' she said, `your freedom to gain,
I have hazarded allfriends, safety, fame;
But the love we once cherished, must now be o'er,
Your mates I have seenneed I tell you more?
I have learned that the pirate chieftain's name
Is a blot on his country's scroll of fame!
Flee from this place ere the dawning light,
Your safetymy father'sall hang on your flight;
The guards are engaged with the revel and wine,
Fold my mantle around thee and safety is thine.'
The prisoner wildly clasped her hand,
Cold as the wintry frost,
`Your father with my murderous band!
No time must then be lost.
Minna, farewell! since part we must,
But not forever part, I trust.'
He added one low and whispered word,
When a hollow voice from the tomb is heard;
`Each tie that binds you, now must sever,
This night you part and part forever!'
Spoke a mortal voice those sounds of dread?
'T is Nornashe of the `Fitful-head.'
And now before them the Pythoness stands,
And tosses wildly her withered hands;
Her words have more than mortal meaning,
Her looks have more than mortal seeming.
`Here meet the crimson foot and hand,
In the martyr's aisle and in Orkney land.
Maiden, away from this lonely place!
Thou hast looked thy last on thy lover's face;
Thou canst not save himI have the power
To his bark to guide himthis very hour;
But his banner of black must leave our shore,
Ere the morrow sees it dipped in gore.'
THE MOTHER'S GRAVE.
BY WILLIAM GRIGG, M. D.
It
was a morn in summer. Nature smiled
'Neath the rich mantle of the glorious sun,
Who, like a god, majestically rose
From his bright chamber of eternity,
And o'er the earth his golden vapor poured.
The waters spread their crystal face, a wide,
Unbroken mirror of the ambient sky,
While on their polished surface lightly played
The dazzling sunbeams of that quiet morn.
The sporting zephyr, with the pensive leaves
In gentle dalliance, newer beauty gave,
As they were wakened from their holy rest,
And joyed, yet trembled, in the liquid light
Which bathed them in its flood. Day's balmy breath,
Rich with the morning tribute of the flowers,
Floated along to pour its hallowed sweets
Among the dwellings of the busy world.
I stood within a churchyard. Art had there
Mingled its column with the moss-grown stone
That marked the spot where humble beings lay.
The urn-crowned monument, that proudly stood
Upon the ashes of the highborn dead,
In golden blazonry described the chain
Of proud, ennobled ancestry that claimed
The buried praised one as its brightest link.
With careless eye I scanned the epitaphs
That stained the marble's purity with words
The vainest mockery of the silent dead!
What work of art can speak the thrilling tones,
The voiceless utterance of the silent grave?
The measured movement of the plumed hearse,
The marble pile, the gilded epitaph,
Speak not the language of the broken heart.
There was a simple stone whereon was writ
`A Mother's Grave.' How eloquent the words!
They wafted me far back to other times,
When in the days of artless infancy
The silent stone had told my mother's name.
That tale seemed told again. Though youth was past,
And the cold calmness of maturer years
Had lulled the pangs my early boyhood knew,
Yet in that tongueless marble lurked a spell,
That wove around me memory's deathless joys.
'T was evening when I sought that spot again.
Beside the grave three little children stood.
The oldest was a boy, who scarce could claim
Eight summers' sports his ownthe next, a girl
Whose tender spring had known but six returns
And then, a lovely cherub, like the bud
Whose annual visit she four times had welcomed.
Each infant's hand was in the other's clasped
A living crescent, at their mother's grave
And fondly gazing on that sacred spot
They read the withering words which said their friend,
Their dearest, truest friend, slept the deep sleep
Which wakens only in eternity.
Oh! is there in the waste of human things
A stream so pure and clear as that which wells
From the deep fountain of a mother's heart?
No! no! by the stern laws of nature, no!
In infancy's soft hour the bud is bathed
In the warm fondness of maternal love,
And nourished to expand in the full bloom
Of unpolluted youthand even when
It ripens into fruit of age, the same
Nutricious fount supplies its manly strength,
And knows no hindrance to its pleasant course,
Down to the barriers of the eternal grave.
A mother's love! the strongest, truest type
Of the pure love the Saviour bears mankind!
Brightest in darkest hours! most seen when clouds
Of ignominy rest upon her boy!
And, like the diamond, showing best its power
When other gems are lost in shades of night,
Her love shines out and yields its secret rays,
When trouble lowers the blackest o'er her child.
I since have visited that holy tomb.
A pensive willow bending over it,
And a small basket filled with fresh plucked flowers
Standing beside the stone, assured my heart
That grave was not forgotten.
What rich joy
Those duteous children feel, whose bosoms echo
To the soft strains fond memory loves to wake
O'er some green spot on time's receding shore,
Brightly illumined by a mother's smile!
But how much holier theirs, who, looking back
Along the course their devious footsteps knew,
Perceive no stain upon the hallowed snow
Of childhood's grateful duty!
THE WITCH.
It
is a very common observation, but not the less true
on that account, that no advantage is fully prized except
by the want of it. Our fair countrywomen, who are
now instructed in every branch of education, can with
difficulty realize the ignorance of their female ancestors,
with whom to read and write was considered learning
enough to have made a modern blue-stocking. It must
be confessed, that, even now, a woman gifted with any
uncommon literary acquirements, falls under the
displeasure
of the well dressed illiterate dandies of the
day; but their jurisdiction is a harmless one, and seldom
extends beyond a shrug or the opprobrious epithet of
blue
. But this was not the case in 1669. Then, female
literature excited serious suspicion, and was taken under
the cognizance of that memorable and never to be
forgotten
synod of pious, enlightened worthies, who would
fain have condemned all the ugly old women and all
the intelligent young ones, to be hanged or drowned
as witches.
It was the misfortune of Ann Jones to be born at this
period. She lived at New Haven, and, when a child,
discovered a remarkable faculty of learning. She could
string rhymes together, as children of quick and playful
imaginations are wont to do. Ann's father died before
her genius had developed itself beyond any other
indication
of great powers than imitating the language of
every animal she heard. This early habit gave her, no
doubt, a flexibility of organs. In the present day a
young lady may have the gift of half a dozen tongues,
and a more accurate knowledge of all than her own,
without exciting wonder; but it must be remembered
that Ann flourished nearly two centuries ago. Her
mother was a good hearted, honest, respectable woman,
and early discovered that she had brought a prodigy
into the world. This discovery mothers are daily making
now, and prodigies have so much multiplied, that nobody
is surprised to find the youngest or the oldest child a
complete wonder. The mother was constantly relating
instances of the extraordinary talents of her child, and,
among other things, affirmed, before a number of people
who were afterwards summoned as witnesses against the
girl, that she could say her letters before she could speak;
which, if the woman had not explained her meaning by
stating that she could pick them out of the alphabet
before
she could articulate, was certainly enough to have
hung her for a witch in any court of justice.
A Dutch family removed from New Amsterdam to
New Haven. Formerly the people of New Amsterdam
had designated the inhabitants of New Haven as
`squatters,' and now the term was thrown back on the
respectable and ancient family of Von Poffenburghs,
who, though they purchased every inch of land they
occupied, were, most unjustly, by way of contempt,
called squatters. Some say that nothing serious was
meant by this appellation, and that it was only in
derision
of the superabundance of petticoats that were worn
by vrowe Von Poffenburgh, which, when she seated
herself, gave her an appearance to which the above
injurious term might be applied. They built a low
house with slanting roof and gable ends, and though it
might show meanly by the side of our city houses, was
then considered one of `exceeding costliness.'
It must be confessed that the goede vrowe discovered
a little more pride in dress than was congenial to the
VOL. II. 17
simplicity of the times. It was said she never walked
out with less than ten petticoats, and as confidently
asserted she could bring ten more to cover them. And
then her jewelry was of the most extravagant kind.
She wore her pin-ball and scissors dangling at her side
by a massy silver chain, and her square buckles
contained
more silver than any other lady's in the colony.
The shortness of her petticoats excited much
indignation
among the New England dames. They said there
would have been some excuse had economy been the
object, but it was evident what was taken from the
length was put on to the breadth. They therefore very
candidly concluded that their brevity was contrived to
show off a pair of red stockings with gold clocks, well
fitted to ankles that did not discredit the epithet of
Dutch built.
Unfortunately for poor Ann, the vrowe took a great
fancy to her, and said she was the very image of her
little Dirk Von Poffenburgh, who died when he was a
baby. Nothing would do but Ann must have a set of
petticoats, and she actually rigged out the poor girl
with buckles as big as her own. Some said they were
silver, and others that they were only pewter, and
scoured every week with the plates and porringers.
At any rate she did enough to draw the hatred and envy
of the whole village upon her.
It is no wonder that Ann, who could imitate the
language
of dumb beasts, should catch the vrowe's. It
was surely pleasanter to make human sounds than to
baa-a
like sheep, or
moo-o
like cows. In a very short
time she could speak Dutch as well as mynheer himself.
All this at first had no other consequence than exciting
envy and ill will; but, not content with two tongues,
Ann contrived to exercise a third. She spoke strange,
unknown words, that even the Dutch people confessed
they could not understand themselves. About this time
the witches began their gambols in New England, and
one of the strongest evidences against them was
speaking
in an unknown tongue. Ann began to be looked
upon with an evil eye. It was not, however, till a
young man by the name of Hall became strangely
affected, that the whole village grew alarmed. It was
said that she had so bewitched him by her arts and
infernal charms that he could do nothing but follow her
about like a Jack-o'lantern. It was generally agreed
that he used to be a steady, business-like young man,
but since he had known her he had neglected all work,
and would saunter whole nights under her window.
This was bad enough, but when other young men began
to show symptoms of the same kind, it was time to look
into the matter. There were some strong arguments
used by the more intelligent and candid against her
being an actual witch. It was said by every one who
had deeply studied the subject, that the `abominable
and damnable sin' of witchcraft was wholly confined to
ugly old women, whose faces were wrinkled by time,
whose joints were distorted by rheumatism, and whose
steps were tottering from debility. Now it could not be
denied that Ann was fair to look upon, her complexion
as smooth as marble, and her step as firm and elastic
as that of a mountain deer. Possibly these favorable
circumstances might have acquitted her in the eyes of
the venerable magistrates and divines of Salem; but
they did not at all meliorate the feelings of the mothers
and daughters at New Haven, who sat in judgment
upon poor Ann. They unanimously pronounced that
she was a sorceress, and that her beauty was nothing
but a mask, and if it were stripped off, she would be
ugly and old enough to excite the indignation of any
magistrate in New England, or even Cotton Mather
himself. At any rate the effect she produced began to
excite serious alarm.
At this time there lived at New Haven a very
excellent
,
good hearted woman, by the name of Eyers.
She had heard all these stories of Ann, and not being a
full believer in witches, had a laudable curiosity to
behold
one. Accordingly she sent for her to come and
see her; when, strange to say, after a few hours
conversation
,
she became apparently under the influence
of her spells, and used to invite her to make long visits
at her house.
It could not be expected that things would be suffered
to go on in this way, and, accordingly, a warrant was
issued for apprehending Ann Jones accused of the
`abominable and damnable sin of witchcraft.' She was
arrested and thrown into prison. But as the judges
were not so expert and so much practised in finding out
witches as in Salem, and as nobody appeared against
her but a few girls of her own age, and half a dozen
children who said she had come to them under the shape
of a black cat, the magistrates were unwise enough to
dismiss her. This acquittal, however, did not release
Ann from suspicion. It grew stronger than ever. She
had always from her childhood loved to wander over
hills and valleys. She was healthy and robust, and
never hesitated to take her walks because the wind blew,
or the sky lowered. With her little red cloak wrapped
round her, and her gay and happy face peeping from
the hood, she braved every element. As she grew older
she still preserved her taste for rambling, and, as she
could now go nowhere without observation, her favorite
haunts were soon discovered. It was said she was often
seen vibrating on a broomstick in the air between East
and West Rocks, and alighting alternately on each; and
that, though the latter was a perpendicular cliff, rising
three hundred feet, she would run up that, or the side
of a house with the greatest ease. It was also said that
she was once seen standing on the top of this
tremendous
rock, and that somebody fired at her and she sunk
down into the earth. It was supposed she was
laid
for
one while, when, to their horror, they saw her a few
hours afterwards looking as bright and as happy as ever.
Wherever she walked she found her path impeded by
broomsticks and horseshoes, and, though she skipped
over them good humoredly, it was confidently asserted
that she was always stopped by their infallible power.
About this time, new accounts arrived of the `
wonder
working providence of God in detecting the witches
in various parts of New England.' It was thought by
many people a disgrace to New Haven that it had not
signalized itself in this business, and Ann was more
closely inspected than ever. At length it was actually
discovered, that she was often met by a mysterious
looking personage, who shuffled along as if he had a
cloven foot, and some averred that they had positively
seen it. It was easy now to account for her strange
languages
.
There could be no doubt but this mysterious
being was Beelzebub himself, and there were various
conjectures upon the nature of their connexion. Some
supposed she had made a league with him and signed
the bond with her blood; that he had supplied her with
her buckles, and was finally to be rewarded with her
immortal soul. Others supposed she was his wife and
coadjutor with him. It was not however till some months
after she had been seen with this mysterious personage
that the worst suspicions were realized. Mrs Eyers'
kitchen was situated on the street. The windows were
low and it was an edifying sight to look into them. The
dressers and shelves were garnished with bright pewter
plates, standing on their edges, and peeping through
17 *
rows of tin sauce pans, dippers, and skimmers, that hung
suspended from the shelves, while a shining brass
warming
pan and chaffing dish garnished the wainscot. A
woman happening to pass by, cast her eye with a little
maidenly curiosity into the kitchen, and beheld Ann
Jones sitting there and conversing with her demon!
The alarm was immediately given, and Mrs Eyers, who
happened to be visiting in the neighbourhood, was one of
the first to hear the horrible story. It may well be
supposed
that she was in great agitation and immediately
hastened home, but, before she arrived, people had
collected
and surrounded the house. Mrs Eyers
immediately
proposed that all the outside shutters should be
closed, the door fastened and the key holes stopped, lest
Ann and her familiar should escape. This was done
with the greatest expedition by some, while others went
for a warrant to apprehend the girl. It was said that
some were absurd enough to suppose that even
Beelzebub
might be laid fast hold of and brought to trial,
Strict watch was kept upon the roof and the chimnies
for it was thought an easy thing for them to escape in
this clandestine manner. At length the warrant arrived.
Expectation and curiosity were wound up to their highest
pitch, the door was carefully opened, when, to the
horror and astonishment of everybody present, not a
living soul was to be seen! The strictest investigation
was made; they searched in every corner and every
closet; up chimney and down cellar; no traces could
be found, and, it was clear, Beelzebub had claimed
his wife!
Months and years passed away, and nothing was
heard of Ann Jones. Her mother could not endure the
disgrace of having such a son-in-law, and very soon
after this discovery disappeared from New Haven.
Mrs Eyers never could be prevailed on to mention her
name, and young Hall, who had been Ann's fast friend,
removed to a distant part of the country.
It was not till many years after, that a worthy
clergyman
was travelling in Vermont, and made inquiries for
a Mrs Hall, for whom he had a letter. When he was
introduced to her he was struck by former recollections.
`You do n't know me?' said she, smiling.
`Not exactly,' he replied, `and yet I think I have
seen you before.'
`You do n't remember the little witch, Ann Jones?'
said she.
`Indeed I do,' he exclaimed, starting up and taking
her hand, `and I have now a letter for you from our
worthy friend Mrs Eyers.'
`I had a hard time of it,' replied Ann, `at New
Haven. You know how long I was accused as a
sorceress
,
because my husband there chose to fall in love
with me and conduct himself as if he was bewitched,
and then, too, because an excellent friend taught me
Latin, and I had the wit to catch a little smattering of
Dutch, I was supposed to be possessed of an evil spirit.
But the good people were not so much to blame as they
might appear,' continued she, `and I freely forgive
them their persecution; for it must be confessed there
were some suspicious appearances.'
`So I have understood,' said the clergyman, gravely.
`You did not know, then,' said she, `that I was
employed as an agent by Mrs Eyers, and our good
minister, Mr Davenport, to carry food to a poor man
who lived in a cave on West Rock?'
`No,' replied the gentleman, `nor how you escaped
from your persecutors.'
`It is a simple story,' said she,' marvellous as it
seems. Mrs Eyers had a closet made behind one of the
pannels of her kitchen, so exactly fitted and covered with
kitchen utensils that no one ever suspected it was there.
With this secure retreat in case of danger, the poor
gentleman could sometimes quit his cave and live like
a Christian, and, in return for my services, he taught
me many useful branches of knowledge. When the
alarm was given and the shutters closed, we retreated
to the closet and escaped discovery. But my friends
began to think it was best for me to quit New Haven
before I was hung or drowned, and so,' added she,
`I came to this spot with my husband. My mother
joined me, and here we have lived for fifteen years.
I have a healthy family of children, and keep up a
constant
correspondence with Mrs Eyers, who has never
ceased to show me kindness for the little service I did
her friend.'
`May I ask,' said the clergyman, `who was the
gentleman
you so essentially served?'
`You may,' said she, `for he has now gone to his
account. He is beyond the reach of friends or enemies.
He sleeps under the clod of the valley. It was
Goffe
,
the regicide judge
.'
THE POET'S DREAM.
The
poet sleeps in his attic rude,
And visions over his brain are dancing
Now he sees, in frolic mood,
The tiny fays of night advancing.
Round and round, in their careless glee,
The clear blue lake they deftly skim,
And oft in their wayward revelry,
They point their ebony wands at him.
Now, to the measure of elfin lyre,
And lute, they move in their reckless play;
Or with wands erect, in gay attire,
Featly march on their star-lit way.
Hushed are elfin lyre and lute
'T is the thrilling bugle and rolling drum;
A column of soldiers, proud and mute
Hither in bold array they come.
Fierce, they encounter the shadowy foe
He hears the roar and the din of war,
The clarion-peal and the shriek of woe,
And sees the lances gleaming far.
The poet arose at the break of day,
With a firm and heroic air,
And he framed a glowing and martial lay
Of deeds that were done in the olden day;
Of knights who their bold compeers did slay,
Mid the cymbal's clash and the trumpet's bray,
And were crowned with palm-leaves there.
HOPE.
BY WILLIAM GRIGG, M. D.
Hope
is the bird that we fondly chase
Through the day from early dawn;
When night has come and we 're sure of him,
We grasp, but the bird has gone.
So when the lake on its surface shows
The bubble some spell has woke,
We endeavour to dip up the fairy shell,
But alas! the bubble is broke.
The simple child as he strives to grasp
The sunbeam upon the wall,
Is astonished to find that the light is gone,
Unknowing he shades its fall.
Just so with man;for the bird of hope
He follows, though still it flies,
The bubble he breaks, and the light he shades,
And when they vanish, he dies.
But hopes that spring in the lover's heart,
When dreams of misery lower,
Beam bright on his soul as the glaring light
That breaks through the summer shower
And dear to him is their hallowed smile
As the holy rays that shine
On the flower that 's doomed through the chilling storm,
For that nourishing light to pine.
In their welcome glow the future seems
Arrayed in her best attire,
And his ear is filled with the rapturous sound
She flings from her golden lyre.
Alas! should the blissful spell be broke
And those hopes be quenched in tears,
Oh! never again will their brightness shine
As in scenes of early years.
The soldier's hope is the down that 's borne
On the breeze from spray to spray,
Though wooing the hand and eluding the grasp,
Still taking its flight away,
Till the soldier sees the brittle thread
Connecting success with power,
When the monarch resolves that the free born soul
At his footstool's base shall cower;
But the down will sport on freedom's breeze,
And float o'er liberty's shore,
Until, wet with the gush of the hireling's blood,
It can skim the breeze no more;
And when on the earth it quiet lies,
Where slumber the freeborn brave,
It is dearer by far to the soldier's eye,
Than the gem that decks the slave.
The scholar's hope is the praise that comes
From the lips of his fellow men,
Until Echo has whispered from distant climes,
The enchanting sound again;
That voice is heard, and his bosom heaves
With pleasures unknown before;
But that voice will be hushed, and Echo die,
And tell of that praise no more;
And the richest wreath that art can weave
O'er the scholar's furrowed brow,
Will let fall its leaves when the wintry winds
Shall wither hope's verdant bough;
But Time shall gaze on the scholar's book,
And shall read the scholar's name,
And he will decide if that word be writ
On the scroll of deathless fame.
A BURIAL AT SEA.
BY S. G. GOODRICH.
The
shore hath blent with the distant skies,
O'er the bend of the crested seas,
And the gallant ship in her pathway flies,
On the sweep of the freshened breeze.
Oh! swift be thy flight, for a dying guest
Thou bearest o'er the billow,
And she fondly sighs in her own blue West
To find a peaceful pillow
'T is vain!for her pulse is silent now,
Her lip hath lost its breath,
And a strange, sad beauty of the brow
Speaks the cold stroke of death.
The ship heaves to, and the funeral rite
O'er the lovely form is said,
And the rough man's cheek with tears is bright,
As he lowers the gentle dead.
The corse floats down alonealone,
To its dark and dreary grave,
And the soul on a lightened wing hath flown,
To the world beyond the wave.
'T is a fearful thing in the sea to sleep
Alone in a silent bed,
'T is a fearful thing on the shoreless deep
Of a spirit world to tread.
But the sea hath rest in its twilight caves,
To the weary pilgrim given,
And the soul is blest on the peaceful waves
Of the star-lit deep of heaven.
The ship again o'er the wide blue surge
Like a winged arrow flies,
And the moan of the sea is the only dirge
Where the lonely sleeper lies.
THE SIEGE OF SOLEURE.
There
can hardly be any traditions more interesting
to Americans than those which relate to Switzerland.
The love of liberty, which animated this brave and hardy
race for so many years, is of too kindred a spirit to our
own contest for freedom, not to awaken the most lively
emotions. We read their history, and we feel that they
are brethrennot from the common stock of Adam, but
from sympathy and that power of mind which proclaims
all men free.
The town of Soleure is situated amongst the
mountains
of Jura, and along the fertile and romantic vale of
Balstal. It is the capital of the canton which bears the
same name, and is watered by the beautiful river Aar.
The town is small, but neat, and surrounded by stone
fortifications. It claims the honor of having been built
originally by our great father Abraham; and its public
repositories exhibit inscriptions and medals, that give it
the highest title to antiquity.
VOL. II. 18
Perhaps it is not merely in moral qualities that some
resemblance may be traced between our favored land
and this land of beauty. We have rivers that may vie
with theirs in scenery and grandeur, nor can our
mountains
be considered mole hills when compared with the
dark Jura or snow crowned Alps. Even the celebrated
fall of the Rhine must yield to our cataract of rushing
waters. That there is more of wild and sublime scenery
condensed in Switzerland is undoubtedly true; and he
who has stood on its summits and lingered in its vallies,
has enjoyed a happiness which will give new
associations
to the romantic scenery of this western world.
Hugo Von Bucheg
was a venerable burger and chief
magistrate of the town of Soleure. He had long been
regarded as father of the Council, and the people placed
their reliance upon him in every time of danger. His
habits were plain and simple. He had amassed no
wealth, for his services were given and not sold. One
treasure he possessed which he considered beyond all
price, and that was his only child, Ellen. She had
early lost her mother, and had spent her time almost as
she pleased, in wandering about the suburbs of Soleure,
gathering plants for her collections, and accumulating
a stock of health, energy, and cheerfulness. It must
not be supposed that this life of freedom was without
system. It was consistent with Swiss habits and opinions.
`My daughter,' said the old Bucheg, `is studying the
wisest book in the worldthat of nature.' And so
thought Ellen; for, except a common school education,
she had had few advantages; yet her mind had expanded
beyond her years, and every object filled it with new
thoughts and associations.
She was yet at a tender age, when her father received
a most earnest letter from his only sister, who resided
in the valley of Lauterbrunn, entreating him to spare
his daughter to her for a few months, representing the
solitude of her own situation, and the want she had of
youthful and cheering society. The last plea he could
not resist, and Ellen was, for the first time, separated
from her father.
She found her aunt, who was a widow, sick and low
spirited. It was a new situation for Ellen. Hitherto
her life had demanded but few sacrifices; but now her
duties began, and day and night she was seated by her
bedside. Sickness often makes people selfish and
unreasonable
.
The invalid was unwilling to part with her
newly acquired solace for a moment, and Ellen could
only gaze upon the beautiful scenery around her,
without
being allowed to plunge into its depths. It was not
till her health and spirits drooped, that she gained
permission
to walk at sunset. At first the rapidity with
which she moved along was almost free from thought.
It was recoved liberty; and to gaze upon the heavens,
the waters, and the woods, to feel that she could leap
from rock to rock, could sing her favorite songs, and
disturb no one, was rapture.
As she was returning home, a neat little edifice, which
was built for a place of public worship, arrested her
eye. With slow steps she wound her way through the
burying-ground, and entered the door of the house.
It was perfectly plain, and had none of the picturesque
decorations of a Roman Catholic chapel. Ellen was
educated in the Reformed religion, and the place was
sacred to her. She knelt down and thanked the Supreme
Being for her recovered liberty. `My aunt is a good,
pious woman,' thought she, as she returned home, `and
will not object to my coming here to say my prayers
every night.' When she made the proposal, however,
the invalid objected.
`If you were a Roman Catholic,' said she, `there
would be some sense in walking a mile to say your
prayers.'
`But if I can pray better there than anywhere else,
where is the harm?' said Ellen.
At length the aunt consented, and it was the only
relaxation from constant attendance that she possessed.
Soon, however, Ellen found it expedient to repair to the
chapel to say her morning prayers, and she arose an
hour or two earlier, that she might be back in time to
take her station in the dark and confined chamber of
her aunt when she awoke.
Slight as was the circumstance, it associated her mind
with all that was sublime and beautiful in devotion.
When the glorious sun arose, it was, to her, like the
Creator lifting the curtain of the night and coming forth
from the darkness of his pavilion. As she gazed on
the valley and cottages, and listened to the notes of the
shepherd's pipe, to the tinkling bells of the herds of
cattle, and heard their deep, sonorous voices, she broke
forth in the spirit of Milton;
`Parent of Good! these are thy works.'
Nor were her associations less delightful at the hour
of evening. It was to gaze upon the groups of healthy,
happy children who ran to meet their parents returning
from a day of laborto see the affectionate wife
preparing
her little repast before the door, and all breathing
the language of domestic affection.
She had gazed late on this scene one evening, and
turned slowly away to pursue her path homewards.
As she proceeded, she perceived she should be obliged
to pass a herd of cattle which had no herdsman. Her
habits were fearless, and she did not hesitate. Suddenly
one of the animals sprung furiously from the rest, and
rushed towards her. She looked around, a frightful
death seemed inevitable. To escape by flight was
impossible
.
At that moment the report of a gun struck
her ear, the animal staggered, groaned, and fell dead at
her feet. A sickness came over her, and she knew
nothing till she found herself supported by a young man
dressed in a military uniform.
`You have saved my life,' she exclaimed.
`It was a fortunate shot,' said he, smiling. `I do n't
often make as good a one, for I have been out all day
and have not brought down any game. My uncle's
house is not very far distant; may I conduct you to it?'
`I must go to my aunt's,' said Ellen, `but I shall
need your assistance to get there.'
He raised her up and gave her his arm, and they
stood a minute to gaze on the powerful animal that lay
stretched before them. The ball had entered his heart.
Not a drop of blood was visible.
`This will make a feast in the valley,' said the youth;
`I will give a
fte
in honor of your safety; will you not
witness it?'
Ellen sighed to think how impossible it would be to
gain her aunt's consent. At the door the stranger
bowed and left her.
The impression upon the young girl's mind was deep
and lasting. That night her aunt's illness greatly
increased
.
A despatch was sent for her father, but,
before
his arrival, his sister had breathed her last. She
went no more to the chapel, but returned to Soleure
with her father.
Two years passed away, and Ellen's recollections of
the stranger were yet fresh in her mind. `He saved
my life,' said she; `I hope I shall see him again.'
But new scenes were fast crowding upon her, and left
no room for the wanderings of imagination. Leopold,
18*
Duke of Austria, was approaching Soleure with the
avowed resolution of besieging its walls. An inordinate
thirst for victory had taken possession of his mind.
He believed it glory to conquer even the innocent and
free, and he swore to his brother, the emperor, to plant
the Austrian standard on the towers of Soleure.
The attack had commenced, and Ellen stood gazing
on the scene. She neither wept nor spoke, but was
motionless as a marble statue. Her father cast one
glance on her, and hastened where his duty called.
The wailings of women and children for their husbands
and fathers, from whom they were for the first time
separated, the thunder of the cannon which made even
the earth tremble, the cries of exultation and despair,
mingled with the groans of the wounded, all struck
upon the ear of Ellen. She flew from street to street,
forgetful of her own safety, at one moment in search
of her father, and, the next, administering comfort to
those as wretched as herself.
At length the tumult ceased. The thunder of the
cannon was heard no longer, and the glad tidings were
communicated from mouth to mouth that the enemy
were repulsed and had retreated to their encampment.
Scarce had Ellen rejoiced in this intelligence, when she
beheld her father approaching, supported by his friends.
`Merciful Heaven!' she exclaimed, `you are wounded.'
`Come with me, my child,' said he, `and thank the
Supreme Being for this respite from our calamities.
My wound is nothing, but you will bind it up.'
With the tenderest care she applied the emollients
necessary, then, kneeling at his feet, bathed his hand
with her tears. At length her father requested her to
be calm and listen to him.
`We have,' said he, `this time, defended the walls of
Soleure and repulsed the enemy; but they will return
to the attack with new vigor. Our resources are
exhausted
,
our last ammunition expended, and the banner
of Austria will soon wave over the ruins of this devoted
place; but I have still my duty to perform, and to this
there is but one obstacle. I know what fate awaits you
from a rude and victorious soldiery in the heat of
conquest
.
There is but one resourceyou must repair to
Leopold. He is brave and generous. You will be safe
from insult, and I, free to do my duty as a soldier.
Away! it is my command. Answer me not! Give
this letter to the duke. God bless thee, my dear, my
only treasure!'
Ellen sunk upon her knees and pressed her father's
hand to her lips; but he rushed from her into his room,
and his sobs were audible.
When he came out he gazed upon the bridge over
which Ellen was to pass. Her slight figure was faintly
visible, preceded by a flag of truce, and at length faded
away.
`Now I am childless,' said he; `I have only to die
for my country.'
Surrounded by the chiefs and nobles of his army, sat
Duke Leopold, upon a seat adorned with gold and
purple, which served him for a throne, deliberating
with them upon the most effectual means of attacking
Soleure. The curtain of the pavilion was raised, and
an officer entered and informed him, that a young
woman, the daughter of Bucheg, requested admission.
Leopold looked exultingly upon his nobles. `Has
he sent his daughter to melt our purposes?' said he;
`does he think that youth and beauty can beguile our
resolution? Let her enter, and we will show her that
our blood is warmed only by glory.'
Again the curtain was raised, and Ellen, dressed in
the plainest manner, entered. She approached the
duke and bent one knee to the ground. `Noble prince,'
said she, `I come to you as a petitioner to claim your
protection;' and she placed her father's letter in his
hand.
The duke looked earnestly at her, as did also his
nobles with still greater curiosity. The effort of courage
was over. Her eyes were cast down, and her whole
frame trembled with emotion.
`My lord!' said the duke, addressing an old man
who stood near, `support this young woman to a seat.'
He then unfolded the letter, and read;
`
My Noble Prince
`She who brings you this letter is my only child
all the treasure I possess in this world. Therefore, I
trust her to you, relying on your honor. If the walls of
Soleure fall, I shall be buried under their ruins; but if
you grant your protection to my daughter, I shall have
no more anxiety for her. Give me some token that
you grant my petition, and you will receive your reward
from that Being who watches over the innocent, and
who knows our hearts.
`
Bucheg
,
Magistrate of Soleure
.'
A deep silence prevailed. At length the duke said,
`Upon the line of our encampment let the banner of
the Austrian army be planted, crowned with a green
garland. By this token the magistrate will know that he
has not mistaken Leopold. Count, to you I confide this
young maiden; I know your integrity; your gray hairs,
bleached in the service of your country, are a pledge
of security. Yet one more I desireit is your son.
I take him for a hostage. You know that I love him
as if he were my own. Therefore, by the value of this
pledge, he will know how highly I estimate my
protection
,
given to the daughter of Bucheg. But where is
the young count?' continued the duke; `I miss him
unwillingly from among my friends.'
`He is at his post,' answered the father; `I expect
him every moment. In the mean time suffer me to
express
my thanks for the confidence you place in me, as
well as for your kindness to my son.'
The old count now took the hand of Ellen, and said,
`You have heard, my dear child, the command of the
duke. I hope you will trust yourself to me.'
As he spoke, his son entered the pavilion. He gazed
at the scene before him in speechless astonishment.
Ellen, too, seemed overcome by her situation. The
deepest blushes suffused her face and neck, while her
eyes were cast down and her heart beat with violence.
`You wonder, my young friend,' said the duke, `how
this fair creature came among us rough warriors; but
you will be still more astonished when you learn that
you must welcome her as your sister. She is the only
daughter of the magistrate of Soleure. Her father has
confided her to me, and I give her in trust to yours, and
thus is the mystery explained. But I am convinced the
young lady must need rest and refreshment.
Therefore
I request you to see that she is properly lodged
and guarded.'
With what delight did the young count receive this
command! A tent was immediately devoted to the
proteg
of the duke, and Ellen, once more alone, exclaimed,
`I have found him at lengththe preserver of my life!
whose image for three years has filled my waking and
sleeping hours! Alas! how have I found him? in arms
against my country, against my father and my fellow
citizens! Already his name has inspired me with terror,
for he has been first in the attack. What is my
worthless
life in comparison with the liberty and safety of my
country? Oh! how have I wasted years in the
expectation
of meeting its preserver, and now I find him my
bitterest foe.'
Her tears fell in torrents. There is no calamity so
hard to bear as that which overthrows years of
self-delusion
.
Ellen had lost no actual good; but the castle
she had erected was now laid prostrate, and she stood,
desolate, amongst its ruins.
The darkness of night came on. The rain had
descended
for several days and it now fell in torrents.
Yet still the young count walked as centinel around
the tent which contained his father's charge. He had
recognised in her the beautiful girl that he had so
fortunately
befriended in the valley of Lauterbrunn, and
though, since that event, he had often thought of her,
his was an active and busy life, and he had not, like
Ellen, wasted days and years in castle building. Man
yields to present emotion, but woman can live on ideal
happiness. He fully believed that he should see her no
more, and had ceased to think of her; whereas she had
considered her destiny as united to his, and looked
forward
with confidence to the moment they should meet.
It was not with indifference that the young man now
beheld her. A tide of passion rushed over his soul.
Perhaps he read his influence in the depth of her
emotion. He gazed upon the tent she occupied, and
wished it were his duty to share it with her. `But this
can never be,' thought he. `To-morrow, soon as the
morning dawns, I must be first to prostrate the walls of
her native place, and perhaps I am doomed to destroy
her father. Would that I had never seen her, and then
I should have gone cheerfully to the battle!' A new
idea struck him. Perhaps Ellen might have influence
enough to persuade her father to surrender, without
risking fruitless opposition; at least he would make the
attempt. With cautious steps he approached the
curtain
,
and spoke in a low voice.
`Who calls?' said Ellen.
`It is your guard, Count Papenheim,' said he. `May
I ask a conference with you? I have business to
communicate
respecting your father.'
Ellen made no reply, and, raising the curtain, he
entered. The traces of tears were still on her face.
`I come,' said he, `to inform you, that early
tomorrow
morning we attack the walls of Soleure. They
must fall, all opposition will be useless. The lives that
are dear to you may be sacrificed in their defence, and
the blood of your citizens deluge the streets; but it is
all in vain. I come, then, to beg you to use your
influence
with your father to spare this useless conflict.
Write, and I will see that he has the letter before
morning. Tell him that we know the state of the town;
that it is without ammunition, and that the walls are
tottering. By resisting, ruin is inevitable, by
capitulating
,
he may obtain honorable terms.'
When the young man entered Ellen had flung herself
on a seat, pale, trembling, and shrinking from his view;
but, as he proceeded, the color mantled in her cheeks,
and when he had ended, she stood erect. `Rely not
too much on the weakness of our resources,' said she;
`it is for freedom we are contending, and every man feels
that he is a host. Do you think that if my father would
listen to terms, he would have sent me, his only child,
among his enemies for protection? No! he will shed
the last drop of his blood for his country, and were I to
propose capitulation, he would spurn my letter. You
must do your duty; but remember that it is against the
innocent you war, and make not the life you once
preserved
,'
continued she, bursting into tears, `valueless,
by taking that of my father.'
It is said there is wonderful power in woman's tears,
and so it would seem, for the young man appeared for
a moment to forget his errand. At length he said,
`I give you my solemn word that your father's life, as
far as it is consistent with my duty, shall be guarded
with my own.'
`You will know him,' said she, `by his white hair,
by his firm, yet mild demeanour, by his resolution to
die rather than yield. But,' added she, with dignity,
`every citizen resembles him in this determination; all
are my fathers or brothers.'
A loud noise was heard at a distance. The soldier
rushed from the tent. A fearful strife had begun, of a
nature which baffled the might of man.
It is well known with what overwhelming fury the
Aar sometimes rushes along, destroying and laying
waste the country through which it passes. Six days of
incessant rain had increased its waters to an alarming
height, and besides deluging the country around, its
waves rose alarmingly high, and spurned all restraint.
The greatest consternation prevailed throughout the
army. All were in motion. The only hope that
remained
was from the bridge that bound both shores.
It was built of stone, and they hoped it might resist the
force of the waters, and, to secure this object, was their
immediate aim. It was necessary to load it with
immense
weight, and Leopold ordered men and horses to
this post. `It is our only chance,' said he; `if the
bridge gives way we are lost.'
The danger every moment increased. Nothing could
exceed the horror of the scene. The darkness of the
night making more terrible the groans and cries of those
who waited on the shore the frightful death that was
approaching. The Austrians, who had so lately
threatened
immediate destruction to the devoted town of
Soleure, stood with their conquering banners in their
hands. What mighty arm could now help them in their
need! There was but one, and that seemed already
raised for their destruction.
It was now that the danger reached its crisis. The
bridge tottered to its base, yet it still stood, when, as if
to mock their fruitless efforts, the wind suddenly arose,
the few remaining soldiers rushed on it, and, amid the
howling of the storm and the cries and exclamations of
the army, the bridge suddenly gave way, and the waters
rushed over them!
Now were the gates of Soleure thrown open and the
inhabitants issued forth with desperate resolution. In
a moment the wild and tempestuous Aar was covered
with rafts and boats. Fearless of the death that
threatened
,
they pursued their object, and, by their flaming
torches, discovered the victims who were sinking.
Every measure was used, and the greater part saved,
conveyed to the town, and the gates immediately closed.
By the light of the torches, Leopold beheld what was
going forward. He saw his army in the hands of the
enemy and not a possibility of preventing it. `Shame!
shame!' he cried, `unheard of cruelty, to sieze such a
dreadful moment of public calamity to satisfy their
murderous
thirst for human life, to condemn their fellow
beings to a second death! My brave soldiers and
companions
!
would that you had sunk beneath the wave!
It is frightful! it deserves revenge and shall have it
bloody revenge. The walls of Soleure shall be laid
prostrate, and every citizen pay with his life this
horrible
outrage; and as for Buchegha! well thought of,'
cried he, starting up, `have I not the weapon in my
hand that will pierce his heart? The ungrateful wretch!
VOL. II. 19
Did I not receive his daughter with the tenderness of a
parent? did I not give my word to protect her? His
baseness exceeds human comprehension. Go,' he
exclaimed
to one of his attendants, `bring the girl here.
Her father shall bitterly repent of his outrage.'
`My noble lord, and prince,' said the young Count
Papenheim, his eyes sparkling with fire, and his cheeks
glowing with emotion, `I am the youngest of your
guards; but if none else will speak, I will beseech
you, for the sake of your plighted word, not to withdraw
your protection. You are just and good; do not in a
moment of anger commit a deed that you will forever
repent.' At this moment Ellen appeared. She was
pale, and evidently suspected some new calamity
awaited
her. The father of the young count gazed sternly
upon him. `What means this unwonted excitement?'
said he. `Is it for mercy only you plead? I marked
your confusion the first time you saw this young woman
in the pavilion of the duke; what am I to believe?'
`My dearest father,' said the count, seizing his hand,
`it was not the first time that I had seen her. It was on
a visit to my uncle in the valley of Lauterbrunn that I
met her. I knew not her name, and though I have often
thought of her, had given up all expectation of seeing
her again. I see, my prince,' continued he, raising his
eyes to the duke, `that you hear my acknowledgment with
scorn and suspicion. It is now too late for concealment.
I love her, and, kneeling, implore your mercy for her.'
The duke looked angry and perturbed, and cast
gloomy and threatning glances around him. His nobles
spoke not a word. All was still; even the storm was
hushed, and the roaring of winds and waters had ceased.
Ellen had supported herself to the utmost, but,
overcome
by terror and emotion, was sinking to the ground,
when the young count rushed forward to support her.
`Away!' exclaimed the duke, `they shall both be
put under guard.'
At that moment a page entered and informed the
duke that his army were returning with the magistrate
at their head.
`Oh! my father!' exclaimed Ellen, springing forward.
The duke and his nobles gazed upon each other with
astonishment. `Let him enter,' exclaimed the duke,
sternly.
In a moment the venerable Bucheg appeared before
him. `My lord,' said he, `I deliver to you the men
whose lives we saved. All that their forlorn situation
required we have administered. I come in the name of
my fellow citizens to restore them to you as fellow men.
To-morrow it will be our hard lot to fight them as foes.
But I have one condition to make. Twelve of our
citizens
have lost their lives in saving your army. Their
families are left destitute. Should you enter our town
as a conqueror, protect the widows, orphans, and aged
parents of these victims to humanity. When Soleure is
no longer free I shall be no more; but I die willingly
for my country, confiding in the protection you have
promised to my daughter.'
Overcome by the magnanimity of Bucheg, the duke
sprung from his seat, and threw his arms around him.
`My heart will cease to beat,' said he, `and the blood
to flow in my veins, when I enter Soleure as a
conqueror
.
Witness, thou, its venerable magistrate! and you,
ye nobles! hear me, when I declare to you, what I will
repeat in the face of the world. In the name of the
emperor Frederick, I declare Soleure a free and
independent
state. To-morrow morning I will enter its walls,
not as a conqueror, but as a guest, and, with your
permission
,
plant upon its walls my banner, that it may
remain as a token of my friendship and gratitude to
future
generations, and towards the noble magistrate, the
father and protector of his country's freedom.
`But I have another duty to perform. Count
Papenheim
!
my old and well tried friend! will you grant a
request from your prince?'
A smile from the old man said more than words.
`My new found friend!' said he, addressing Bucheg,
`will you take this young man, whom I love as a son,
for your son-in-law? If your daughter declines, I have
nothing more to say.' The look of joy, of tenderness,
of blushing modesty, that she cast on the young count,
as, with a soldier's impetuosity, he threw his arms around
her, spoke no aversion even to the unprepared father.
`Take her, then,' said he, `it is all mystery, but I
trust in the goodness of that Being who has already
changed our mourning to joy.'
From this time Soleure has been joined to the
Helvetic
League, and acknowledged as a free and
independent
state.
ROMANCE.
The
warrior knelt before the maid
A blush came o'er her cheek;
Telling, as o'er her brow it played,
What not her tongue would speak.
`Ah! yes,' he softly said, `thou 'lt be
My own, my lily bride;'
And still, in maiden purity,
That maiden blush replied.
Life, love, and hope were in their spring,
Beneath a cloudless sky;
The wild bird spread its silken wing,
But breathed less melody;
Young nectar from the myrtle bower
The honey-bee might sip;
The warrior found a sweeter flower
In the dew of the maiden's lip.
Still does the wild bird cleave the sky,
The honey-bee is glad;
Why dim with tears that maiden's eye,
And why that warrior sad?
`Maiden! dost fear to meet the storm
That shades a soldier's way?
The gems that deck a lordling's form
Dost sigh for such as they?
`I woo thee not with glittering braid
And jewels for thy hair
The golden gift that wins the maid
An idle vow may bear.'
Still does the wild bird cleave the sky,
The honey-bee is glad,
Why dim with tears that maiden eye,
And why that warrior sad?
`To horse! to horse! my melody
Shall be the battle cry,
And the war trump of victory
As sweet as woman's sigh!
19 *
`For fettered birds go free again,
And love can dream of scorn;
When woman idly weaves the chain,
As idly be it worn.'
Still does the wild bird cleave the sky,
The honey-bee is gay,
But tears bedimmed that maiden's eye
As the warrior passed away.
`They say there 's bliss in the princely train,
And in a robe of pride;
Then wake for me the bridal strain'
The maiden said and sighed.
Loud laughter fills the banquet hall,
There 's music in the grove,
And steps as light as music's fall
To catch the voice of love.
She led the dance in merry glee,
Her song was on the wind,
And the red rose lay gracefully
Within her hair reclined.
But hark! the harpers minstrelsy
Of other days a part!
She glanced upon the myrtle tree
And icy felt her heart;
And a shade was on the festal hour,
The jewel lights grew dim;
She only saw that myrtle bower,
She only thought of him.
`Oh! take me where the breezes swell,
Far from the haunts of pride,
For they say there 's joy where wild flowers dwell'
The maiden said and sighed.
The forest blossoms bound her brow,
But the heart was cold below;
And if she wakes the harp-strings now,
What can they breathe but woe?
`That dreamthat dreamit comes again,
Linked with its broken vow;
As beautiful, as frail, as then,
They stand before me now!
`Gather the young, the fair, the free,
Where a thousand torches glare,
With lyre and wreath and revelry
Still is that vision there!
`It comes when summer skies are bright,
On the laugh of the morning breeze
It comes when evening's misty light
Has swept the sleeping seas'
An early rest in the sullen pall,
One dream with the death pang wove
Oh! never of gems or of festal hall
But that first young dream of love!
Norna
.
UNWRITTEN PHILOSOPHY.
BY N. P. WILLIS.
Nature there
Was with thee; she who loved us both, she still
Was with thee; and even so didst thou become
A silent poet; from the solitude
Of the vast sea didst bring a watchful heart
Still couchant, an inevitable ear,
And an eye practised like a blind man's touch.
Wordsworth
.
A summer
or two since, I was wasting a college
vacation among the beautiful creeks and falls in the
neighbourhood of New York. In the course of my
wanderings, up stream and down stream, sometimes on
foot, sometimes on horseback, and never without a book
for an excuse to loiter on the moss banks and beside the
edges of running water, I met frequently a young man
of a peculiarly still and collected eye, and a forehead
more like a broad slab of marble than a human brow.
His mouth was small and thinly cut, his chin had no
superfluous flesh upon it, and his whole appearance was
that of a man whose intellectual nature prevailed over
the animal. He was evidently a scholar. We had met
so frequently at last, that, on passing each other one
delicious
morning, we bowed and smiled simultaneously, and,
without further introduction, entered into conversation.
It was a temperate day in August, with a clear but
not oppressive sun, and we wandered down a long
creek together, mineralizing here, botanizing there, and
examining the strata of the ravines with that sort of
instinctive certainty of each other's attainments which
scholars always feel, and thrusting in many a little
wayside
parenthesis, explanatory of each other's history and
circumstances. I found that he was one of those pure
and unambitious men, who, by close application and
moderate living while in college, become in love with
their books; and, caring little for anything more than
the subsistence, which philosophy tells them is enough
to have of this world, settle down for life into a wicker
bottomed chair, more contentedly than if it were the
cushion of a throne.
We were together three or four days, and when I left
him, he gave me his direction and promised to write to
me. I shall give below an extract from one of his
letters. I had asked him for a history of his daily
habits, and any incidents which he might choose to
throw inhinting to him that I was the editor of a
periodical, and would be obliged to him if he would do
it minutely, and in a form of which I might avail myself
in the way of my profession.
After some particulars unimportant to the reader, he
proceeds;
`I keep a room at a country tavern. It is a quiet,
out of the way place, with a whole generation of elms
about it, and the greenest grass up to the very door,
and the pleasantest view in the whole country round
from my chamber window. Though it is a public house,
and the word
Hotel
swings in golden capitals under
a landscape of two hills and a river, painted for a sign
by some wandering Tinto, it is so orderly a town that
not a lounger is ever seen about the door, and the
noisiest traveller is changed to a quiet man, as it were
by the very hush of the atmosphere.
`Here, in my pleasant room, upon the second floor,
with my round table covered with choice books, my
shutters closed just so much as to admit light enough
for a painter, and my walls hung with the pictures
which adorned my college chambers, and are therefore
linked with a thousand delightful associations, I can
study my twelve hours a day, in a state of mind
beautifully
even and philosophical. I do not want for
excitement
.
The animal spirits, thanks to the Creator, are
sufficient at all times, with employment and temperate
living, to raise us above the common shadows of life;
and after a day of studious confinement, when my mind
is unbound and I go out and give it up to reckless
association, and lay myself open unreservedly to the
influences of natureat such a time, there comes
mysteriously
upon me a degree of pure joy, unmingled and
unaccountable, which is worth years of artificial
excitement
.
The common air seems to have grown rarer;
my step is strangely elastic; the sense of motion full of
unwonted dignity; my thoughts elevated; my
perceptions
of beauty acuter and more pleasurable, and my
better nature predominant and sublime. There is
nothing
in the future which looks difficult, nothing in my
ambition unattainable, nothing in the past which cannot
be reconciled with good; I am a purer and a better
man; and, though I am elevated in my own thoughts,
it will not lead to vanity, for my ideas of God and of my
fellow men have been enlarged also. This excitement
ceases soon; but it ceases like the bubbling of a
fountain
which leaves the waters purer for the influence
which has passed through themnot like the mirth of
the world, which ebbs like an unnatural tide and leaves
loathsomeness and disgust.
`Let no one say that such a mode of life is adapted to
peculiar constitutions, and can be relished by these only
Give me the veriest worldlingthe most devoted and the
happiest of fashionable ephemera, and if he has material
for a thought, and can take pride in the improvement
of his nature, I will so order his daily round, that, with
temperance and exercise, he shall be happier in one
hour spent within himself, than in ten wasted on folly.
`Few know the treasures in their own bosomsvery
few the elasticity and capacity of a well regulated mind
for enjoyment. The whole world of philosophers, and
historians, and poets, seem, to the secluded student, to
have labored but for his pleasure, and as he comes to
one new truth and beautiful thought after another, there
answers a chord of joy, richer than music, in his heart,
which spoils him for the coarser pleasures of the world.
I have seen my college chuma man, who, from a life
of mingled business and pleasure, became suddenly a
studentlean back in his chair at the triumph of an
argument or the discovery of a philosophical truth, and
give himself up for a few moments to the enjoyment of
sensations, which, he assured me, surpassed
exceedingly
the most vivid pleasures of his life. The mind is like
the appetite; when healthy and well toned, receiving
pleasure from the commonest food, but becoming a
disease
when pampered and neglected. Give it time to
turn in upon itself, satisfy its restless thirst for
knowledge
,
and it will give motion to health, animal spirits,
everything which invigorates the body, while it is
advancing
,
by every step, the capacities of the soul. Oh!
if the runners after pleasure would stoop down by the
wayside, they might drink waters, better even than
those which they see only in their dreams. They will
not be told that they have in their possession the golden
key which they covet; they will not know that the
music they look to enchant them is sleeping in their
own untouched instruments; that the lamp which they
vainly ask from the enchanter is burning in their own
bosoms!
`When I first came here, my host's eldest daughter
was about twelve years of age. She was, without being
beautiful, an engaging child, rather disposed to be
contemplative
,
and, like all children at that age, very
inquisitive
and curious. She was shy at first, but soon
became acquainted with me, and would come into my
room in her idle hours, and look at my pictures and
read. She never disturbed me, because her natural
politeness forbade it, and I pursued my thoughts or
my studies just as if she was not there, till, by and by,
I grew fond of her quiet company, and was happier
when she was moving stealthily around, and looking here
and there into a book in her quiet way.
`She had been my companion thus for some time, when
it occurred to me that I might be of use to her in
leading
her to cultivate a love for study. I seized the idea
enthusiastically. Now, thought I, I will see the
process
of a human mind. I have studied its philosophy
from books, and now I will take a single original, and
compare them, step by step. I have seen the bud, and
the flower full blown, and I am told that the change was
gradual, and effected thusleaf after leaf. Now I will
watch the expansion, and while I water it and let in the
sunshine to its bosom, detect the secret springs which
move to such beautiful results. The idea delighted me.
`I was aware that there was great drudgery in the first
steps, and I determined to avoid it, and connect the idea
of my own instruction with all that was interesting and
beautiful in her mind. For this purpose I persuaded
her father to send her to a better school than she had
been accustomed to attend, and, by a little conversation,
stimulated her to enter upon her studies with alacrity.
`She was now grown to a girl, and had begun to
assume
the
naive
, womanly airs which girls do at her age.
Her figure had rounded into a flowing symmetry, and
her face, whether from associating principally with an
older person, or for what other reason I know not, had
assumed a thoughtful cast, and she was really a girl of
most interesting and striking personal appearance.
`I did not expect much from the first year of my
experiment
.
I calculated justly on its being irksome and
commonplace. Still, I was amused and interested. I
could hear her light step on the stair, always at the
same early hour of the evening, and it was a pleasure
to me to say, `Come in,' to her timid rap, and set her a
chair by my own, that I might look over her book, or
talk in a low tone to her. I then asked her about her
lessons, and found out what had most attracted her
notice, and I could always find some interesting fact
connected with it, or strike off into some pleasant
association
,
till she acquired a habit of selection in her
reading
,
and looked at me earnestly to know what I would
say upon it. You would have smiled to see her leaning
forward, with her soft blue eye fixed on me, and her lips
half parted with attention, waiting for my ideas upon
some bare fact in geography or history; and it would
have convinced you that the natural, unstimulated mind
takes pleasure in the simplest addition to its knowledge.
`All this time I kept out of her way everything that
would have a tendency to destroy a taste for mere
knowledge, and had the pleasure to see that she passed
with a keen relish from her text books to my
observations
,
which were as dry as they, though recommended
by kindness of tone and an interested manner. She
acquired gradually, by this process, a habit of
reasoning
upon everything which admitted it, which was,
afterwards
,
VOL. II. 20
of great use in fixing and retaining the leading
features of her attainments.
`I proceeded in this way till she was fifteen. Her
mind had now become one of regular habits of thought,
and she began to ask difficult questions and wonder at
common things. Her thoughts assumed a graver
complexion
,
and she asked for books upon subjects of which
she felt the want of information. She was ready to
receive
and appreciate fine truth and beautiful
instruction
,
and here was to begin my pleasure.
`She came up, one evening, with an air of
embarrassment
approaching to distress. She took her usual seat,
and told me she had been thinking all day that it was
useless to study any more. There were so many
mysterious
thingsso much, even that she could see, which
she could not account for, and, with all her efforts, she
progressed so slowly, that she was discouraged. It was
better, she said, to be happy in ignorance, than to be
constantly tormented with the sight of knowledge to
which she could not attain, and which she only knew
enough to value. Poor child! she did not know that
she was making the same complaint with Newton and
Locke, and Bacon, and that the wisest of men were
only gatherers of pebbles on the shore of an
illimitable
sea! I began to talk to her of the mind. I spoke
of its grandeur, and its capacities, and its destiny. I
told her instances of high attainment and wonderful
discovery
sketched
the sublime philosophies of the soul
the possibility that this life was but a link in a chain of
existences, and the glorious power, if it were true, of
entering upon another world, with a loftier capacity than
your fellow beings for the comprehension of its mysteries.
I then touched upon the duty of self-cultivationthe
pride of a high consciousness of improved time, and the
delicious feelings of self-respect and true appreciation.
`She listened to me in silence and wept. It was one
of those periods, which occur to all delicate minds, of
distrust and fear; and when it passed by, and her
ambition
stirred again, she gave vent to her feelings with
a woman's beautiful privilege. I had no more trouble
to urge her on. She began the next day with the
philosophy
of the mind, and I was never happier than while
following her from step to step in this delightful study.
`I have always thought that the most triumphant
intellectual feeling we ever experience, is felt upon the
first opening of philosophy. It is like the interpretation
of a dream of a lifetime. Every topic seems to you like
a phantom of your own mind from which a mist has
suddenly melted. Every feature has a kind of half
familiarity, and you remember musing upon it for hours,
till you gave it up with an impatient dissatisfaction.
Without a definite shape, this or that very idea has
floated in your mind continually. It was a phenomenon
without a namea something which you could not
describe
to your friend, and which, by and by, you came
to believe was peculiar to yourself, and would never be
brought out or unravelled. You read on, and the blood
rushes to your face in a tumultuous consciousnessyou
have had feelings in peculiar situations which you could
not define, and here are their very featuresand you
know, now, that it was jealousy, or ambition, or love.
There have been moments when your faculties seemed
blinded or reversed. You could not express yourself
at all when you felt you should be eloquent. You could
not fix your mind upon the subject, of which, before,
you had been passionately fond. You felt an aversion
for your very partialities, or a strange warming in your
heart toward people or pursuits that you had disliked;
and when the beauty of the natural world has burst upon
you, as it sometimes will, with an exceeding glory, you
have turned away from it with a deadly sickness of
heart and a wish that you might die.
`These are mysteries which are not all soluble, even
by philosophy. But you can see enough of the
machinery
of thought to know its tendencies, and like the
listener to mysterious music, it is enough to have seen
the instrument, without knowing the cunning craft of
the player.
`I remembered my school-day feelings, and lived them
over again with my beautiful pupil. I entered with as
much enthusiasm as she, into the strength and sublimity
which I had wondered at before; and I believe, that,
even as she sat reading by herself, my blood thrilled, and
my pulses quickened as vividly as her own, when I saw,
by the deepening color of her cheek, or the marked
passages of my book, that she had found a noble thought
or a daring hypothesis.
`She proceeded with her course of philosophy, rapidly
and eagerly. Her mind was well prepared for its relish.
She said she felt as if a new sense had been given her
an inner eye which she could turn in upon herself, and
by which she could, as it were, stand aside while the
process of her thought went on. She began to respect
and rely upon her own mind, and the elevation of
countenance
and manner, which so certainly and so beautifully
accompanies inward refinement, stole over her daily. I
began to feel respectful in her presence, and when, with
the peculiar elegance of a woman's mind, she discovered
a delicate shade of meaning which I had not seen, or
traced an association which could spring only from an
unsullied heart, I experienced a sensation like the
consciousness
of an unseen presenceelevating without
accusing me.
`It was probably well, that, with all this change in
her mind and manner, her person still retained its
childish
grace and flexibility. She had not grown tall, and
she wore her hair yet as she used to dofalling with a
luxuriant fulness upon her shoulders. Hence, she was
still a child when, had she been taller or more womanly,
the demands upon her attention, and the attractiveness
of mature society might have divided that engrossing
interest which is necessary to successful study.
`I have often wished I was a painter; but never so
much as when looking on this beautiful being as she sat
absorbed in her studies, or turned to gaze up a moment
to my face, with that delicious expression of inquiry
and affection. Every one knows the elevation given to
the countenance of a man by contemplative habits.
Perhaps the natural delicacy of feminine features has
combined with its rarity, to make this expression less
observable in woman; but, to one familiar with the
study of the human face, there is, in the look of a truly
intellectual woman, a keen subtlety of refinement, a
separation from everything gross and material, which
comes up to our highest dream of the angelic. For
myself
,
I care not to analyze it. I leave it to philosophy to
find out its secret. It is enough for me that I can see
it and feel it in every pulse of my being. It is not a
peculiar susceptibility. Every man who approaches
such a woman feels it. He may not define it; he may
be totally unconscious what it is that awes him; but he
feels as if a mysterious and invisible veil were about
her, and every dark thought is quenched suddenly in
his heart, as if he had come into the atmosphere of a
spirit. I would have every woman know this. I would
tell every mother who prays nightly for the peculiar
watchfulness of good spirits over the purity of her
child, that she may weave round her a defence stronger
than steelthat she may place in her heart a living
amulet whose virtue is like a circle of fire to pollution.
20*
I am not stringing pearls. I have seen, and I
know, that an empty mind is not a strong citadel; and
in the melancholy chronicle of female ruin the instances
are rare of victims distinguished for mental cultivation.
I would my pen were the point of a diamond, and I
were writing on living hearts! for when I think how the
daughters of a house are its grace and honorand when
I think how the father and mother that loved her, and
the brother that made her his pride, and the sister in
whose bosom she slept, are all crushed, utterly, by a
daughter's degradation, I feel that if every word were a
burning coal, my language could not be extravagant!
`My pupil had, as yet, read no poetry. I was
uncertain
how to enter upon it. Her taste for the beautiful
in prose had become so decided, that I feared for the
first impression of my poetical world. I wished it to
burst upon her brilliantlylike the entrance to an inner
and more magnificent temple of knowledge. I hoped
to dazzle her with a high and unimagined beauty, which
should exceed far the massive but plain splendors of
philosophy. We had often conversed on the probability
of a previous existence, and, one evening, I opened
Wordsworth, and read his sublime Ode upon
Intimations
of Immortality. She did not interrupt me, but I
looked up at the conclusion and she was in tears. I made
no remark, but took Byron, and read some of the finest
passages in Childe Harold, and Manfred, and Cain
and, from that time, poetry has been her world!
`It would not have been so earlier. It needs the
simple and strong nutriment of truth to fit us to relish
and feel poetry. The mind must have strength and
cultivated taste, and then it is like a language from
Heaven. We are astonished at its power and
magnificence
.
We have been familiar with knowledge as with
a person of a plain garment and a homely presence
and he comes to us in poetry, with the state of a king,
glorious in purple and gold. We have known him as an
unassuming friend who has talked with us by the
wayside
,
and kept us company on our familiar pathsand
we see him coming with a stately step, and a glittering
diadem on his brow; and we wonder that we did not see
that his plain garment honored him not, and his bearing
were fitter for a king!
`Poetry entered to the very soul of Caroline Grey.
It was touching an unreached string, and she felt as if
the whole compass of her heart were given out. I used
to read to her for hours, and it was beautiful to see her
eye kindle, and her cheek burn with excitement. The
sublimed mysticism and spirituality of Wordsworth were
her delight, and she feasted upon the deep philosophy
and half hidden tenderness of Coleridge.
`I had observed, with some satisfaction, that, in the
rapid developement of her mental powers, she had not
found time to study nature. She knew little of the
character of the material creation, and I now
commenced
walking constantly abroad with her at sunset,
and at all the delicious seasons of moonlight and
starlight
and dawn. It came in well with her poetry. I
cannot describe the effect. She became, like all who
are, for the first time, made sensible of the glories
around them, a worshipper of the external world.
`There is a time when nature first loses its familiarity
and seems suddenly to have become beautiful. This is
true, even of those who have been taught early habits
of observation. The mind of a child is too feeble to
comprehend, and does not soon learn, the scale of
sublimity
and beauty. He would not be surprised if the
sun were brighter, or if the stars were sown thicker in
the sky. He sees that the flower is beautiful, and he
feels admiration at the rainbow; but he would not
wonder
if the dyes of the flower were deeper, or if the sky
were laced to the four corners with the colors of a prism.
He grows up with these splendid phenomena at work
about him, till they have become common, and, in their
most wonderful forms, cease to attract his attention.
Then his senses are, suddenly, as by an invisible
influence
,
unsealed, and, like the proselyte of the Egyptian
pyramids, he finds himself in a magnificent temple, and
hears exquisite music, and is dazzled by surpassing
glory. He never recovers his indifference. The
perpetual
changes of nature keep alive his enthusiasm,
and if his taste is not dulled by subsequent debasement,
the pleasure he receives from it flows on like a stream
wearing deeper and calmer.
`Caroline became now my constant companion. The
changes of the natural world have always been my chief
source of happiness, and I was curious to know whether
my different sensations under different circumstances
were peculiar to myself. I left her, therefore, to lead
the conversation, without any expression of my feelings,
and, to my surprise and delight, she invariably struck
their tone, and pursued the same vein of reflection.
It convinced me of what I had long thought might be
truethat there was, in the varieties of natural beauty,
a hidden meaning, and a delightful purpose of good;
and, if I am not deceived, it is a new and beautiful
evidence of the proportion and extent of God's
benevolent
wisdom. Thus, you may remember the peculiar
effect of the early dawnthe deep, unruffled serenity,
and the perfect collectedness of your senses. You may
remember the remarkable purity that pervades the
stealing in of color, and the vanishing of the cold shadows
of graythe heavenly quiet that seems infused, like a
visible spirit, into the pearly depths of the East, as the
light violet tints become deeper in the upper sky, and
the morning mist rises up like a veil of silvery film, and
softens away its intensity; and then you will remember
how the very beatings of your heart grew quiet, and
you felt an irresistible impulse to pray! There was no
irregular delight, no indefinite sensation, no ecstasy.
It was deep, unbroken repose, and your pulses were
free from the fever of life, and your reason was lying
awake in its chamber.
`There is a hush also at noon; but it is not like the
morning. You have been mingling in the business of
the world, and you turn aside, weary and distracted, for
rest. There is a far depth in the intense blue of the
sky which takes in the spirit, and you are content to
lie down and sleep in the cool shadow, and forget even
your existence. How different from the cool
wakefulness
of the morning, and yet how fitted for the necessity
of the hour!
`The day wears on and comes to the sunsetting. The
strong light passes off from the hills, and the leaves are
mingled in golden masses, and the tips of the long grass,
and the blades of maize, and the luxuriant grain, are all
sleeping in a rich glow, as if the daylight had melted
into gold and descended upon every living thing like
dew. The sun goes down and there is a tissue of
indescribable
glory floating upon the clouds, and the
almost imperceptible blending of the sunset color with
the blue sky, is far up towards the zenith. Presently
the pomp of the early sunset passes away, and the
clouds are all clad in purple with edges of metallic
lustre, and very far in the West, as if they were sailing
away into another world, are seen spots of intense
brightness, and the tall trees on the hilly edge of the
horizon seem piercing the sky, on fire with its
consuming
heat. There is a tumultuous joy in the
contemplation
of this hour which is peculiar to itself. You feel
as if you should have had wings; for there is a strange
stirring in your heart to follow onand your imagination
bursts away into that beautiful world, and revels among
the unsubstantial clouds till they become cold. It is a
triumphant and extravagant hour. Its joyousness is an
intoxication, and its pleasure dies with the day.
`The night, starry and beautiful, comes on. The sky
has a blue, intense almost to blackness, and the stars
are set in it like gems. They are of different glory, and
there are some that burn, and some that have a twinkling
lustre, and some are just visible and faint. You know
their nature, and their motion; and there is something
awful in so many worlds moving on through the
firmament
so silently and in order. You feel an
indescribable
awe stealing upon you, and your imagination trembles
as it goes up among them. You gaze on, and on,
and the superstitions of olden time, and the wild visions
of astrology steal over your memory, till, by and by, you
hear the music which they give out as they go, and
drink in the mysteries of their hidden meaning, and
believe
that your destiny is woven by their burning spheres.
There comes on you a delirious joy, and a kind of
terrible
fellowship with their sublime nature, and you feel
as if you could go up to a starry place and course the
heavens in company. There is a spirituality in this
hour, a separation from material things, which is of a
fine order of happiness. The purity of the morning,
and the noontide quietness, and the rapture of the
glorious
sunset are all human and comprehensible feelings;
but this has the mystery and the lofty energy of a higher
world, and you return to your human nature with a
refreshed
spirit and an elevated purpose.See now the
wisdom of God!the collected intellect for the morning
prayer and our daily dutythe delicious repose for our
noontide weariness, and the rapt fervor to purify us by
night from our worldliness, and keep wakeful the eye
of immortality! They are all suited to our need; and
it is pleasant to think, when we go out at this or that
season, that its peculiar beauty is fitted to our peculiar
wants, and that it is not a chance harmony of our hearts
with nature.
`The world had become to Caroline a new place. No
change in the season was indifferent to hernothing
was common or familiar. She found beauty in things
you would pass by, and a lesson for her mind or her
heart in the minutest workmanship of nature. Her
character assumed a cheerful dignity, and an elevation
above ordinary amusements or annoyances. She was
equal and calm, because her feelings were never
reached
by ordinary irritations, and, if there were no other
benefit in cultivation, this were almost argument enough
to induce it.
`It is now five years since I commenced my tutorship.
I have given you the history of two of them. In the
remaining three there has been much that has interested
my mindprobably little that would interest yours. We
have read together, and, as far as possible, studied
together
.
She has walked with me, and shared all my
leisure and known every thought. She is now a woman
of eighteen. Her childish graces are matured, and her
blue eye would send a thrill through you. You might
object to her want of fashionable
tournure
, and find fault
with her unfashionable impulses. I do not. She is a
highminded, noble, impassioned beingwith an
enthusiasm
that is not without reason, and a common sense
that is not a regard to self-interest. Her motion was
not learnt at schools, but it is unembarrassed and free,
and her tone has not been educated to a refined whisper,
but it expresses the meaning of her heart as if its very
pulse had become articulate. The many might not
admire
herI know she would be idolized by the few.
`Our intercourse is as intimate still; and it could not
change without being less sofor we are constantly
together. There isto be surelatelya slight
degree
of embarrassmentandsomehowwe read more
poetry than we used to dobut it is nothing at all
nothing.'
My friend was married to his pupil a few months
after writing the foregoing. He has written to me
since, and I will show you the letter if you will call,
any time. It will not do to print it, because there are
some domestic details not proper for the general eye;
but, to me, who am a bachelor, bent upon matrimony,
it is interesting to the last degree. He lives the same
quiet, retired life, that he did before he was married.
His room is arranged with the same taste, and with
reference to the same habits as before. The light
comes in as timidly through the half closed window, and
his pictures look as shadowy and dim, and the rustle of
the turned leaf adds as mysteriously to the silence. He
is the fondest of husbands, but his affection does not
encroach on the habits of his mind. Now and then he
looks up from his book, and, resting his head upon his
hand, lets his eye wander over the pale cheek and
drooping
lid of the beautiful being who sits reading beside him;
but he soon returns to his half forgotten page, and the
smile of affection which had stolen over his features fades
gradually away into the habitual soberness of thought.
There sits his wife, hour after hour, in the same chair
which she occupied when she first came, a curious
loiterer to his room; and though she does not study so
much, because other cares have a claim upon her now,
she still keeps pace with him in the pleasanter branches
of knowledge, and they talk as often and as earnestly
as before on the thousand topics of a scholar's
contemplation
.
Her cares may and will multiply; but she
understands the economy of time, and I have no doubt
that, with every attention to her daily duties, she will find
ample time for her mind, and be always as well fitted as
now for the companionship of an intellectual being.
I have, like all bachelors, speculated a great deal
upon matrimony. I have seen young and beautiful
women, the pride of gay circles, marriedas the world
saidwell! Some have moved into costly houses, and
their friends have all come and looked at their fine
furniture and their splendid arrangements for happiness,
and they have gone away and committed them to their
sunny hopes, cheerfully, and without fear. It is natural
to be sanguine for the young, and at such times I am
carried away by similar feelings. I love to get
unobserved
into a corner, and watch the bride in her white
attire, and with her smiling face and her soft eyes
moving before me in their pride of life, weave a waking
dream of her future happiness, and persuade myself that
it will be true. I think how they will sit upon that
luxurious sofa as the twilight falls, and build gay hopes,
and murmur in low tones the now unforbidden
tenderness
,
and how thrillingly the allowed kiss and the
beautiful
endearments of wedded life, will make even their
parting joyous, and how gladly they will come back
from the crowd and the empty mirth of the gay, to
each other's quiet company. I picture to myself that
young creature, who blushes even now, at his hesitating
caress, listening eagerly for his footsteps as the night
steals on, and wishing that he would come; and when
he enters at last, and, with an affection as undying as
his pulse, folds her to his bosom, I can feel the very
tide that goes flowing through his heart, and gaze with
him on her graceful form as she moves about him for
the kind offices of affection, soothing all his unquiet
VOL. II. 21
cares, and making him forget even himself, in her young
and unshadowed beauty.
I go forward for years, and see her luxuriant hair
put soberly away from her brow, and her girlish graces
ripened into dignity, and her bright loveliness chastened
with the gentle meekness of maternal affection. Her
husband looks on her with a proud eye, and shows her
the same fervent love and the delicate attentions which
first won her, and fair children are growing up about
them, and they go on, full of honor and untroubled
years, and are remembered when they die!
I say I love to dream thus when I go to give the
young bride joy. It is the natural tendency of feelings
touched by loveliness that fears nothing for itself, and,
if I ever yield to darker feelings, it is because the light
of the picture is changed. I am not fond of dwelling
on such changes, and I will not, minutely, now. I
allude to it only because I trust that my simple page
will be read by some of the young and beautiful beings
who move daily across my path, and I would whisper to
them, as they glide by, joyously and confidingly, the
secret of an unclouded future.
The picture I have drawn above is not peculiar. It
is colored like the fancies of the bride; and many
oh! many an hour will she sit, with her rich jewels
lying loose in her fingers, and dream such dreams
as these. She believes them, tooand she goes on,
for a while, undeceived. The evening is not too long
while they talk of their plans for happiness, and the
quiet meal is still pleasant with the delightful novelty of
mutual reliance and attention. There comes soon,
however, a time when personal topics become bare and
wearisome, and slight attentions will not alone keep up
the social excitement. There are long intervals of
silence, and detected symptoms of weariness, and the
husband, first, in his impatient manhood, breaks in upon
the hours they were to spend together. I cannot follow
it circumstantially. There come long hours of unhappy
listlessness, and terrible misgivings of each other's worth
and affection, till, by and by, they can conceal their
uneasiness no longer, and go out separately to seek
relief, and lean upon a hollow world for the support
which one who was their `lover and friend' could not
give them!
Heed this, ye woh are winning by your innocent
beauty, the affections of highminded and thinking
beings
!
Remember that he will give up the brother of
his heart with whom he has had, ever, a fellowship of
mindthe society of his cotemporary runners in the
race of fame, who have held with him a stern
companionship
and
frequently, in his passionate love, he
will break away from the arena of his burning ambition,
to come and listen to the `voice of the charmer.' It
will bewilder him at first, but it will not long; and then,
think you that an idle blandishment will chain the mind
that has been used, for years, to an equal communion?
Think you he will give up, for a weak dalliance, the
animating themes of men, and the search into the fine
mysteries of knowledge!Oh! no, lady!believe me
no! Trust not your influence to such light fetters!
Credit not the oldfashioned absurdity that woman's is
a secondary lotministering to the necessities of her
lord and master! It is a higher destiny I would award
you. If your immortality is as complete, and your gift
of mind as capable as ours of increase and elevation,
I would put no wisdom of mine against God's evident
allotment. I would charge you to water the undying
bud, and give it healthy culture, and open its beauty to
the sunand then you may hope, that when your life is
bound up with another, you will go on equally, and in
a fellowship that shall pervade every earthly interest!
ELIZABETH LATIMER.
It
is hard that, with man, talent, combined with
perseverance
,
should be almost omnipotent to overcome
obstacles the most numerous and formidable, while in
the hands of woman, it is often wholly useless, unless
fortunate circumstances, such as wealthy or literary
connexions, obtain for the possessor the opportunity of
gaining by its display, fortune and fame. The spirit of
enterprise that characterizes the present age, gives to
man `ample room and verge enough' to pursue any
plan that genius may suggest. The world is all before
him. From pole to pole he may choose whether to add
to the history of his species by voyages and discoveries,
or, by speculations at home, direct the movements of
argosies. In literature he has only to give to the world
the treasures of his mind, the musings of his solitude, or
the recollections of his youth, and let it but bear the
stamp of genius it will meet with an `All hail!' But it
is not so with woman. Few and rugged are the paths
by which her genius, unaided and alone, may climb even
to competence. Natural timidity, a retired education,
the fear of encountering the prejudice that has so long
condemned her to a subordinate rank of intellect, and
which, by a strange perverseness, finds a charm in the
helplessness of those beings from whom at times are
demanded self-denial and exertion, all cast a spell round
her, which is seldom broken by her single efforts. There
are not more mute, inglorious Miltons in a country
churchyard than among the number of women doomed
to the exercise of some spirit breaking, monotonous craft
in order to procure means for the support of existence.
The daughter of Neckar might find in the brilliant
circles of Paris a field for the display of her lofty powers.
Miss Edgeworth, Miss Baillie, and some few others
have been led by judicious and encouraging friends,
to break through the obstacles which society opposes
to the acquisition of female literary excellence, and to
give occasion for doubts on the question whether there
be, as the uncourteous physiologist Lawrence asserts, a
sex to the mind. Many, unwilling to yield to the public
the charms of a mind cultivated in retirement, form the
delight of a domestic circle, and impart their
accomplishments
to their sons or daughters, but there are
many, a great many, who have neither father, friend,
nor brother of sufficient importance to force them, with
gentle violence before the world; who have, alas! no
domestic circle, no sons or daughters, and who, from a
reverse of fortune, feel their highest aspirations, their
brightest dreams of fancy, chilled and dispelled by
anxiety
about `to-morrow's fare.'
Such an isolated being was Elizabeth Latimer, who,
at twentyfour, found herself in possession of an
accomplished
mind, a memory stored with reading of the best
kind, and a judgment accustomed to exercise itself from
its earliest developement; and this, with a graceful
person
and a countenance of great sweetness and
intelligence
,
was pretty nearly all that Elizabeth possessed.
She had been for many years the only daughter of a
merchant, who, though he did not, like some of the
merchants of this city,
[1]
[1]
Boston.
draw his resourses from all the
ends of the earth, yet possessed enough for the
indulgence
of luxury. The indications of talent which he
21 *
very early discovered in the young Elizabeth,
determined
him to bestow on her an education that would save
her from adding to the number of those precocious
geniuses
,
who, from a misapplication of their powers,
become
unfit either for the daily concerns of life, or to hold
a place among those who are gradually procuring
indulgence
and respect for female intellect. With this view
he engaged a gentleman who had been a classmate of
his, and who had devoted himself to literature, to take
up his abode with him and assist him in cultivating his
daughter's mind.
`You will easily understand,' he wrote to Mr Elliot,
`with what different eyes I look upon this subject from
those with which I regarded it twenty years ago. To
have mind enough to love and obey me, and, withal,
think me supremely wise, was quite mind enough in a
wife, but I am willing to pay it greater respect since I
find it in my darling Elizabeth.
`As I am as anxious about her moral as her
intellectual
education, I dread, lest, being an only child, and
surrounded by all that will tend to her gratification, she
may form habits of selfishness, against which no
warnings
,
no precepts will avail. A companion of her own
age would secure her from this risk, and I can think of
no one so well suited, on all accounts, to be brought up
with my little girl as your own Marianne. I need not
assure you how entirely like my own daughter she shall
be considered.'
We will not detail the progress of Elizabeth's studies.
They were such as opened her young mind to all that
was lovely in virtue and lofty and excellent in intellect.
She lived principally in the country, in a small but
intelligent
circle, sufficiently enlightened to save them
from the dominion of a gossiping spirit, yet not so learned
as to allow her to acquire anything like a pedantic one.
The tranquillity of their own house had received a
startling shock when Elizabeth was about fifteen, by
Mr Latimer's bringing home a second wife, very little
more than her own age, but of entirely different temper,
habits, and tastes. It was then that Mr Latimer
perceived
that he had done wisely in giving to Elizabeth
habits by which she could abstract her thoughts from
the jarrings of a stepmother, jealous of her, of her gentle
friend Marianne, of Mr Elliot, of everything that her
husband loved. But their school of trial did not last
long. Mrs Latimer only lived to present her husband
with a son, and expired, leaving all the family with just
such sensations as one feels on awaking from an
uncomfortable
dream, and Elizabeth and her father heaved a
sigh of relief as they inwardly responded `Amen!' to
the clergyman of the village who came to pay them a
visit of consolation.
When Elizabeth entered into society, she carried with
her many warnings from her father to avoid the display
of acquirements which were not common to all. She
listened, determined to profit by his advice, though she
felt there was some injustice in laying this embargo upon
wit and learning. `Why,' thought she, `should miss C
be permitted, nay, solicited, to display her playing and
singing, both excellent enough to excite envy, while all
the powers that I possess must be so sedulously
concealed
?
However, as there is no reasoning to any
purpose on this apparent inconsistency, I will try to
resemble
the greater part of the world I am going to
mingle with;' and in imagination she behaved with
perfect
discretion, occupied only in veiling the mistakes of
the ignorant, in drawing out the talents of the timid,
nicely discriminating when and with whom to talk
seriously
or lightly, and gliding through society with all the
tact which only a knowledge of the world, gained by
one's own experience and much practice in that world,
can give. But poor Elizabeth found herself sadly at
loss when she encountered a bewildering number of new
faces, whose ready smiles and pliancy of expression
concealed all that was passing in the heart. She felt it
as impossible to catch the light tone of those around
her, to talk of nothing, to express rapture and
enthusiasm
where she felt only indifference, as it would have
been for one of the gay circle to have shone forth as an
improvisatrice. Being perfectly unaffected and simple,
she took refuge in silence; but her speaking
countenance
often betrayed the listlessness she felt, and as
the silence of persons who are known, or supposed to
be able, to talk well, is looked upon with an invidious
eye, she felt a degree of restraint, whether she spoke or
not, which prevented her ever taking much pleasure in
the amusements of the world. But there were some
whom she did please, and that in no moderate degree.
The cultivated and intelligent found a charm in her
manner that they recollected with pleasure long after
she had retired from society. She had a happy facility
of passing from subject to subject by an easy gradation,
so as never to fatigue by dwelling too long on one topic,
nor to startle by an abrupt and violent digression; an
art which is seldom well understood. We are too apt to
suppose that the same associations exist in our
companion's
mind as in our own, and suddenly transport him
from sea to sky and back again, with a suddenness that
makes our conversation appear little better than cold
disjointed chat.
`That is a very charming woman,' said Mr Leslie to
his neighbour, as Elizabeth withdrew with the ladies
from a large dull dinner party; `I have not met any
one so
piquante
and original for a long while.'
`Who? Miss Latimer? oh, true! but I suspect she
has sharpened her wits by an acquaintance with Horace.'
`How!' rejoined Leslie; `you do not mean to say
that that pretty girl quotes Horace?'
`No; I never heard her quote at all; I must do her
that justice; but she seems to have had her eyes opened
to the follies of mankind.'
`Well, but the English satirists may have done her
that service, though I cannot recollect hearing her say
anything that touched upon her neighbour's follies.'
`Wait a little; you will every now and then hear
something that shows more reading than you at first
suspect her of. Besides, she always fatigues me by
her allusions. I do not find a half hour's chat with her
any relaxation.'
`Now I, on the contrary,' said Leslie, `have been
delighted with what you complain of. There is
something
,
too, very novel and attractive in her manner.
There is no effort. She gives herself up to the animation
of the moment with an absence of art or affectation that
is quite enchanting.'
`Upon my word you seem quite
pris
. I will tell
Mrs Leslie of you.'
`I shall tell her myself. She will be equally pleased
with her, for Mrs Leslie is as great a worshipper of
talent as I am, whether it be found in man or woman.'
Unfortunately for Elizabeth, both Mr and Mrs Leslie
were called suddenly from Boston by the death of a
relative
,
and the impression made on the mind of the
former
was dissipated by business and a variety of scenes.
About this time Elizabeth lost her friend Marianne,
who married an English gentleman and accompanied
him to England. Mr Elliot was persuaded to join them,
and Mr Latimer found his household reduced to a small
number. But his mind seemed too much occupied to miss
his companions, and, to Elizabeth's grief, she
discovered
that her father was bent upon making a fortune for
his son Louis. In vain she urged that Louis would
never want, and the possession of wealth might only
check exertion by depriving him of a stimulus to
industry
.
She represented to him the risk he ran by
engaging so deeply in speculations, none of which had
hitherto been successful; but Mr Latimer had the
gambling fit so strong upon him, that he looked forward
to seeing his ships riding the ocean laden with the
treasures of the Asiatic islands, and realizing the wildest
dreams of his avarice. Elizabeth deplored this for his
own and for Louis's sake. She saw how the
fluctuations
of hope and despair, the pangs of suspense and
repeated
disappointments, preyed upon her father's health
and spirits, and she anticipated for Louis and herself
the loss of all they had considered their own.
But these fears were transient. We seldom reflect long,
amid the enjoyments of affluence, upon their precarious
nature. She retired from the world and devoted herself
to her father, and to the education of Louis, whom she
loved with all a mother's tenderness. He was indeed a
sweet and gentle child, fond only of books and sedentary
amusements, and Elizabeth's time passed away as
happily as time passed in the exercise of duty usually
does. She was often uneasy, often tormented by vague
fears of future poverty and distress, but these were only
clouds that overshadowed her at times. Her horizon
generally was bright; but the blow anticipated fell upon
her at last. Mr Latimer had ventured the remains of
his fortune in a speculation which was to enrich Louis
and his posterity forever.
After many months' suspense the news reached Mr
Leslie that he was ruined. He did not long survive it,
and his son and daughter found themselves friendless
and poor. A few hundred dollars was all that could be
collected for them, nor had they any claims upon others.
They had but few family friends, and Elizabeth's was
not a spirit to brook dependence. Poverty at first sight
is not so frightful as when it comes near enough to lay
its cold, griping fingers on us; and, in the present
excited
state of her feelings, the prospect of maintaining
herself, did not appear as difficult as she afterwards
proved it. Her idea of submission to the will of Heaven
was not confined to subduing a murmur, when death
has removed, by a stroke, the desire of our eyes. She
had been accustomed to exercise it in all the
disappointments
and sorrows of her life; for who, at twentyfour,
has not tasted of the bitterness of the waters of life? A
few passages of her letter to Marianne will show how
schooled her mind had been, by being early taught of
Heaven.
`You know, dearest Marianne, your excellent father
often cautioned us against trusting to our perceptions of
Heaven's justice. With him we were accustomed to
trace, in the records of history, the hand of Infinite
Wisdom
guiding all things onward to some great end, that
should vindicate his ways to future ages. Ah! how
easy it is for the thoughtful mind to pursue this truth
through events that have passed away! how much easier
than to acknowledge it when our idols have been
overthrown
!
We are personal only in those things which
can do us no good. Let me now lay those lessons to
heart, and follow the obvious track which Providence
has marked out for me. It seems very plainI must
support myself and the darling object of my lost parent's
love. The manner of doing this is very embarrassing.
My mind is full of energy, but where to bestow it, costs
me days and nights of anxious thought.'
Mr Latimer had insisted, some months before his
death, that Louis should be placed at a large public
school. Elizabeth had consented to his plan with
readiness
,
though it grieved her to part with the little
companion
whose quickness enabled him to catch with
facility everything she taught him; but she was aware
that a public school is indispensable towards acquiring
manly habits, and that independence of ridicule, which
are necessary to all who walk the world, however retired
be the path they choose.
It was evening, and she was alone when she took
possession of two small rooms in  Street. Dull and
dreary was the aspect of everything. The window of
the little sittingroom was close to a high stone wall,
nor were light and beauty shut out from that entrance
only. From her chamber window nothing could be
discerned
but a long range of warehouses. There was not
even the sight or sound of labor to cheer the prospect.
`A cobbler or a blacksmith would enliven the scene,'
thought Elizabeth, `but I hope I shall not stay here
long.' Her first attempt to escape from her new
dwelling
was a letter to a lady with whom she had long
been intimate. Her plan was to open a school, and she
solicited Mrs Graham's assistance, or rather patronage,
without taking into consideration how little that lady
had to bestow. She answered Elizabeth kindly,
explaining
to her that her influence was confined to five
or six families, none of whom had it in their power to
engage for their children an instructress whose
accomplishments
would entitle her to a higher salary than
is given to those who teach the elementary parts of
education.
Over this first disappointment Elizabeth did not long
weep. Keeping a school is a very depressing prospect,
and she felt almost relieved by Mrs Graham's letter.
Her next application was to a lady who was desirous
of procuring a governess for her daughtersone of those
ladies whose
beau idal
of a governess, is that of a being
with every talent and every virtue under heaven,
combined
with a degree of humility that will endure every
insult that narrow minds bestow upon the unfortunate.
Mrs S gave her a week's suspense, then found
her way into Elizabeth's parlour one morning, with a
`How d'ye do, Miss Latimerfor I suppose that's you.
I believe I've made you wait for an answer, but I've
been so beset. People are so anxious to get to me, as
if I could take a hundred. But, before we go any
further
,
we must settle one thingyou're a musician of
course?'
The color that had been deepening on Elizabeth's
cheeks, became crimson as she faintly answered, `No,
Madam.'
`No! Gracious goodness! what could you be thinking
of when you offered yourself as governess? Such a
salary as I give, and pay a music master besides!'
`Then reduce the salary,' Elizabeth began, but Mrs
S stopped her
`What! and get a master for the girls! What's that
to the purpose. You ought to be able to superintend
their practising. Well, that sets the matter at rest.
Good morning, Ma'm,' and Mrs S made her exit
as abruptly as her entrance, leaving Elizabeth a
foretaste
of what she afterwards suffered from other
applications
and other disappointments.
One lady objected to her because she could not teach
velvet painting. It was in vain Elizabeth, who liked
the mild tones of this amateur in footstools and sofa
covers, urged the superiority of the higher branches
of painting. `That might do for artists,' said the lady,
and Elizabeth took her leave. Another expected her
VOL. II. 22
to teach embroidery and shoemaking to six daughters;
but the most fatal bar to her success was the want of a
knowledge of music.
After many failures she relinquished the hope of
obtaining a situation, and turned her thoughts to her
last resource. She determined, with a heavy heart, to
offer her services as a translator to a publisher whom
she had often heard spoken of as a man of taste and
liberality. Translating is a fatiguing and inglorious
task, but she had no alternative. While she was
hesitating
whether to address him by letter or apply to him
in person, Mr Warren was announced. Elizabeth knew
him well; for he had been a frequent visiter at Mr
Latimer's. He was remarkable only for his extreme
dulness, and his desire of being thought a man of genius
and learning. He picked up scraps from pocket-books
and newspapers, and wearied his friends by
commonplace
remarks, uttered in a tone of oracular wisdom.
His address to Elizabeth was hesitating and confused.
He was usually wont to speak with a deliberateness
that fell upon the ear like the strokes of a hammer, but
now he spoke with a rapidity that made him quite
unintelligible
.
With an uneasy looking about as if he
dreaded being overheard, at last he abruptly asked her
if money had been her object in wishing to procure a
situation as governess.
`Certainly,' said Elizabeth; `what else could induce
me to undertake such an office?'
He muttered something about his sorrow at her
wanting it and his wish to serve her, then opened his
business, prefaced, however, by desiring a promise of
secrecy. Elizabeth, inwardly provoked at his solemn
foppery, promised all he required, and he then informed
his impatient auditress, that several of his literary friends
were about to establish a critical journal, in which all
the best talents of the city were to be displayed`and
you will not be surprised,' said he, `to hear, that much
is expected from me, particularly in the department of
the belles lettres. I hope you are not surprised,' he
continued, as he saw the astonishment painted on
Elizabeth's
countenance.
`No, I am never surprised at people's expectations,
and I am sure Mr. Warren will not disappoint those
formed by his well judging friends; but pray proceed.'
`Every body says to me, Warren! now is your
time. This is the opportunity for you to show your
critical acumen. Seize the moment, Warren! and give
us something that will be read a hundred years hence.
I am pressed on all sides, and I begin to feel that I
really ought, in justice to myself, to do something to
keep up the credit of this journal.'
`He is mad,' thought Elizabeth, `or has been in the
hands of some dexterous quizzer;' and she sighed as
she thought that he could have nothing to say that could
interest her, for she had at first hoped that he might
bring her occupation. However, Warren went on;
`My health, you know, is delicate, and my avocations
very numerous; and from various causes I am afraid I
shall not be able to write until the spring; but, in the
mean time, my dear Miss Latimer, I will make use of
your pen. Our mindsI say it without flattery,
belive
meour minds are somewhat of the same order,
allowing for the difference of sex and education. Now,
all I ask of you is this; just give me, from time to time,
a critique upon some modern writer, and now and then
we will review an old one. I leave the choice of
subjects
to you; of course you will have the advantage of
my additions and corrections. Well, what say you?
Does the scheme appear feasible? However, I see you
are taken by surprise. An hour's reflection will be
necessary. Good morning. This evening you shall
see me again.'
`He has made me laugh, at least,' said Elizabeth,
after an impatient `pshaw!' `I always thought him a
fool, but never expected such an excess of folly from
him; but it will cure me of attempting to set bounds to
the folly of a foolish man.'
Elizabeth did not, at first, give his plan a second
thought. The idea of being joined with Warren in a
work which she knew would be conducted by men of
learning and science, was absurd in the last degree, and
she began her letter to the publisher, but her reluctance
to undertake this laborious kind of occupation increased
every moment. She threw down her pen and
abandoned
herself to despondency. Then, in spite of herself,
Warren's plan recurred to her. It was not as ridiculous
as she had thought. There had been, she recollected,
instances of starving authors in a garret, while the
indolent
or empty were building up a reputation upon
their labors. Besides, Warren would not be the first
fool who had thrust himself into the place of wiser men.
They are to be found everywherein the halls of
legislators
,
in the cabinet of ministers. They have had their
followers and their eulogists, and we have only to look
behind the scenes to exclaim with Oxtenstiern, `
Quam
parv sapienti regilur mundus!
' At all events it would
not be Warren, but herself, who would write, and though
she doubted her own capacity for the task, still she
wished to try. It offered a means of accomplishing her
grand object, keeping Louis at school, and it had the
charm of privacy; for, since her unsuccessful attempts
to escape from her gloomy closets, she had shrunk into
them with a feeling more allied to love than to distaste.
By the time Warren returned, Elizabeth had so
balanced the advantages of his scheme against its
objections
,
as to give him the assent he expected. His
presence revived the ridiculous ideas that his proposal
had at first suggested. The tone of his voice was
expressive of extreme dulness, and there was a
stupidity
about him that completely oppressed Elizabeth.
She began to be ashamed of acceding to his plan,
doubting, indeed, if any production, supposed to be his,
would obtain a reading from the editor. However, a
short time would decide her fate, and she resolved to
make the experiment. She inquired beforehand what
was to be the compensation for her trouble. He named
the probable sum.
`You rate intellectual labor very low,' said she, `but
no wonder. However, that, four or five times repeated,
will be enough for my purpose. You are aware that
you must furnish me with books. I must have a great
many authorities to bring to the field. A man like you
will be expected to be very accurate.'
He professed himself willing to be guided by her in
everything, begged her to try and catch his style, and
urged her over and over to exert herself to the utmost,
before he relieved her of his presence.
Elizabeth began her task with great animation, but
she soon found it more difficult than she had anticipated.
Her mind was full, yet she was puzzled and distressed.
She wanted the habit of writing, which, alone, according
to Lord Bacon, insures correctness. She found great
difficulty in arranging and condensing her ideas, and
preserving a degree of order, without which, even the
writings of the learned and brilliant, appear a chaotic
mass. She had to weigh well all she said, lest she
should be guilty of error or presumption. Her subject
was a comparison between the writers of the reign of
Anne and the present day. It was not without some
timidity that she expressed opinions opposed to the
prevailing
22*
cant which raves about the march of mind.
Physical science is in its glory, and philosophy has
made such magnificent presents to the arts, that
knowledge
is carried with winged speed from the college to
the cottage; but mind, alas! must have its limits, must
obey the law which says, `So far shalt thou come and
no farther.'
Though Elizabeth wrote with facility, she was obliged
to refer to so many authorities, to correct and strike out
so many redundances, that she sat up a great part of
the night previous to the latest day on which Warren
was to call for her little essay. It was finished at last,
and she committed it to its trial with a beating heart.
Great was the astonishment of the editor when
Warren
presented himself in his library with a manuscript
of an imposing size in his hand. Greater still at sight
of the subject; and it rose to its highest pitch after
reading the first few sentences. He knew little of
Warren, but he had always heard his name used as a
synonym with dulness, and he was betrayed into abruptly
exclaiming, `Mr Warren! I had no ideaI mean I
did not expectMr Warren, is this yours?'
The blush of guilt flew to poor Warren's face, but
Mr Leslie hastened to apologize. `Leave it with me
for an hour or two,' said he, `and you shall hear from
me to-morrow.'
Elizabeth had, once before, charmed Mr Leslie by
the playfulness of her conversation and the occasional
accuteness of her remarks. There was a nameless
something in her style that pleased him, and he
accepted
Warren's production without hesitation, determining,
at the same time, to vindicate him from the charge of
ignorance and stupidity.
As soon as Warren received what gave him a delight
which he felt in the same degree with Harpagonthat
of `touching something,' he hastened in a transport of
generosity to divide it with Elizabeth. It was more than
she had hoped for, and the consciousness of possessing
the means of contributing to her own support, gave an
exhilaration to her spirits to which she had long been a
stranger. She walked to the school where Louis was
making a progress that repaid her for parting with him,
and paid, with a thrill of delight, the first fruits of her
industry to his master.
Dr B's seminary was a mile out of town, and the
fresh air of the country, the song of the birds, the very
sight of the sky, made her heart glow again with hope
and peace. She had something to look forward to.
Louis would, one day, reward her toils. She should
one day recount to him how, for his sake, she had
conquered
the indolence and love of leisure which she
foresaw
would be a stumblingblock in his way. To see
Louis kindling at the tale of her difficulties and
promising
to repay them all, to hear him spoken of with
distinction
,
and to witness his happiness and success in
life, now formed her daily reveries. Her pen often fell
from her hand while indulging in these dreams. Dreams
they were indeed.
She continued to supply Warren with materials for
the fame he was acquiring, though there were times
when Mr Leslie strongly doubted his positive assertions
that he was the author of the manuscripts. There was
a taste, an elegance in their style, and a sensibilty that
he felt never came from the coarse mind of Warren.
However, he had no means of elucidating the point, and
gave it up, hoping that accident might one day or other
expose the deception.
In the mean time, Warren, who began to find the
sums he received from Mr Leslie extremely convenient
for his own purposes, began to reduce Elizabeth's share
to a third, and then a fourth of the whole. `She cannot
want much,' he argued with his conscience, `living in
those little garrets. I do n't see how she can possibly
spend five dollars in six months, and always plainly
dressed too. I really think I give her more than enough.
I dare say she can manage a little to great advantage.'
People who are extravagant on themselves, are often
wonderfully ingenious in devising plans of economy for
others. Elizabeth was surprised at this falling off; but,
in the simplicity of her heart, she never suspected him
of such a pitiless fraud. `I have overrated my own
productions
,'
said she, `and yet I certainly think I have
improved. I have studied the rules of good writing;
I read with a deeper spirit of observation; it is strange
my pieces should appear of less value to the publishers
in proportion as they seem to me more spirited and
better finished. Perhaps they are thought studied. I
myself find a sameness in them.'
Among the many causes she was attributing her
diminished resources to, the true one never occurred to
her. She knew, of course, from Warren's imposing on
Mr Leslie and the public, that he was not a man of
much principle. Indeed, a fool cannot have strict
principles
.
He cannot distinguish sufficiently between right
and wrong; but, in the broad path of honesty, she
thought he might find his way.
A year passed on, and she found that she had just
enough to defray Louis's school expenses, and nothing
to lay by towards sending him to college. Her health,
too, was impaired by constant application, and her spirits
crushed by the unvaried sameness of her employment.
Sweet is the sleep of the laboring man; but it must be
that labor which feels the breath of heaven fan the
browalternate motion and rest. But when, after a
whole day has been passed in mental exercise, the
fevered head is laid upon its pillow and the stretched
and burning eyelids refuse to close, when the glare of
white paper, or interminable rows of letters dance
before
the throbbing eyeballs, and one idea haunts the
brain till its repetition becomes maddeningthese, these
are the pains and penalties of mind that make us wish
to have been born among those whose hands alone are
employed to procure their daily bread.
Elizabeth had been accustomed to study and
reflection
,
but there is something very different between study
in a large and airy chamber where light and shade are
pleasantly blended, when the first sensations of fatigue
may be dissipated by exercise or conversation, and
leaning incessantly over a flat, low table, by the side of
a little window where light is struggling with darkness.
She felt her health languish, her head ached incessantly,
but still she went on for several months, indulging
herself
now and then with a walk to Dr B's, and an
evening spent at Mrs Graham's. This lady had often a
little circle of friends around her, whose society would
have been of service to Elizabeth's spirits, but she
shrunk from company, and, with an irritability peculiar
to the unfortunate, who feel lonely, neglected, and
unappreciated, often repulsed those who wished to be
kind to her.
`My temper is growing savage,' said she, one evening,
while she was putting on her hat to go to her friend's;
`I believe I answered that kind and lovely looking
woman who spoke so sweetly to me the last time I was
at Mrs Graham's, with a canine growl. But alas! I
felt a horrid kind of envy at seeing a creature so happy
and apparently so beloved by every one present. Her
happiness did not seem to be put on for the occasion,
but the abiding expression of her face, and while I was
contrasting her situation with mine, to hear her speak
to me with that easy, confiding tone of voice, that came
from a heart at easeoh! she would have forgiven me
if she had seen the wretchedness of mine!' and
Elizabeth
sat down and wept in penitence at having given
way to such feelings.
She hoped to meet Mrs Leslie again, and was
disappointed
to find Mrs Graham alone. She dared not
speak of Mrs Leslie, for she felt her voice falter as she
thought of her. Yet she tried to induce Mrs Graham
to begin the subject. But as she was drawing a
portrait
of gentleness and beauty which made her friend
exclaim, `Why one would think you were acquainted
with Mrs Leslie,' Mr Graham came in, and, after
expressing his pleasure at seeing Elizabeth, whose
absence
from his little parties had pained him, he turned
to Mrs Graham and asked her if she had any idea to
whom she was indebted for the pleasure of her
morning's
reading.
`No,' said she; `I am glad you remind me of it, for
I thought of Elizabeth while I was reading. It is,' she
continued, turning to her friend, `a very well written
essay upon simplicity, real and affected; and contrasts
the strong, manly simplicity of Crabbe with the childish,
unmeaning prattle of Wordsworth, in almost the same
words which I have heard you make use of in arguing
with Marianne.'
Elizabeth trembled. She suspected Mr Graham
alluded
to her, but he went on; `I would ask you to
guess the author, but I should be weary of seeing you
puzzled. Know, then, that WarrenPhilip Augustus
Warrenis the principal contributor to Mr Leslie's
journal.'
`Now, I am not surprised,' said his wife, `for it is
impossible to make me believe such a tale. You forget
we both know Warren, and know that he is ignorant as
well as dull. I question much if he knows what poetry
is, unless he attaches some idea of rhyme to it.'
`I thought so myself, but listen. This morning I was
talking with Mr Leslie, who was in his library, where,
to my surprise, I found Warren taking down books and
turning over leaves with quite the air of an author.
Something was said about the miseries of authors;
They are no longer pecuniary miseries, said Leslie.
The times are changed since Dryden wrote prologues
for two guineas apiece. Here Warren turned briskly
round, exclaiming, Two guineas! bless me! times
are
changed. Why, Mr Leslie, I receive more than triple
that sum for some of my humble contributions to your
journal. I looked at Leslie with as much amazement
as if I had heard him proclaim himself the emperor of
China; but Leslie did not look surprised, he only said,
Very true. I waited a long time for Warren to go
away, that I might understand this mystery, and at
length I learned that he regularly carries Mr Leslie
every month a paper for his magazine. He pointed
them out to me in some of the numbers, and I assure
you they were the same I have frequently heard you
admire.'
`Even now,' said Mrs Graham, `I do not believe it.
He is vain as well as foolish, and he has either stolen
those pieces, or hired some one to write them.'
`That is what I hinted to Leslie; but he told me that
he had once offended Warren by expressing his own
doubts on the subject, and that his assurances of their
being his were so positive that he felt he had no right
to accuse him of falsehood till he had proved it. One
thing that disgusted me in Warren was his counting up
the money he had received, and muttering every now
and then, Dryden wrote prologues for two guineas!
Why, I have made two hundred dollars in the last six
months. That entirely convinced me that he is
speculating
in the talents of some one he keeps concealed.'
It is impossible to describe Elizabeth's indignation at
learning how she had been deceived. She did not
hesitate
a moment how to act. Warren was to call the
next morning for some manuscripts that she had ready
for him, and she determined to speak to him of the
baseness of his conduct, and break with him at once.
But there is something in the mere presence of a fool
that blunts our most eloquent reproaches. It would be
absurd, she thought, to talk to him of defrauding the
orphan; it will be enough to tell him he has acted
dishonestly
,
and that I will no longer `lend him my pen.'
Warren turned pale at her stern inquiry whether he
had fulfilled his promise of giving her whatever he
should receive from the editor. He solemnly declared
that he had done so, but Elizabeth stopped him short by
repeating, word for word, the conversation that had
passed
in Mr Leslie's library. `Now, Mr Warren, after
this, it is impossible that I can continue to give up time
and health for you. You know the object of my labor;
you know my anxiety to procure for Louis the
advantages
of a good education, and you have enriched
yourself
at my expence. Find somewhere else a pen that
will be at your service; mine writes not another word
for you.'
It was in vain Warren entreated, promised, swore.
He even knelt to conjure her to retract. He offered to
refund, to pay most liberally; but she was inexorable,
and he was obliged to depart, cursing his own folly for
boasting of making more by his pen than Dryden by
his prologues.
And now, what was to become of Elizabeth? She
thought of sending her papers to Mr Leslie, but that
would instantly betray Warren, and she had promised
him to be silent. She was strongly tempted, but
resisted
.
`He has behaved ill to me, certainly,' said she,
`but I must not, on that account, forget my own
principles
.
It is the spirit of retaliation that makes
dishonesty
travel on like a snowball. I must not think of
such redress, but what am I to do? The Grahams have
already proved their inability to assist me. However,
God tempers the wind to the shorn lamb, and,
hurrying
to her room, Elizabeth put on her bonnet and set
out for the publisher to offer herself as a translator.'
The courteousness of her reception encouraged her,
but he looked dubious as to the success of her plan.
`Translations did not take,' he said; `at presentalmost
every body read French, and the best novels were
already translated.'
`But,' said Elizabeth, hurriedly, `I do not confine
myself
to French or to novels. I know several languages
and have the habit of writing. Let me undertake any
work that you will risk the publication of; and if you
are not satisfied I will give it up.'
For several minutes she waited in suspense while he
knit his brows, tapped upon the table, and gave evident
signs of hesitation. At length, he said, `Well, Madam,
there is a work of Herder's that you may try.'
`May try!' Elizabeth rose, then sat down again.
At last, summoning all her fortitude, she said, `My
object is neither amusement nor reputation, Sir. I
simply write for my support, and came to know if you
would give me occupation, with a moderate
compensation
.'
Mr C was touched by the look of pain and
weariness
on her countenance, and agreed immediately to give
her a hundred dollars for an elegant translation. The
sum sounded magnificent, and she retraced her steps
with a lightened heart.
VOL. II. 23
But her task proved tedious and difficult. The
extreme
attention it required fatigued her mind. There
were subjects for verbal criticism that required a great
deal of thought, and, in the present state of her health,
thought and study completely overpowered her.
Eighteen
months of seclusion and application, uncheered by
success, and rendered still more painful by the privations
to which poverty is liable, had destroyed the vigor of
her mind and injured a frame that had never been
robust
.
There were times when she felt such a dying
away of her mental powers that she feared her faculties
were leaving her. She sought to revive her sinking
spirits by going oftener to Mrs Graham's, and by
frequent
walks to Dr B's, but the exertion now became
a toil, and panting for breath she would sit on a bank at
some distance from the school, hoping that chance or
sport might lead her darling in that direction. One
evening he did discover her, and rushing into her arms
reproached her for her long absence.
`You must ask leave to come and see me, Louis. This
walk is not a short one, you know, and I am apt to be tired.'
Louis looked at her and attempted to speak, but
turned
his head away and burst into tears. Elizabeth
soothingly inquired into his distress, and found that he
wished to be taken from school.
`Oh! do not deny me, dearest Elizabeth. It is for
me you look so thin and pale. Instead of living in
comfort, you are spending all you have upon me. Now
take me from school and bind me to some trade. Do n't
look so shocked! I have been reading the Life of
Franklin, and if he, from being an apprentice to a printer,
rose to be such a great man, why should I despair? Do,
dear sister, bind me to a printer. It is the best trade
at least, the most agreeable trade I can think of, and
some years hence I may repay all your goodness.'
`LouisLouisdear, generous boy! do not pain me
by such language. You can requite me better by
applying
to your studies, than by tryng the uncertainty of
rising from obscurity into eminence. You forget Dr
Franklin had a wonderful mind, and lived in times to
draw forth powerful energies. The probability is, dear
Louis, that, if you are a printer at fifteen, you will still
be a printer at thirty; but another time we will speak
of this. The sun is setting and I have far to walk.'
It was with feeble steps she regained her dwelling,
and, with a reluctant pen, resumed her task, which
became
daily more difficult. Her headaches were so
frequent and so intense that she frequently spent whole
days in correcting the mistakes of the preceding ones.
The very attitude necessary for writing gave her pain,
but she felt that she could not stop, and some days after
the time appointed by Mr C she walked with a
beating heart to his house with her translation.
She was shown into a parlour at the back of the book
shop, where she sat absorbed in her own feelings,
unconscious
that she had drawn the attention of a
gentleman
who entered some moments after her, and who
stood gazing with painful interest upon her anxious and
excited countenance, which he was sure he had seen
before, but could not recollect when or where.
And, indeed, Elizabeth was changed since he had
seen her last. The calm, high, meditative brow was
now contracted by pain, and care had dug caves for
those once placid eyes. She sat leaning her head upon
her wasted hand, lost in her own anxious thoughts till
Mr C came in.
`Ah! you have brought the translation. However,
I have changed my mind since you were here last.'
Elizabeth, who had learned to anticipate injustice,
lost all self-command, and clasping her hands, burst
into a passion of tears.
`Nay, do not suppose,' said Mr C, distressed at his
own abruptness, `that I have forgotten our agreement.
I have no idea of depriving you of the price of your
labors.'
He unlocked a desk and took out bills which he put
into her hand, saying, `I only meant to tell you that I
have deferred the publication of this work for a few
months, as there are so many new books in the press.'
Elizabeth hardly heard him. All she thought of was
to be at home and alone. Yet still the future occurred
to her. She offered her address to Mr C, saying, in
a voice of hopelessness, `Should you have occasion to
employ any one in the drudgery of literature, in
copying
,
correcting'she paused, feeling as if she were
soliciting charity. The card dropped from her fingers
and she hurried away.
Mr Leslie, for it was he who had been an unobserved
spectator of Elizabeth's distress, took up the manuscript
that lay on the table.
`A singular young person, that,' said the bookseller;
`I must try and find her some employment. Yet I cannot
understand how such an elegant and accomplished
woman
should be in such extreme distress. But what
astonishes you?' for, as soon as Leslie had cast his
eyes on the handwriting, he recognised that of Warren's
manuscripts. Everything was the samethe folding
of the paper, the very silk with which it was fastened.
There could be no doubt as to her being the charming
writer he had so long wished to discover.
`Latimer!' he exclaimed; `surely, this must be the
daughter of him who was involved in the ruin of B
and T.'
Upon making inquiries, Mr Leslie found that she
who was now struggling with poverty and neglect, had
once been among the favorites of fortune. He
described
to his wife the scene in Mr C's parlour, and she
readily joined with him in the wish to serve Elizabeth.
But it was too late to serve or save. She had
returned
to her lodgings, and throwing herself upon her bed
gave way to utter despondency. A low fever had been
for some time hanging about her, and she now lay down,
expecting to rise no more. Oh! that sinking of the
heart, when, after struggling with ill fortune, we find
ourselves at the very spot from which we set out, like
the shipwrecked wretch, who, after buffetting the waves
through a long night of darkness, sees himself at
morning
in the midst of a shoreless ocean, with hope and
strength exhausted.
Elizabeth had not moved from the spot where she had
first thrown herself, when her landlady announced Mr
Leslie. His name excited no emotion. She rose
mechanically
,
and went down.
Leslie had been examining the books which crowded
her little apartment, and everything he saw convinced
him that he was right in his suspicions. He delicately
stated to her his discovery, and expressed a wish to
remove
her to a station where her talents might procure
for her competency and respect. The words sounded
like mockery to Elizabeth. Her mind was in that state
of abandonment and depression, that, had the honors
and riches of the world been within her grasp, she would
not have extended her hand.
Mr Leslie proceeded to offer her the superintendence
of the education of six young ladies, all of that age when
a desire to learn saves the teacher an infinity of trouble.
She was about to decline, but the thought of Louis
roused her. She lifted her languid head, and attempted
to thank Mr Leslie. `Yet give me a short interval of
rest before I begin any new employment. It will be but
short, for now I feel as if the prospect of accomplishing
23*
the first wish of my heart, will give me new life and
spirits. It is not to contribute to my own necessities
that I have struggled with misfortune, but I have a
brother dependant upon mea boy of such uncommon
abilities, that I feel it would be neglecting one of
Heaven's
best gifts, were I to repress them by devoting him
to an employment better suited to his circumstances.'
`This indeed,' thought Leslie, `is woman's love!
This is woman's pure, self-sacrificing spirit! That which
has supported the sage in his dungeon, the martyr at the
stake, and many a misnamed hero, is not wanting here.
She is satisfied with her motive, looking forward to a
reward so uncertain as the promise of talent in boyhood,
a promise as deceitful as the winds or waters.'
He left Elizabeth with excited hopes, that prevented
her from feeling for some hours the fever that was
preying
upon her. But the hour of reaction came. All
night the wild images of delirium danced before her
tortured eyes, and on the morrow, when Mrs Leslie
called to invite her to her house, Elizabeth's ear was
deaf to the soft voice that tried to awaken consciousness.
As soon as she was well enough to bear removal, Mrs
Leslie carried her into the country, where the sight of
the green hills and slopes made her feel as if she could
again brush the dew from their summits; but even
Naturebeautiful Natureonce so beloved, and,
during
her long, gloomy hours in  Street, so anxiously
pined after, failed to restore elasticity to her step. It was
autumna season she had always loved, better even than
`the music and the bloom
And all the mighty ravishment of spring.'
But now, those softly shaded days, which once filled her
heart with a pensiveness that she would not have
exchanged
for mirth, gave a chill to her frame as though
the season had been December.
Elizabeth felt that her race was run; but the heart,
where despondency had long made its cheerless abode,
was now soothed by the new and welcome feelings of
gratitude and love.
Mrs Leslie was one of those benevolent beings who
seize upon our affection as their right. The heart gave
itself up to her with perfect confidence. The greatest
sceptic as to the existence of virtue could not look upon
her open, candid countenance without feeling staggered,
nor witness the happiness she diffused around her, by
the influence of a heavenly disposition upon the daily
events of life, without feeling that the source from
whence they flowed was pure. One felt in her presence
that something good was near, yet there was no parade
of goodness about Mrs Leslienot obvious, not
obtrusive
,
and only seen
`in all those graceful acts,
Those thousand decencies that daily flow
From all her words and actions.'
`Look, dear Elizabeth,' said she to her languid, pale
companion, as they were returning from an excursion
to some of the beautiful villages on the Connecticut;
`Look! that is Mount Holyoke. He overlooks my
native village. I hope the time is not far off when we
shall climb his rugged sides together.'
Elizabeth shook her head. `Do not deceive me.
I feel that ere long I shall be in the presence of God.
And yet I cannot say I die without regret, for I am yet
young, and youth, even though oppressed with care,
shrinks back at sight of the grave. Yet, as I feel
drawing
nearer to it, much of the fear that it once excited,
subsides, and, perhaps, before my last hour comes, I
may cease to think even on Louis. Poor Louis! if
I could have lived a few years longerbut God's will
be done.'
Mrs Leslie wept. She understood how dreadful
was the uncertainty of Elizabeth's mind as to Louis,
and she lost no time in consulting her husband about
removing the only weight from her heart. He willingly
agreed to her benevolent proposal, and that very
evening
Elizabeth was made happy by his assuring her that
Louis should receive the same advantages of education
as his own son. She could only weep and press their
hands. `My generous friends! may his future life
thank you! may he rise up with your own and call
you blessed!'
Elizabeth lingered only a month longer. The Leslies
would not part with her, and their attachment grew
stronger as the object of it was fading before their eyes.
There were times when all her delightful powers seemed
renewed; when the treasures of her memory and
imagination charmed away the winter evening; but the
flushed cheek and glittering eye warned them that the
lamp of life was burning fast away.
One evening she left the drawingroom earlier than
usual. Mrs Leslie saw, with alarm, the extreme
paleness
of her countenance, and, after a few moments'
hesitation, followed her to her chamber. She paused a
minute at the door, for Elizabeth had sunk on her knees
at the foot of the bed. One arm hung by her side; her
head had fallen on the other, which she had flung
across the bed. Mrs Leslie trembled as she saw her
motionless, then rushed forwardbut the hand she
grasped was icy cold. The spirit had quitted its earthly
tabernacle forever.
STANZAS
TO THE MEMORY OF JOHN G. C. BRAINARD.
Olli dura quies oculos, et ferreus urguet
Somnus; in ternam clauduntur lumina noctem.
Virg. neid. Lib. X.
Peace
to the slumberer!On his wasting breast,
The dull, cold earth in mournful stillness lies;
Gathered in dust, to take his last, deep rest,
With dreamless silence on his shadowed eyes!
Lost, as a song, in spring's rejoicing hour,
Whose cadence sweetens the blue atmosphere;
Bud of a heavenly treeimmortal flower
Won from Life's desert;why should it be here?
His thoughts were holy; and like founts that bring
Music and freshness in their quiet strain
Thus his rapt Fancy plumed her radiant wing,
And gathered bliss from Nature's wide domain!
Then flowed his numbersas the pure buds shed
Delicious odor through the summer glen.
Calm was their influencein bright pictures spread,
Cheering the heart, and winning praise of men.
Peace to the sleeper!o'er his silent lyre
The autumnal gale at evening-tide goes by;
Where rests the hand that swept its strings of fire,
And with its murmurs roused the smile or sigh?
Ask of the fresh earth on his gloomy pall,
Where are the raptures of his bosom now?
What reck the leaves of honor's coronal?
Ask the wind's requiem in the cypress bough!
Let the sad mourner, as his glance is cast
In sorrow's mute, imploring gaze, to Heaven,
Weep not, that Genius to a rest hath passed
That to the weary, a repose is given!
Why should the fount pour out its richness here,
In the dim vista of this vale of tears;
Or grief look back upon joy's brief career,
Through the chill labyrinth of life's faded years?
The spring hath found him in its morning hour,
Musing in rapture by the upland side;
Gleaning sweet feelings from the early flower,
Or drinking pleasure by the blue stream's tide;
Young leaves, the gladness of the sapphire sky,
Where the pure clouds unfold the quiet wing
How woke they in his soul calm poetry,
Enthusiast thought, and rich imagining!
Summer, the tempter!oft her scenes have won
His willing footstep from the hearth away,
To mark the splendors of her golden sun,
To list the wild-bird's halcyon roundelay!
And when sad autumn tinged the hill and vale,
And dark clouds palled the melancholy west,
What pensive pictures lingered in his tale
Of the dead season, as it sunk to rest?
Dust hath caressed him!and his languid eye
Is folded deeply in the voiceless tomb;
What though blithe tones may fill the azure sky,
And garnished Nature laugh in early bloom?
The stream will murmur by its flowery shore,
From the blue mountain Spring's sweet voice will come
Wake they the slumberer, whose dream is o'er
The wearied pilgrim, who hath found his home?
Summer, with songs, will come; the breezy hill
To the gay carol of her birds will ring;
There will be sunlight poured on fount and rill,
And countless blossoms from the dust will spring;
The lake's clear wave will glance, the gale will sweep
olian murmurs in its wandering free;
A glow of joy will bathe the landthe deep
But to the poet, what will these things be?
His dream hath vanished;in life's changeful hour
His lyre was breathing as he passed along,
To Love, to Nature, with her hallowed power
And faded leaves, earth's solitudes among!
Will Love's tone rouse him to renew his lay;
Or summer cloud, or blue depth of the sky?
Will Nature's voice dissolve the spell away,
Or kindle fire within that deep sealed eye?
Look o'er the desolate earth!the plaintive gale
Hurls the red leaf upon the fountain's breast;
Tones from the forest tell of roses pale
Of yellow buds, returning unto rest!
Yet will the flowers again arise from dust,
And brightening skies o'er the green earth be given;
Then let the soul resign, with humble trust,
The Friend, the Bard, in hope, to God and Heaven!
THE PAINTER'S REVELATION.
`
I cannot
paint it!' exclaimed Duncan Weir, as he
threw down his pencil in despair.
The portrait of a beautiful female rested on his easel.
The head was turned as if to look into the painter's
face, and an expression of delicious confidence and love
was playing about the half parted mouth. A mass of
luxuriant hair, stirred by the position, threw its shadow
upon a shoulder that but for its transparency you would
have given to Itys, and the light from which the face
turned away fell on the polished throat with the rich
mellowness of a moonbeam. She was a brunetteher
hair of a glossy black, and the blood melting through the
clear brown of her cheek, and sleeping in her lip like
color in the edge of a rose. The eye was unfinished.
He could not paint it. Her low, expressive forehead,
and the light pencil of her eyebrows, and the long,
melancholy lashes were all perfect; but he had painted
the eye a hundred times, and a hundred times he had
destroyed it, till, at the close of a long day, as his light
failed him, he threw down his pencil in despair, and
resting his head on his easel, gave himself up to the
contemplation of the ideal picture of his fancy.
I wish all my readers had painted a portrait, the
portrait of the face they best love to look onit would
be such a chance to thrill them with a description of
the painter's feelings. There is nothing but the first
timid kiss that has half its delirium. Whythink of it
a moment! To sit for hours gazing into the eyes you
dream of! To be set to steal away the tint of the lip
and the glory of the brow you worship! To have beauty
come and sit down before you, till its spirit is breathed
into your fancy, and you can turn away and paint it!
To call up, like a rash enchanter, the smile that
bewilders
you, and have power over the expression of a face,
that, meet you where it will, laps you in Elysium!
Make me a painter, Pythagoras!
A lover's picture of his mistress, painted as she exists
in his fancy, would never be recognised. He would
make little of features and complexion. Nonohe
has not been an idolater for this. He has seen her
as no one else has seen her, with the illumination of
love, which, once in her life, makes every woman under
heaven an angel of light. He knows her heart, too
its gentleness, its fervor; and when she comes up in his
imagination it is not her visible form passing before his
mind's eye, but the apparition of her invisible virtues,
clothed in the tender recollections of their discovery and
development. If he remembers her features at all, it
is the changing color of her cheek, or the droop of her
curved lashes, or the witchery of the smile that
welcomed
him. And even then he was intoxicated with
her voicealways a sweet instrument when the heart
plays upon itand his eye was good for nothing. No
it is no matter what she may be to othersshe appears
to him like a bright and perfect being, and he would
as soon paint St Cecilia with a wart as his mistress with
an imperfect feature.
Duncan could not satisfy himself. He painted with
his heart on fire, and he threw by canvass after canvass
till his room was like a gallery of angels. In perfect
despair, at last, he sat down and made a deliberate copy
of her featuresthe exquisite picture of which we have
spoken. Still, the eye haunted him. He felt as if it
would redeem all if he could give it the expression with
VOL. II. 24
which it looked back some of his impassioned
declarations
.
His skill, however, was, as yet, baffled, and it
was at the close of the third day of unsuccessful effort
that he relinquished it in despair, and, dropping his head
upon his easel, abandoned himself to his imagination.
Duncan entered the gallery with Helen leaning on
his arm. It was thronged with visiters. Groups were
collected before the favorite pictures, and the low hum
of criticism rose confusedly, varied, now and then, by
the exclamation of some enthusiastic spectator. In a
conspicuous part of the room hung `The Mute Reply,
by
Duncan Weir
.' A crowd had gathered before it, and
were gazing on it with evident pleasure. Expressions
of surprise and admiration broke frequently from the
group, and, as they fell on the ear of Duncan, he felt
an irresistible impulse to approach and look at his own
picture. What is like the affection of a painter for the
offspring of his genius? It seemed to him as if he had
never before seen it. There it hung like a new picture,
and he dwelt upon it with all the interest of a stranger.
It was indeed beautiful. There was a bewitching
loveliness
floating over the features. The figure and air
had a peculiar grace, and freedom; but the eye showed
the genius of the master. It was a large, lustrous eye,
moistened without weeping, and lifted up, as if to the
face of a lover, with a look of indescribable tenderness.
The deception was wonderful. It seemed every moment
as if the moisture would gather into a tear, and roll
down her cheek. There was a strange freshness in its
impression upon Duncan. It seemed to have the very
look that had sometimes beamed upon him in the twilight.
He turned from it and looked at Helen. Her eyes
met his with the samethe self-same expression of the
picture. A murmur of pleased recognition stole from
the crowd whose attention was attracted. Duncan burst
into tearsand awoke. He had been dreaming on
his easel!
`Do you believe in dreams, Helen?' said Duncan,
as he led her into the studio the next day to look at the
finished picture.
END OF VOL. II.`Have you ever read Undine, Tom? Did you
conceive
of a river of wondrous and perfect beauty?
Was it fringed with all manner of stooping trees, and
kissed to the very lip by clover? Did it wind constantly
in and out, as if both banks were enamoured of its flow
and enticed it from each other's bosoms? Was it
hidden
sometimes by thick masses of leaves meeting over
it, and sometimes by the swelling of a velvet slope that
sent it rippling away into shadow? and did it steal out
again like a happy child from a hiding place, and flash
up to your eye till you would have sworn it was living
and intelligent? Did the banks lean away in a rich,
deep verdure, and were the meadows sleeping beneath
the light, like a bosom in a silk mantle? and when
your ear had drank in the music of the running water,
and the loveliness of color and form had unsettled the
earthliness within you, did you believe in your heart
that a strip of Eden had been left unmarred by the angel?
`We have been on the edge of such a river for eighty
miles. The motion of the boat is imperceptible, and
the scenery glides by like a dream. Everything has
been beautifulbeautiful! The sun set gloriously last
night, and soon after, the moon rose full and perfect
from the bosom of a white cloud. Never was there a
more magnificent night. Do you recollect in the
Epicurean
,
Tom, the night upon the Nile, which
Alciphron
says, was like that which shines upon the sleep
of the spirits who rest in the valley of the moon on their
way to Heaven?
`I do believe that I have seen this river before. It
satisfies something in my heart like a recollection.
Every feature in its Elysium of a valleyrock and tree,
bank and waterhas moved my memory like
something
I imperfectly recollect. One of two things is
certainI have seen all this before, or, there is a
degree
of beauty which stirs the spirit by its
approximation
to something with which it has been familiar. How
manymany feelings of this kind have we which we
never define, but which, without a theory of previous
existence, are perfectly unaccountable! How often do
whole trains of thoughtwild and unutterable thought
pass through the mind, every shade of which is familiar,
while we know, perfectly, from the very nature and
cause of suggestion, that never before in this world
could they have been felt or engendered. Is it true,
after all, that this is not the beginning of our existence?
Is it true, that the magnificent idea of a series of
existences
,
ascending, and innumerable as the stars in
heaven, is not visionary and idle? that, as the great
Wordsworth says,
Our birth is but a sleep and a forgetting;
The soul that rises with us, our life's star,
Hath had elsewhere its setting,
And cometh from afar.
Not in entire forgetfulness,
And not in utter nakedness,
But trailing clouds of glory do we come
From God who is our home.
`How much more sublime than ever, if this is true,
is his address to a child:
Thou whose exterior semblance doth belie
Thy soul's immensity!
Thou best Philosopher, who yet dost keep
Thy heritage, thou eye among the blind!
That, deaf and silent readst the eternal deep;
Haunted forever by the eternal mind!
Mighty prophet! Seer blest!
On whom those truths do rest
Which we are toiling all our lives to find,
In darkness lost, the darkness of the grave;
Thou, over whom thy immortality,
Broods like the day, a master o'er a slave,
A presence which is not to be put by;
Thou little child, yet glorious in the might
Of heaven-born freedom, on thy being's height,
Why with such earnest pains dost thou provoke
The years to bring the inevitable yoke,
Thus blindly with thy blessedness at strife?
Full soon thy soul shall have her earthly freight
And custom lie upon thee with a weight
Heavy as frost and deep almost as life!
`Dear Tom, I have bored you with my
Pythagoreanism
,
but it has brooded on me all day, and I must tell
somebody. Fritz would laugh at it, and Charles is an
unbeliever, and what could I do?
`This morning we had one of those thin, watery
atmospheres which are peculiar to the rivers. Apart
from the pleasure of breathing itfor to me its rarity is
like exhilirating gasit threw me into a mood of
delicious
mysticism. The decided outlines of the scenery
were lost or softened away, and, with the quiet motion
of the boat, it was not difficult to believe every rock a
gray ruin, and the apparent gliding by of the tall trees
the stalking of giant phantasms. It was an atmosphere
in which Ossian would have seen Temora like a
spirit of Heaven, half folded in the skirt of a cloud,
or have sung, Rest in thy shadowy cave, O Sun!
Thou shalt sleep in the clouds, careless of the voice of
the morning.
`Tom! did you never wish you were the Wandering
Jew, and could live forever?'
The remaining part of the letter was written by my
chum. It is principally a description of one of Horace's
practical jokesan amusement of which he was sadly
fond. I do not approve of telling idle stories, but it brings
out a trait or two of Job's character, and is, literally,
and without embellishment, true. The captain of the
canal packet  has since gravely told me the story as
he understood itof course with some slight variations.
Charles thus describes it.
`Yesterday you know was Sunday. It was one of
those hushed, breathless mornings that seem peculiar to
the Sabbath. Job had put on his black coat and a white
cravat out of respect to the day, and was sitting alone
on the forecastle in a brown study. The passengers
were all reading or asleep; the pretty Quaker looked
serious, and Fritz was horribly
ennuied
.
`Egad, Charles, said he, thrusting his hands into
his pockets after a long yawn, and eyeing Job with that
quizzical expression of his, does n't he look like a
parson?
`Presently he gave one of his portentous laughs and
turned suddenly on his heel.
`Captain, said he, addressing him gravely as he
stepped upon deck, that gentleman yonder in a black
coat is a Methodist clergyman. You see how he sits
and thinks. His mind is very uneasy about travelling
on Sunday. He says it would be a relief to him if he
could preach to the passengers, and he wanted me to
ask your permission. Now if you 've any objection
`Not the least, said the captain, bowing politely;
I'll propose it to the passengers.
`He went below and stated the request. No
objection
was made, and after moving the table to the upper
end of the cabin and placing the desk upon it for an
extempore pulpit, he came again upon deck. Fritz stood
by with a look of immoveable gravity.
`All 's ready below, Sir, said the captain, coming
up to Job, and touching his hat respectfully.
`Sir? said Job.
`All 's ready for the sermon, Sir.
`Sermon? said Job.
`Yes, Sir, the passengers will be happy to hear you.
`Hear me! `a sermon!' why, I 'm not a clergyman!
`The captain turned to Fritz. He met him with a
look of profound astonishment. The captain was
staggered
.
Fritz touched his forehead significantly and
shook his head.
`Aha! said the captain, comprehending; and he
went below and announced that there would be no
service
,
as the preacher was taken suddenly ill.
`Now, Job, said Fritz, as soon as the captain was
gone, I 've told him you 're a preacher.
`Why, Fritz!
`No matter nowhe 's in a devil of a passion and
has gone down for his pistols. If you do n't read a
sermon, I must fight himthat 's poz.
`Job was in a cold sweat. The idea of a duel was
too horrible! But then to read a sermon to forty people
in a canal boat!and perhaps they would ask him to
pray! He hesitatedit was a dreadful alternative!
`So, said Fritz, buttoning up his coat and looking
determined, I must fight, I see.
`Oh no, Fritzno! I 'llI 'llI 'll read the
sermon
come,
FritzI 'll read itbutbutdo n't fight,
do n't fight!
`Thank you!thank you! exclaimed Fritz, with
warmth, and pulling out a rank Universalist sermon
which he had found in the cabin, he gave it to Job, and
went in search of the captain.
`After explaining to him that the minister was now
in a lucid interval, and had again expressed a wish to
VOL. II. 10
preach, the proper arrangements were made, and Job,
trembling like a leaf, went down with the sermon in
his hand.
`It looked very appalling. The passengers were
seated on each side of the cabin in two long rows. A
large Bible lay on the desk, and a glass of water had
been set beside it by the captain, who was fearful of a
return of the malady.
`Job's knees knocked together as he rose. He
opened the sermon and read the text in a tremulous
voice.
`He has forgot the prayer! whispered the
captain
poor
fellow!
`Job went on. The sentiments grew bold. The old
woman with the ear trumpet, who sat at a little distance,
moved nearer. It grew worse and worse. The old
lady looked at her trumpet. There was no obstruction.
She moved close up to him. There came a flat
assertion
that hell was a mere bugbear. Up jumped the
old lady
`You a Methodist minister!
You
a Methodist
minister! How dare you call yourself a Methodist
minister, you Universalist, you!
`Job turned to the titlepage. He had not understood
a word of what he had read. Sure enough, it was a
Universalist sermon. He gave Fritz a look of
indescribable
distress, hurled the sermon indignantly out of
the cabin window, and rushed upon deck.
`Crazy!crazy as a loon! exclaimed the captain,
as he stepped into the middle of the cabin to apologize.
But we are at Rochester, so
Yours, my dear Tom,
Charles
.'`
My Noble Prince
`She who brings you this letter is my only child
all the treasure I possess in this world. Therefore, I
trust her to you, relying on your honor. If the walls of
Soleure fall, I shall be buried under their ruins; but if
you grant your protection to my daughter, I shall have
no more anxiety for her. Give me some token that
you grant my petition, and you will receive your reward
from that Being who watches over the innocent, and
who knows our hearts.
`
Bucheg
,
Magistrate of Soleure
.'